So here you are, against all obstacles…
a talk given by Steve Paxton at Culturgest in Lisbon, 2019

On March 9, 2019, Steve Paxton visited the opening weekend of Steve Paxton: 
Drafting Interior Techniques, a retrospective exhibition of his work and legacy 
held at Culturgest in Lisbon, Portugal. The exhibition was dedicated to the inner 
experiences of the dancers, inviting the audience to nap, meditate-while-standing 
(aka small dance), and every Sunday to practice Contact Improvisation in a studio 
we had carved out within the walls of the museum. It also presented videos of Steve’s 
early pieces from the Judson era, Grand Union performances, and Contact Improvisation, 
as well as installations based on Material for the Spine, a wall of the complete back 
issues of Contact Quarterly, and videos of Steve performing the Goldberg Variations, PART, 
and many other solo and group works.
That evening, Jurij Konjar restaged Satisfyin Lover, a piece Steve made in 1968 for 42 ordinary 
people to cross the stage and sit, walk, or stand; and FLAT, a solo from 1964. Jurij also improvised 
to J.S. Bach’s The Goldberg Variations interpreted by Glenn Gould, inspired by a solo that Steve 
performed from 1986 to 1992.
The next day, Steve gave a two-hour talk in Culturgest’s grand auditorium at the invitation of 
Liliana Courtinho (Talks Curator for Culturgest). What follows is excerpted from his talk. [The full 
transcript can be read on CQ Unbound on CQ’s website.]
—Romain Bigé, co-curator, with João Fiadeiro, of the Lisbon exhibition

Steve Paxton. Well…[bringing his chair to the edge of the stage, looking at the audience].
So here you are. Against all obstacles, here you are.
How did you do it?
When I think of an audience and the man-hours that it takes to
prepare to go out and sit in a theatre— all the arrangements that it takes, the scheduling, the calendars, the baby-sitters, the shopping, the clothes—the clothes alone must take hours and hours.
Just give them their weight.

I wanted to speak today with young dancers, if they came.
Just to say, first of all, that the route to becoming a dancer is a long one. And this is because you have to grow the information: you don’t get the information; what you get is a ten-year course, in which you have to change your body; you have to actually develop, grow, direct your own growth and be directed by your teachers into a different body.
 
The reason for this is that the dances we [Western dancers] dance work with projection, or extension, or stretch, or pointing—the extremes of the geometry of the body. I don’t know why we’ve done that, except that for a theatre like the one we are in right now—I could make intimate gestures here on stage that might not carry to the top row. Maybe that’s the case, maybe as theatres got bigger, the dance became grander. But, at any rate, it seems we have invented something that no other dance had ever done. It is quite an invention.
What does it mean to have an invention in movement? In human growth? In the development of what we become? I don’t know if I can answer this question.
Each culture invents its art, and we don’t know exactly the rules behind that. We know what we’ve done. We can see it. We’ve heard about it. For instance, the story of
modern dance coming to counter the power of ballet. Or so I was told, even though I don’t think it’s really true.
I mean modern dance was as much
 
dependent on ballet as Lisbon is dependent on Ancient Greece: it
was a basis. And yet, with the modern dance came a new idea, the idea that it didn’t have to be a universal dance, that it could be a personal dance.
When it came to my generation, I assessed the situation this way: my teacher, Merce Cunningham, did not do what he was taught, he went on to find a new thing to do; his teacher, Martha Graham, did not do what she was taught, she found, or she invented a new way to do it; her teachers, Ruth St Denis and Ted Shawn, did not do what their idol, Isadora Duncan, had done; and Isadora did not do what anybody had done.
This is a very interesting sequence, and it happened in all the modern arts. It meant that there was a lot of responsibility on partly trained, immature, aspiring, hopeful artists to invent something new as they were developing, as they were still being developed by their teachers. In a way, their resistance had to be grown at the same time, so they
did not simply become a copy of what they were taught. This responsibility is that they had to become like the phoenix, coming out of the ashes
of the previous art forms. But it couldn’t be the same phoenix: a new bird had to come.
So that was weird. That’s the situation we were in. That’s why I don’t encourage anyone to be a dancer, because this is going to be a hard climb. But if you do, just know that it’s going to take you a long time to mature, and you have to be patient with yourself, and you will have to go to these classes. You don’t have
to like a class, you have to go to it regularly to get your body strong. Plus, that will be a basis for your health for the rest of your life— so, you know—why not?
Now, is there something out there to find? Have we found it all? Doesn’t it feel like that? There are so many people and they are so different.
Well, where I live—I live on a farm—there is a kitchen with a
window facing south onto a gentle hill and a tree. In the spring, grass grows there, the tree has blossoms. In the winter, it is snow—we’re very far north in Vermont—and the trees are bare. Naked, cold trees. And I look out everyday, and I feel something. I have been there for fifty

years, looking out this window, more or less. I feel something, and what I feel is the molecules of that hillside. After all this time, my vision—not my actual eyes—my vision is saying: this place is alive. Every bit of it is alive.
The dirt is alive. The plants are alive. Every molecule is transforming into something else. They get to a certain point, they start to decay, they trans- form to something else, they come up again, the cycle is happening, it’s molecular. I’m seeing it on a molecular level. These molecules are not set in stones. These molecules are adapting and changing. A trillion changes are happening at any one time in my yard. And they’re not all happening in the same way that they’ve already happened. The changes are adapting, they are adapting a little bit into something else.
I’m talking about evolution, in a way; I’m talking about evolution in miniature, I’m talking about our atoms, our molecules, changing.
We know they do, we know they’ve changed, even though you feel the same, even though I feel the same, as me, as you, you know you’ve changed. You are not who you used to be. Nor will you stay who you are now.
This is so scary: what am I about to say next? I don’t know.


But, what I have said so far seems to suggest that you have some ability to guide what you become as you change. The change is going to happen. You have a choice. If you want to be a dancer, you do the classes. I suggest you do the classes. You don’t have
to. I know one dancer, Simone Forti, who didn’t do the classes, but she
is such a genius. I used to see her in Cunningham classes. She was trying to do the classes, and after the classes I would see her on her hands and knees, crawling. I knew that she needed one more thing, something simple and straight forward, something basic to ground herself again. She is somebody that
tasted the dance techniques but was not adapted, or compliant enough; too stubborn, maybe. And that’s how she went on developing her own work and ended up at a place that I would consider shamanistic.
It’s altogether a rather strange thing to do, to take a body and to turn it into an art thing. It’s one thing to make art of bodies, of people fighting, of lovers twisting—to make a picture of it. But to do art with it, what a strange thing. And dance is particularly strange because movement is so hard to understand and to describe.
 
I think that’s the reason why in dance techniques they simplify it, so when you study a dance technique, you are studying a small area of what movement can be. And if you are then to study martial arts, or Tai Chi, or folk dance, you have then a different slice of human movement. What I saw in Bali, nothing of my dance
was there to be seen.
So is there more? I think more is evolving. I think we are evolving.
I think you have to evolve. There’s all kinds of evolution. There’s what you do in your life by yourself, as a solo evolver—that’s your work. There’s you and your friends, a group of you, how you think, what you think, what you agree on, how you present work maybe. There’s the larger culture, gradually moving on. We are all evolving.

Now I would like to show a few videos that appear in the exhibition. And the first I want to show is Smiling,
a dance I made to reflect on facial expressions in contemporary cultures. In Rome, in 1969, the piece was presented with State, a dance where
 
people stood still, and Satisfyin Lover, a dance which you saw yesterday, where people walk, stand, and sit.
I wanted to see what these look like on stage, I wanted to see these performed, I wanted to see standing performed, not just to happen. I wanted to see it performed to honor it, but also to see what would happen to people doing it. To walk naturally, which is what they are supposed to do in Satisfyin Lover, is not easily done.
When I settled upon walking as an artistic formula or medium, I was looking for something ancient in the body, I was looking for something not of the culture, but before culture, back to times we could only imagine, and I think walking was a good choice.
It’s an obvious thing, we do it all the time. To put it on the stage is what our culture does: a microscope on walking, on the people who are walking, on the fact of walking, standing, and sitting. Just as one strata of what the body does.
 


I am sure you all know that to be bipedal, to be walking standing up like this, is not the most normal way of moving on the Earth and relating

to gravity. It gives us the potential of using the arms in various ways, but it is unusual. The uprightness
allows for the head to be at the top of the body, which means that there is about seven pounds of mass up there. Playing with that point of balance around which we are switching sides, head to torso, changing the way weight falls through the body, and suddenly we are in ballet, suddenly we are in Java.…
I have written a little book called Gravity. The reason gravity is important to me as a thought form is that gravity is what keeps the body true. And by “true” I mean in the sense of carpentry: the fall of a weight on a string makes its line straight. The fall of our weight in the body has the same effect. The fall of the organs into the pelvis helps give
us a basis. We can unnecessarily pull those organs back up and hold the weight high—into a kind of paralysis. But we can also let them fall. In that


case, it is as though our freedom was based on our acceptance of its opposite.
Evolution takes a long time and happens in small elements.
For young dancers, despair not. We modestly say: we have only begun to understand, we may not have even begun yet. There’s lots of chaos and evolution that we have yet to fnd and somebody in this room, somebody in this city, has such potential of development that they can bring and show us something else.
I think that’s all I have to say. Thank you for coming.
Oh, yes, there’s a possibility for questions.

Liliana Courtinho. In one of the videos of the exhibition [... in a non-wimpy way... an interview with Steve by Bojana Cvejic and Lennart Laberenz], you are in your dance studio in your farm in Northern Vermont and you say, “This is where I cultivate my pessimism.” And so I wondered: today, you seemed quite optimistic. Where do you stand now, between those two options?

Steve Paxton. I thought I was an optimist for many years, but I met a man in Amsterdam, in an interview situation, and he asked me a question that I thought was so stupid, something along the lines of “don’t you think things are getting better?” At that
 
point, I was much younger than I am now, but I was already at an age where I could say: I know things are just not getting better, and I don’t know what to do about it. So I said to him, No, I don’t things are getting better. What about the police, what about education, what about nurses, where have you been? Have you been under a rock all your life?
I realized at that moment that I was very pessimistic. Tis was
saddening to me. But I also realized: well, being an optimist doesn’t seem to have worked, it doesn’t seem to have helped improve anything; I have been told that it’s a good thing but who knows? And so I tried to be a pessimist and see how that worked, or see what its conditions were. I have been living under these conditions now for some time. It’s a bitter victory. It’s somehow a little bit healthier to hope that things will improve than to have the bitter confirmation that you are right, that they will not improve.
But I’m waiting for the next turn: if I changed once, I am sure I can change again, if I can find evidence that something is improving. So:
stay tuned.

Vera Mantero. Steve, you spent a lot of time in your life building and devising very complex, and sometimes mysterious, systems to improvise. Why is it important for you to improvise and to create
 
conditions, complicated conditions, to improvise? And I am not thinking here about Contact Improvisation, I’m thinking for example of the work you did with Lisa Nelson, [Nightstand], in which you were exchanging various kinds of objects; I’m thinking of systems that you built in order to
do something that you don’t know at first what it’s going to be?

Steve Paxton. Well, first let me tell you that this whole talk was, as I think is pretty clear, an improvisation. I worried about it, I thought about it, I was impressed by the fact it was going to happen, and that I should prepare properly to meet people who had come to seriously listen, but I didn’t set it. It isn’t that I don’t care. I hope I have delivered something of substance. But I feel that those things that can spontaneously arise when we’re together— have more to do with a grace in the
room than with anything I am going to deliver.
So this question of improvisation: I think if you start to improvise, if you start to inquire about improvisation, you will end up as I did, asking yourself: “I would like to know what improvisation is.” Of course it is not possible to not ask this question,
but the minute you do that, you are set back for a good couple of years. Instead, I think what you need to do is to look to your life, to look for those

little moments when maybe you can observe yourself without noticing that you are, and notice that you are improvising all the time. You just are, you can’t stop it, it’s part of everything you do.
You simply don’t have enough consciousness power to manufacture all the events that you create. Consciousness is like the finger here [moving his index inside of his glass], thinking: hmm, what is this glass? What is this water? Hmm, interesting. Consciousness. Meanwhile, all of this [pointing to the rest of his body and around him], the rest of me, is the unconscious making the conditions for this moment to happen, and let this finger have its way in what it’s interested in.
So, improvisation: how do you do something that you don’t know you are about to do? I think we should eliminate any idea of freedom from this discussion. There is no such thing as freedom, there are always conditions. You may disagree, but
if we are dealing with conditions, it
 
means we are dealing with things we are not consciously  dictating.  Tis is what we are doing all the time: coping with  situations  reflexively, or unthinkingly, or else exploring. I haven’t decided yet what I am about to do and as I am beginning to do it, at some point I am going to make a
choice [extending his arms]: how did I
get here? That’s short enough that we could examine it.
But if we’d get into a long Jurij Konjar improvisation [to the Goldberg Variations], like last night... It starts of, and you get it for a while, and you can still track it, but then you get lost in the complexity of the doing, and it just goes on and on and you end up with something that is a mountain of detail, that you have somehow absorbed. For those of you who didn’t see it yesterday, let me just say that it was incredibly articulate and intricate. The body was coming apart and going together in so many different ways
so fast sometimes that you could not track, you could not see where the movement was going to emerge next.
 
What directions he was going to go into. A complexity. And that was an hour.
I have a friend—Lisa Nelson. She recently did a performance, [End Plays, with Hijack, in New York], in which the formula for the performance was: one person makes a proposal and then says when the proposal stops, then the other per- son makes a proposal and then says when it stops. Tree people were ultimately doing this, probably making a hundred and fifty proposals in an hour, and in that time, the whole stage was transformed. I mean literally transformed: the tables were upside down, the chairs were moved, the dancers had been everywhere
on the stage—and yet they were just going through this little formula.
Gradually, from that formula, it got to be an accumulation of detail, like evolution of life on Earth leading to something as particular and outrageous as [the Australian] Peacock spider—something that wholly transformed the situation. I felt like I

had taken a mushroom: my thought process was recognizably hallucinating - from a performance! 

I felt a little bit like that in the
performance last night as well. I
remember trying to keep hold of one
moment which was so beautiful, and
it kept changing, and then another
remarkable moment happened. What
had happened in between? Well, it
was too complex to know exactly, and I was straining to recover a reality that I had just lived through. It is quite a state. A place of ambiguity and lack of anchoring.
It works if you care. And Jurij made me care. I have danced that dance. I know that dance. I mean, not 
that dance—we could have a discussion here. That was his dance. But he knows my dance, so somehow it is our dance, to a degree. The question of authorship of this dance has now lost all rationality. We have been talking for four or five years now about how is he supposed to relate to the fact that he is doing a dance
I did, and yet he is doing his dance. How does he do it?

Such an interesting question: how does one decide...? I think it’s something about play. You know how it is, you decide, Oh let’s take the day of, and let’s go to the beach, or let’s go down to the park and run in the grass. I think it’s something about play, and it is a decision we can take. If you go to a studio and you play and you are serious enough to track what you are doing.

If you want to improvise, you have to be aware of the fact that everything is evolving, nothing is set—set meaning stopped, set meaning undeveloped-beyond, which  is not how life seems to work. And yet, it seems to be how culture works.
Culture is past-viewing. I mean, what else could be agreed upon? You can’t get a million people to agree on the future. But you can get most of them to agree on a certain version of the past, and that becomes the culture, and the artists of that culture are those who are remembered, and stuff  like this museum show of my work is produced. It’s the culture looking at itself and deciding what are the merits of something: Miró,
Gauguin, Picasso.
Improvisation. I think it is something you can train yourself to do, and look for the conditions with which you want to do it. And
we also have to recognize that there are some things for which planning and order and sequencing are better than improvisation for achieving. For instance: don’t improvise your taxes.

Anonymous: I am not really a dancer. I don’t have a dancing back- ground established. I wonder: is there a difference between movement and
and your work, especially Satisfyin Lover, teach you about dance and movement?

Steve Paxton: Well I can say this: I am perfectly willing to eliminate the word “dance” from language if
it would help clarify matters. I don’t think we can do without the word “movement.” But I think we could get along without the word “dance.”
How the word “dance” is useful is when people are trying to express the state or the change of state that ten years of study, and the focus on a certain aesthetic, produces in a body.
Maybe in my mind I call it a dance because of the perspective that I have. And if that’s a perspective that others don’t have, I am willing to give up the fight. All I want to do is to expand the extent of consciousness. I know that the brain has many priori- ties, and that our casual movement is not part of its high priorities. I know that with walking, especially if you are walking and thinking about what’s on your list, the mechanism of how you are getting yourself to where
you are going is not a priority. That’s what got me wondering: how does my body do it? How does it get me around? What is the support system to which I don’t ever give a holiday? Sure, sometimes I take it out to eat, give it a good dinner. But still, that unacknowledged thing that we have to support the “me” that you think you are, I think of that as a dance.
And if I think of that as a dance, I can think of the minutia of that small dance, of those tiniest little movements.

To read the full transcript of Steve’s talk, go to CQ Unbound on www.contactquarterly.com

For more information on the exhibition, you can obtain the catalogue, Steve Paxton: Drafting Interior Techniques, available on booksonthemove.eu. The exhibition will be travelling to Azkuna Centroa in Bilbao, Spain, from February
to May 2020.

Steve Paxton in front of John Cage’s anechoic chamber experiment at the exhibition Steve Paxton: Drafting Interior Techniques. Culturgest, Lisbon, Portugal, March 2019.



Gravity, by Steve Paxton, is available through Contact Quarterly/Contact Editions.

THE POLITICS OF MUTUALITY
a conversation with Steve Paxton at the kitchen table

with Nancy Stark Smith, for CQ
Mad Brook Farm, Vermont
September 7,2016
Steve Paxton: You were talking about debunking the 
myth—the so-called myth—that we gave it to the people...
N ancy Stark Sm ith: That you gave it to the people.
SP: ...Contact Improvisation. Well, we all gave it to the 
people. What exactly are you debunking?
NSS: I’m debunking the idea that in not going forward 
with the copyrighting of Contact Improvisation you were 
intentionally thinking, “No, I want to give this to the 
people.” My sense was that it was more a function of just 
not being interested in going the route of copyrighting and 
then having to check people and regulate it, and that you 
just didn’t want to be bothered with that stuff.
SP: Totally, but can’t you see that both can be true at 
once? Why debunk one and promote the other?

NSS: Well, maybe it’s to balance people’s assumptions.
The mythology of you/us giving Contact to the people has 
become such a flag for people. So, you made a decision—or 
you made an anti-decision, to not do something—and it 
became a powerful...decision. For a lot of people. And it 
continues to be a major one for many people.
SP: In the days when we were making that kind of really 
consequential decision—or non-decision, as you said—I 
was really interested in seeing how Contact Improvisation 
guided us into it. In other words, how collaboration and 
mutuality could be the form around the activity. And I’ve 
always claimed that all of us made it.
NSS: After the initial impetus...
SP: After the initial impetus and getting a grant and 
arranging housing and...making up the work. I mean, my 
job was to make up a way to teach it. I had felt the form in 
my own body, and I wanted to find a way to express it to 
you guys. And I think you had all felt it in your bodies. But 
anyway I couldn’t progress without collaboration. It’s a 
mutual form

NSS: It’s true.
SP: And I didn’t know any mutual forms! Besides games, 
you know. You can’t play tennis by yourself. So there’s 
that. But on the other hand, tennis is a big enough 
institution that you could play tennis anywhere you 
wanted to, pretty much.
NSS: Will play big tennis isn’t about developing the game
of tennis. What you were doing was developing a form.
SP: Training structures, form, all of that, and the politics
of mutuality. The politics of mutuality suggests collaboration; it doesn’t suggest monitoring the correctness of 
anybody’s behavior.
NSS: How did that feel for you, having been part of Judson 
and the art world and people making forms, and then 
finding yourself in this mutuality?
SP: I was always interested in how groups negotiated their 
situation. Dance companies are always doing that. I joined 
the Once Group [an avant-garde group of artists—musicians, filmmakers, visual artists, dancers—in Ann Arbor, 
Michigan, in the 1960s] for some activities. They were 
doing that. And we were doing that. The country was doing 
that at that time; that was a point at which there was a 
truly nationwide network of radical people who trusted 
each other and depended on each other for information 
and activities and company. Of radical music and... I don’t 
know if you were...
NSS: It was a little bit before my time...
SP: It was actually in your time. You were in it, but you 
didn’t know it, perhaps; you didn’t have the contrast.
My age difference meant that I had come of age, gotten 
awareness, in the ’40s and ’50s, in which America was a 
very different kind of culture. And then suddenly the ’60s, 
and the fact that a visible minority of hipness started to 
emerge and that it spread. Actually, it was just revulsion 
at the politics and the politicians of the time. The Vietnam 
War was abominable and the race situation was abominable and people were just confronting that. Young people 
were, mainly.
NSS: And sexuality and gender power issues.
SP: And the crap food. All of those things were issues.
But mainly I think it was a protest. And that’s what made 
it so delicious, to be part of that protest. It was really a 
countrywide confederation of... So in other words, another 
form was created. A mutuality was created. Based on 
music and politics and weed and age and philosophy 
and... It was just such a heightened state to be in it.

[interruption]
NSS: I wonder how you perceive this politics of mutuality 
and how it develops.
SP: First of all, all politics have an element of requiring 
more than one person. I don’t think you have a politics of 
yourself.
NSS: No, but there can be different kinds of power relationships between the players.
SP: Yeah. So the mutuality, the thing that’s inherent in the 
dance in the way that we defined it, was that there was to 
be a mutual listening to the movement. There was to be the 
creation of a third entity in the dance, which was the mutual 
movement paths and timing and all of that. That’s the way it 
was defined. So what we were doing wai essentially defining
power as not ap plicable. 

NSS : Sort of ci xumventing power relations by doing that?
SP: Yeah. Like 1 pick you up and throw you around wasn’t 
part of the scheme. It was: if it is mutually... happening, 
then you do en i up on my shoulder and I do...you know...
NSS : So how does anything happen if ndividuals aren’t 
deciding to do-.
SP : That’s the miracle. That's the phenomenon. That’s 
what we’re trying to find out. We’re trying to find out 
if anything happens if you have a really democratic 
situation.
NSS : And by “democratic,” what do you mean?
SP : One person, one vote.
NSS : One person, one vote, means that you only get your 
own vote. So 1 can’t control your behavior...I mean, I could 
try with my one vote.
SP: You can’t control. See, the word “ccntrol” is not part of 
the politics of mutuality. It’s more influence. [N: Mmm!] It’s 
more like invite. It still requires two people, but it’s not a 
question of lea ler; it’s a question of foLower. So if you have 
two people wh a are followers, what are they following is 
the question.
There’s the Small Dance; something is always happening there, so ah you have to do is get into the Small Dance. 
Then I started saying: see if you can find an alignment with 
the other persons Small Dance; see if you can follow the 
other person’s Small Dance—which is an initiation, but
it’s an initiation...it’s not leading the other 
person’s Small Dance toward you or any kind 
of concept like that. It’s following, and it’s in 
alignment with that whole thing of the two followers. That 
the two followers create a...leading something.

NSS : They’re trying to follow yours as you’re trying to
follow theirs.
SP : Yeah.
NSS : This approach uses—and this is brilliant, too—the 
Small Dance as a foundation for attention and for action 
in the Contact form.
SP : Yes. As far as I know, it’s the lowest place the 
consciousness will easily go.
NSS : The smallest unit of sensation that you could 
perceive?
SP: Yeah, and movement. It’s a reflexive movement 
that you can see. You can watch your heart beat. Here 
is the Small Dance holding you upright, balancing, and 
constantly changing, and—at least as I perceive it—the 
more you keep your awareness there, the finer and more 
global it becomes.
That’s all I’m saying. That’s all I’ve ever said. In 
between the two people a third thing arises. I didn’t call 
it Third Mind [as you referred to it earlier], because I don’t 
think it’s mind.
N S S : What do you think it is?
SP: I don’t know. It’s not for me to say. Although if I’m 
perceiving it, maybe I should name it. Call it...Margaret. 
[both laughing]

Find more of this conversation in CQ Unbound on CQ’s
website this spring.


STEVE PAXTON: "What is happening in standing is that you are looking at your reflexes hold you up. The standing is meant to be done in a very relaxed way, with the knees a little bit bent. You are not holding tight anywhere. Letting gravity take the limbs down, you are letting the spine rise against gravity. And then you just hang out there and you start to feel the event that is holding you upright, that is keeping you from falling. And it seems to be going at quite a rate. The speed of thinking for and in the body could be trained to that speed, which is the speed of the body supporting itself. As one of the fastest events that we can watch in ourselves, it’s not very fast. In terms of our movement making, there are events happening a couple of milliseconds long, so incredibly fast that thousands of them can happen before we get around to making the movement. But that’s not anything the consciousness can really find access to.” — FROM “Why Standing?” (CQ vol. 40.1, Winter/Spring 2015)


STEVE PAXTON: "Most of the work of touring a performance is tailoring the stage-scapes to work for the dances. Bored with this task, I started to examine my spatial assumptions. I could give you the details, but they added up to edges. Not “ space,” but -scapes: landscapes, stagescapes, coffeescape, skyscape. Where was space? I know there is no place where space does not exist. But where was it in my mind? All I could consciously dredge up were containers, including an image o f the dancer as a flexible container. The surface of this container is used to keep empty space out. Empty space? If I am imagining space as empty, the dancer could be considered not only in space but of space. The same space inside as out, a special condition of space. An occupied space, a -scape, but nevertheless with space throughout. The dancer is, after all, fundamentally in space as well as in -scapes. I once learned that the water molecule has the property of easily exchanging hydrogen atoms with other water molecules. This happens so frequently that when several molecules are touching, it is hard to say that the molecules retain their identities.... The interactivity of the atoms is interesting, but the atoms have to go— and, with them, the molecule. It is vast, but it isn't void. Ah, that's better. This idea seems closer to my notion of “ space” —empty of atoms and far too huge for me to imagine where the edge is, like the silence before music that has no shape or other affect until I think something into it. This is a concept of space undefined by edges, and it helps me get beyond the coffee cup, my skin, or my car as spatial definers. Of course, it also eliminates the idea of architecture, including the architecture of the theater. With the elimination of the physical theater, performance space becomes interesting to me once again.” — FROM “ Nothing comes to mind: mindscapes and the space; an amble” (CQ vol. 28.2, Summer/Fall 2003)


GIFTS: CAGE, CUNNINGHAM, AND THE MODERN 
DANCE MUTANTS by Steve Paxton The following is an excerpt from an interview with Steve,
conducted by Nathan Wagoner on June 13,2008, at CI36, an 
event celebrating the 36th anniversary of contact improvisation, 
at Juniata College, Huntingdon, Pennsylvania.

The influence of John Cage is undeniable. I have a kind 
of love-hate relationship with his reputation and his 
work. I love the philosophy of it and I love his aims. I knew 
him because we were both in the Cunningham Company 
together and we toured in his VW bus all around the United 
States. We once had an argument, I think it was our only 
substantial conversation. He took the position that man 
and nature were different things and I couldn’t understand 
that because I had assumed that man and nature were part 
of the same system.
So the influence is not entirely unrestrained adoration on 
my part, but I don’t think that’s important at all. Because 
what artists do for each other primarily is permissions. If 
an artist makes a structure or works with material or goes 
in a direction philosophically or artistically or technically 
that has not been explored before it just incites everybody 
else to go the extra mile in their work.
(continued)
I saw that modern dance had a number of reigning geniuses 
by the mid-20th century who were controlling the thought 
form. The thought form at that point—especially the early 
part of the 20th century—was dramatic storytelling via 
movement, which is an incredibly complex thing to do, but 
not uncommon because it’s popular. So it’s drawn out of 
the artists by the population, in a way. They want dance 
stories, they want to see that stuff physicalized. It’s cool. 
We’ve almost lost it in some ways. There’s not a great new 
bunch of stories coming out in movement.
Then came Merce Cunningham. And Merce and John shared 
a philosophy that was somehow to do with subduing the 
beast, as it were. Getting the human mind a little bit out of 
the equation because the human mind was controlling via 
narrative and emotionality. The whole rise of psychology 
through the early part of the 20th century, the interest in 
the human mind in that way, had become unquestioned.
It was just happening and everyone took it for granted that 
that’s how it had to be. Cage and Cunningham challenged 
that.
Having worked with them, I then felt I had to accomplish 
something else if I was to accomplish anything as useful as 
what they did.
There are two strains, especially in dance. Obviously there 
are people who continue to work the technique and to work 
the aesthetic and the repertoire, keep it alive past the lifespan 
of one person. That’s all to the good. And then there’s the 
other strain—the mutants. Graham was a mutant, Isadora 
was a mutant, Nijinsky was a mutant, Cunningham was a 
mutant. They don’t do what they were taught to do. They 
go on to restructure the whole thing. And with dance it’s 
very complex, because it really takes about 10 years to build a dance body, and the best ten years for that is when you’re 
quite young and your body is still growing. You can get a lot 
more bending out of a twig if you start bending it when it’s 
young than when it becomes older and stiffen So it’s a complex 
process to make several different aesthetic changes and 
moves in dance in one lifetime.
But Cunningham found a way to do it structurally by 
working with chance procedures. I fell in love with that 
company, as a barbarian coming out of Arizona to the East 
Coast of America to study dance. But I really fell in love 
with the company because they were in the first flush of 
success and they were so happy. In 1958 they had been 
invited to the American Dance Festival for the first time. 
They were there with Graham, Limon, Paul Taylor, Pearl 
Lang, Doris Humphrey, some of the powers that were—and 
still are, really.
I was working backstage at that time, so I got to see all the 
rehearsals and see them behave backstage. And this company 
just was having such a euphoric summer that I totally fell 
for them. But the work bothered me.
So I left that summer and went back to my NYC job and 
worried it in my mind for six months. Ok, it’s beautiful, 
ok I love them, but what? what IS it? WHAT is it? I can’t 
put my finger on it. I know what Graham is, I know what 
it’s doing, I know this drama and it’s classic and it’s a kind 
of a new technique and new movement and in some ways 
new structures in the actual composition, but what is this 
Cunningham stuff? I just don’t know what it is. It bothered 
me and bothered me.
And maybe one of the most bothering moments was a 
lecture John Cage and David Tudor performed there  that 
summer in a little room, with David not only playing the 
keys of the piano and inside the piano but crawling around 
underneath the piano while John read stories.
It just got me so wigged out. I have never had that experience 
since. Having these two men operating on my brain put me 
so far away from home. So far away from my Arizona 
hamburger-fed, Hollywood-fed mind. Suddenly here was 
Zen. Here was Zen and here was music that didn’t care if 
it moved me at all. In fact I had to move a little bit to IT if 
I was to find out anything about it. If I was going to listen 
properly, my mind had to change, my ears had to open. I 
had never been challenged like this by anything. Here is 
a different, rather colder aesthetic sea than you have ever 
swum in before. Gone are the pleasant body temperature 
gentle waves of Hollywood moving you. This is rougher 
stuff, and colder, and deeper, and weirder. So that was 
John Cage to me.
But also, that kind of permission: you can go to these 
places; you do not have to mean. You do not have to coddle 
or comfort. It’s simply not the law. There’s no reason that 
art has to be like that... Yes, it’s what we prefer, and yes it’s 
what we keep around. Arizona had an incredibly sentimental 
attitude toward aesthetics in general. But it doesn’t have 
to be that way. And what are we losing, if we aren’t always 
sentimental? Or let me put it this way: If we are always 
sentimental and if we are always kind of pandering to that 
side of ourselves, then what do we lose as observers of reality? 
We’ve turned reality into a Valentine: sad valentine, happy 
valentine. But whatever... It’s still not giving us a lot of 
information about our situation, about...what’s out there.
Transcription by Nancy Stark Smith 


“I think that we are doomed to have to look at what we do. 
And we're less [doomed] if we can look at it long enough 
to be able to derive interesting material out of it. So, stand 
around.” [S.P. from raw transcript] 

“The really dangerous thing is if you become self-conscious in 
the middle of a movement in which your safety depends on your 
reflexes and your partner's reflexes." [S.P. from raw transcript] 


“I hope in conversations that you all share what your vision is and 
how it all works; help inform the ongoing dance that we do.”
[S.P. from raw transcript] 


Why Standing?
STILL.moving Contact Shoptalk.
Steve Paxton talks about how the Stand relates 
to Stage Fright and Entrainment in Contact Improvisation edited by Karen Nelson 
Steve talked on two different afternoons during the seven-day 
Breitenbush Jam in March 2014 in Oregon. To accommodate 
newcomers, the second talk became a multilayered event, with 
Steve interrupting a recording of his first talk to make comments. 
Talk 1 is on the left; Talk 2 additional layers are on the right.
[K.N.]
Talk 1 There was a time when Contact Improvisation was not 
even really imaginable.
And there were a number of things that it needed to learn 
before we knew what it was. It needed the ability to fall 
and good reflexes. I recognized that the body was going 
to be twisting in space in various ways, maybe pretty fast.
I had done Aikido, so I had a lot of information about falling 
and rolling, which I taught. Also about reflexes and how 
they could be trained, the idea that a reflex is as habitual 
as other things are, and you can find a way to bend them 
to the needs that you have.
Talk 2 Maybe one reason Contact Improvisation wasn’t imaginable 
is because it’s hard to imagine what an improvisation 
might be before you do it.
I had passed through it with some of my improvising 
friends. I could just feel through the skin, This is 
something that I don’t do in my life.
I felt that the exercises had to somehow present to the 
students the final form that we would have before we 
knew what the form was. The dancing head-to-head 
exercise is a kind of conceptual version of it. You stand 
there until you feel the other person's small dance. You 
are trying to entrain with his or her reflexes.
Tom Giebink: You talked about the third thing...
Steve: If you’re following each other’s small dance, the 
third thing will arise.

Talk 1 I was a performing dancer, so it never occurred to me 
that we wouldn’t perform, and that brought up the idea 
of stage fright. You can have a couple of people who are 
dynamite dancers together and put them onstage in front 
of an audience and it all falls apart. Everything that makes 
them excellent to watch turns drab and self-conscious.
They try too hard; they do predictable things. In other words, 
the improvisation slowly but surely turns into a kind of 
make-believe of improvisation. I felt one thing that might 
possibly go wrong would be if something became unsafe 
because of how they changed in front of an audience.
The worst of stage fright is a kind of paralysis. If they were 
going to perform, how could we prepare? And if this form 
got as active as it seemed possible it was going to get, the 
reflexes had to be there to deal with twisting and turning in 
space. And so, standing seemed to be the answer.
Standing because it’s at the opposite extreme of the 
high activity; it’s unique instead of duet; it’s an incredibly 
human thing to do. It’s one of our basic archetypical 
events. Standing because it’s a chance to observe 
systems in the body.
Talk 2 Does that make sense? In those days, nobody had ever 
been hurt by Contact Improvisation at all, and I was really 
worried about how far we could trust ourselves. At dinner, 
Linda [Hunnicutt] said something about the prey and the 
predator. That struck me as an incredible thing to say 
about performance because predators stare at their prey. 
The gaze of the cheetah at the antelope is an incredible 
fixation, or the cat for the mouse. And the gaze of the 
audience at the dancer is also a similar situation. I think 
it’s really important for the dancer not to act like prey when 
performing, because I think it will draw out the predator in 
the human being.
The thing about the falsification when you perform did 
strike me as potentially dangerous—striving for effect, 
not going with the flow in the way that you do in warming 
up, where you are really going for the sensation. You don’t 
even consider that somebody is watching or not. I think it’s 
a chemical change when you go onstage. You can’t avoid 
it, and so I think it must be acknowledged. If I call this a 
performance instead of a talk, I think it might change my 
state.
 

Talk 1 What is happening in standing is that you are looking at 
your reflexes hold you up. The standing is meant to be 
done in a very relaxed way, with the knees a little bit bent. 
You are not holding tight anywhere. Letting gravity take the 
limbs down, you are letting the spine rise against gravity. 
And then you just hang out there and you start to feel the 
event that is holding you upright, that is keeping you from 
falling.
And it seems to be going at quite a rate. The speed of 
thinking for and in the body could be trained to that speed, 
which is the speed of the body supporting itself. As one 
of the fastest events that we can watch in ourselves, it’s 
not very fast. In terms of our movement making, there are 
events happening a couple of milliseconds long, so incredibly 
fast that thousands of them can happen before we get 
around to making the movement. But that’s not anything 
the consciousness can really find access to.
What we have is the senses and the really ordinary stuff— 
breath, the heartbeat and pulse. In the standing, we have 
the reflexes as easily observable events that the consciousness 
is not causing and can take a moment to wonder at.
The standing is happening all over the body, so you get a 
full body event that you are watching, and one that you are 
not seeking; it is just happening. You have a thing to focus 
the mind on.
Talk 2 Ping-Pong is a good example. As the skill increases, it 
turns into this very fast, skillful game, in which every detail 
of the paddle and its movement is critical. You’ve entrained 
the potential and the physics of the situation so that the 
whole thing could go at a blinding speed. In standing, you 
are there, and however fast your mind can go is what you 
will perceive of yourself standing, of the reflexes.
Your mind starts to pick up faster and faster aspects of 
it, because there is a lot of sensation going at a very high 
speed to hold you up. There are a lot of tiny little corrections 
so that you don’t go off balance. You start to pick up the 
subtleties and it becomes more nuanced and you get faster 
at perceiving and understanding what’s going on.
Looking at something so fast and yet so safe, training 
your brain to look for that level of your movement. The big 
movements of Contact are far slower than the movements 
of standing.


Talk 1 I saw some dancing this morning that was really more 
complex than anything I could have imagined in 72.
I was seeing moments that looked as though the senses 
can’t possibly be in charge of what’s happening, and the 
consciousness seems not to be in charge. It’s very amazing. 
It’s not surprising when I see work like that to know that 
in its viral way it has kind of spread around the world.
I think if anything of it would get lost, it’s the stand.
The seeking for the tiniest unit of time the consciousness 
can follow would stop. In the duet form, when you attune 
together, not with any ambition to get the dance started 
but really taking a moment to just connect—20 minutes 
has always seemed to me a decent amount of time—there 
could be a dance of such feathery lightness and such 
absolute security, absolutely beautiful.
Talk 2 Alito Alessi: Dorothee [Daester] and Mark [Young] yesterday 
got dancing so fast that she took off like a helicopter from 
his shoulders. And then he dove under her, to save her 
from crashing on the floor.
Steve: Ahhh, wish I’d seen that. Were you aware?
Dorothee: I remember I was aware that we kind of went the 
normal speed but then it just went faster, and I was like, 
okay let’s go, and then it went fast and then I went on the 
floor.
Mark: I was aware of losing control when she left, but then 
what to do, like slow down the fall...but neither of us got a 
bruise.
Steve: Tom talked about leaning into the fall in skiing, and 
into the Aikido roll, where you are arcing into gravity; if 
you can stay with the energy as it evolves into whatever 
happens between you two, then amazing things happen.
You don’t get a bruise.
Tom: It was really quite extraordinarily beautiful to watch 
from where I saw it.
Dorothee: Yah, I never felt uncontrolled or unsafe. I was not 
conscious of the down into the floor.
Steve: Well, thank you for survivingAnyway, that’s why standing—because of staying, riding 
those tiny little moments. And I don’t know if it works 
or not. I mean, I am not saying that this is a one-to-one 
relationship with Dorothee and Mark surviving what 
happened. But that’s what it was intended for. That's 
what I hoped would happen. It’s almost like, why do we 
meditate? There is so much to do, how dare we take time 
to just sit. It’s about the extremes of experience.

Contact Improvisation creator Steve Paxton began frequenting the trailblazing Breitenbush Jam in Oregon as a participant during the mid-'80s. 
Invited numerous times over the decades by Jam cofounders Alito Alessi 
and Karen Nelson to teach a bit, he often agreed. The always inventive 
results, documented in CQ, have influenced the deep practice tone of 
the Jam along with the dedicated participants and the Jam's extraordinary 
focus that Joint Forces Dance Company's Alessi and Sara Zoibrod 
steward as they produce the event forward. [K.N.]
Transcription and proofreading help by Abbi Jaffe and Sara Zoibrod; 
recording support by Tom Giebink.
To contact Karen: heartgreen@yahoo.com, www.explomov.weebly.com.
STILL MOVING addresses the current thinking, 
perception, and practice of Contact Improvisation 
—i.e., Contact Shoptalk.
Please participate by sending your writings 
and your responses to:
submissions@contactquarterly.com or by snail mail.
 
Excerpts from Steve Paxton's Talk at CI36

Friday, June 13, 2008 
Rosenberger Aud itorium 
Juniata College 
Huntingdon, PA 

(Look for the transcript of Steve’s talk in webtexts" on CQs website.)

It's been 36 long years ... 

I was very moved last night in our frivolity, not at how many we were, not at the depth of some  of the connections to  contact, not at the sweetness of the mood, but the feeling-something I saw last night-about...the shallowness of the way we know each other, which is intimate and deep physically, though we don't sometimes know each other's stories in any real detail. So there's a shallowness and yet an intimacy and depth of relationship through reflexes and skin and touch, a way that we do trust each other so completely, instinctually, reflexively....
It's like a way of socializing that I don't see very much  of. Maybe people who do incredible teamwork get to this place. It feels very good, and it has always been there.
John Faichney, are you here? [Steve gets of/ the stage, goes into the audience, and sits next to John.}
SP: How did we meet?
JF: I was a student at Oberlin College Brenda Way was the dance teacher there, and she invited the Grand Union to come for a residency.
SP: And I was in the Grand Union.
The residency was in January, and the Grand Union-about nine  people  at that  point-showed  up  on  campus, and in three weeks, every member of the Grand Union taught a lot of classes and we did three separate performances. There were a lot of men taking this thing, so I did a men's class. My idea of teaching young men was  to  smash them together the way they smash small particles toge1her in atomic research ... and came up with a piece called Magnesium.
JF: Not to digress too far from this, but
I wanted to observe that you taught ballet in this class.
SP: Did I?
JF: You taught a lot of tendus and plies and things like that.
SP: We have to give our homage to the classics of course, but then I did smash you together. And I  made  them  crash in the air and I made them fall down in
heaps-this is called Magnesium and you can still see it on video. There were maybe a dozen people... the concept is so complex with that many people....
So in my next attempt I went to duets, and that became the study of contact.
Question: What was the motivation to have people slam into each other like that?
I had been working on a solo whose vague premise was, Can I throw myself off the earth and not care what happens. That was my question, my research. You can imagine getting a grant for that-but sometimes we have to do things that are not related. to The grant structure.
I had realized that it was vaguely possible, and 1 wanted to see if it was possible to teach what I had gotten to. So, John and his classmates were my attempt to teach it. I found it an incredible learning experience to teach them, because I had  to  watch  them like hawks to make sure  they  were safe, and at the same time expose them to the  maximum  danger  to  see what the body would actually do. So we started crashing into each other softly, with a concept of yielding in the crash-the kind  of stuff  you  would  do if you actually wanted your cast to survive the performance-how to  land and roll and how to expand their peripheral vision so that they  were aware of what was happening around them. The  challenge  built  the course, as it were, and how to survive what we were trying to do ended up being
 
contact improvisation. Of course, we don't know if there is an equally large or even larger number of people who didn'1 survive contact improvisation­ you know, the winners write the history. My reeling was that human beings were  strangely  overprotected-a  big fat American culture gelling ever more soft. If you lived through the '50s you saw it starling, the encroachment of an attitude of satisfaction and comfort being very important. Lt happens after wars	After you've been through that
shit, it's natural-you want to put it behind you. And what was put in front of us was comfort, advertising, cars, movies, and TV, which managed to stop the thinking of a nation in its tracks, as far as I can see.
I was always interested in dance, but I was also a gymnast. I realize, retroactively, that dance-art dance, as we think of it-is mostly a matter of eliminating things from physical possibilities. Why was I giving a barre to a group of young men who never remotely would be ballet dancers? Because exercise have something­ the barre, the tendues, in particular all the legwork-have something  that you don't get very many places, a kind of extension, or reaching, going to the limit of your leverage and then operating there. Once you get into that kind of leverage, you're playing with a very different physics from the physics that you normally play with. So that seems to me a very interesting premise. If you look at Egyptian dancing or the hula, for instance, you don't see that premise

at all. Ballet operates in this realm of projection. I call it projection rather than extension-projecting outwards, around-very long on the spine, very high on the foot, the leaving-the-earth syndrome done gracefully. This eliminates a lot of possibilities, if you focus just on projection. Most dance forms are built on excluding possibilities.
Going toward inclusion was my aim. Before I did this, I did ten year of walking dances.
Walking. [Steve walks across the stage.] I'm putting this on stage deliberately because l want to frame it and let you sec it in all its dumbness. Herc it is-isolated, self-conscious, academically pretentious.,. It has a certain lumpen quality that I think is a real barrier to understanding  or  opening up aesthetic properties for the audience. So that was my study for ten years. Also standing and sitting, to give myself some compositional options.
The atmosphere in those days­ mid-twentieth century-modem dance was so ripe and dramatic and powerful. There were a number of great artists who had made the journey from a pedestrian body and the dance techniques that they were taught into their own forms. By midcentury, it was well established that you could take a body and work it and it could eventually come up with a new form of moving that had its own exclusivities, its own essences, and its own purifications. You got rid of all the ordinary stuff, am] suddenly you started getting a different way of moving. Our ordinary movement has so many little micro-
 
movements of potential in all directions. We're like a big, overly cooked soup of potential, and classes are a way of straining that soup and getting down
to just the carrots or just the rutabagas and making something of that. That's composition, right7
Contact improvisation   started with seventeen people. I had been working by my elf, but of course how much of contact could you invent by yourself?
In Grand Union, I was about thirty years old, and my colleagues wen· thirty or a little bit older, and I was · afraid I would hurt them if I taught them contact. I thought it should be people whose skeletons were still more flexible, so that meant people in their twenties and people who were used to falling down and whose bones could take it, because I didn’t know how dangerous it might be. I just wasn't sure. Would people survive freeform, unstructured, sometimes really fast. sometimes disorienting movement? I didn't see why not, theoretically, but..
People	have	long	survived wrestling and fighting, and they have survived the sports of the day. On the other hand, they weren't trying to   invent the sport as a full-fledged thing. If you have decades and decades to  slowly develop, then you get one kind  of product, and if you try to do it in  three weeks, you miss a lot of the  connections and communications that make it safer.
Football is a rough sport. It's disorienting if you are tackled and go flying

and get landed on, hut most of the time you can control your orientation and keep everything organized. But what if somebody else is slightly controlling your   orientation?   What   would   the
senses do  then? That  was one of my
questions. Could the senses be improved? Could people get past dizziness, disorientation? In   those three weeks, I was studying the guys to see at what point they were starting to look like they might be a danger to themselves or somebody else. Can one collide without a sense of irritation or anger? Can you take it just as a physical possibility?
I had come from a study of John
Cage forms in my first dance composition classes, leading into the Judson Church Dance Theater. That was '62. We were looking at structures that cause the body to adapt in a new way to the conditions and turn out new kinds of movement. Because of this way in-as opposed to doing it all at the barre and through exercise with very lit1le exploration-this approach was more about how to invite the body into conditions that would create a new way to move: a new relationship of the body to gravity, to the floor, to itself, to other bodies.
I regard the "small dance as the reflexes that adjust everything to keep you  upright. The event is so normal, so frequent, and so small that we ignore it. As a generality. the senses pick up new material, unusual stuff­ small  or  large-within  their  range. The average, normal, lumpen quality of the walking, for instance, is really a harrier to understanding. When you can look at something and say, "Ob, that's just old stuff; that's just old walking." or "That's just old whatever," it means your brain has stopped asking questions. There's absolutely nothing that should go unquestioned or that could be questioned without deriving material from it.
Those of you who have had Material for the Spine know that I have

taken this all into a system. Even in a step you can feel the helix happening between the heel and the shoulder and the body rotating for  the  step,  the swing of the arm becoming the spiral. So you have this helix.
You asked me earlier  what  turn me on. What  turns me on is trying to find out what’s going on  and then being aghast that we didn’t know it already, or didn't sense it,  or  didn't intuit it. What stops the intuition? What makes us not see or feel the helix happening when we walk?
How to address the simple things. They're so simple. The front of the body versus the hack of the body. Nobody ever addressed that in a dance class. It's so obvious that it doesn't need to be addressed. This is the kind of thing that really turns me on. The foot hitting the floor, how does it do it? How does the weight get transferred? How does the body last as long as it does if it is used correctly? Amazing questions. The mind/body relationship, endless fluctuating fascinations.
Roger Neece: You were at Oberlin working on Magnesium and beginning the exploration into Contact. And now we're hearing about your current work with Material for the Spine. I'd like to see you fill in some of the intervening events that supported that arc.
I would like to see me do that too, Roger. I should have been keeping better notes, I suppose.
It's studio stuff. It's not stuff for talks, and it’s not stuff for writing. It is being in the studio and doing it and doing it and doing it. And doing it with different people so you don't fall too habitually into a relationship that turns finally into a kind of night-club act of moves... because it seems to me that there's a very natural flow from improvisation right into structure. It's really hard to keep the improvisation going. You almost immediately start to know stuff about  what  you're  doing and then you start to control what you know and then suddenly you're verging

on choreographic form, which is cool. Bui what if you're interested in studying improvisation, which  is  what  we do when we're really surprised at where we are-and  if conditions change suddenly, it's how we survive. Conditions normally don't change that fast, and the culture and all of us do as much as we can to keep  conditions from changing too radically, but in fact the microview shows you that it's evolving all the time, and  furthermore all of it is, all at  once, changing. So I like to have that as the reality with which I work.
Asaf Bachrach: A lot of your work, also work I've seen of yours from the '60s, is about the study of composition­ movement in stillness and in many other ways in relation to space. How do you think of the relation between the study of composition and composition? Do you think for you it is one and the same thing?
You've just blown my mind. What do l think of the... relation... between the study of composition and  composition? This is somebody who has  a mind that has both in and out of the moment in the same question.
Composition is a way to avoid improvising, and the study of composition is: you improvise to study composition. If you need an example
 
of new compositions, you have to improvise to get there. I think when things become institutionalized, they absolutely lose the essence- that we're talking about. I think to recognize contact improvisation as a therapy. to enter that whole chain of  events, would he, in fact, to  have to  describe it, to bring it into words, and to get it generally agreed as to what we're talking about-in  other words, to have it leave the improvisational realm and become composed, something for which you could get a paper from an institution. I know that other kinds of slippery and ephemeral forms have­ done this, but look at what we've got without it. Look at this amazing. amorphous. "who cares," kind of... By and large, aside from keeping your body together and performing and dancing, we don't have- to do very much to keep this together.  That 'seems really strong... as strong as the pyramids. Somehow we've got this human pyramid thing going, where the solidity of the structure will ensure-has already   ensured-far greater life than we ever envisioned for it. Nobody foresaw this, although it became pretty obvious the- way it was going early on.
Transcribed by Josephina Fredericks and Kelley Mariani

[top] "Why was I giving a barre to a group of young men who never remotely would be ballet dancers? Because exercises have something...a kind of extension, or reaching,
going lo the limit of your leverage and then operating there." Steve Paxton, during his talk at Cl36, June 13, 2008.

[bottom] "This is the kind of thing that really turns me on. The loot hitting the floor, how does it do it?" Steve Paxton, Cl36 talk.
The image: Charlie Morrissey, from below;
a still from the new DVD-ROM. Steve Paxton: Material for the Spine, a movement study, by Contredanse, available through CQ. Images tram the DVD were projected during Steve's talk at Cl36.


PAXTON'S FIRESIDE CHAT PAXTON'S FIRESIDE CHAT 
excerpts from Steve Paxton's Fireside Chat at CI25 
June 4, 1997 
Oberlin College, Oberlin, OH 

For Steve Paxton’s scheduled "Fireside Chat" at CI25-the 25th birthday celebration of Contact improvisation in 1997 at Oberlin College--Anne Aronov and a few other CI25 curators , created a fanciful fireside decor-an overstuffed leather chair in front of a faux brick fireplace, painted on cardboard. Subverting expectations, Steve began his talk behind the eager audience. Below are a few small excerpts from his talk, connecting us now-with CI36 upon us-to the CI25 celebration eleven years ago and some of Steve’s musings about Contact at that time, [Eds] 
Transcribed from tape by Karen Schaffman vis video from Karen Nelson 
[above] Steve Paxton addressing the group at Cl25, June 1997, Oberlin College, Oberlin, Ohio. 

You're here to see the founder of Cl talk, aren't you? 
(ha, ha, ha) And in a way, for the last 25 years,
that chair has been empty, because at the beginning il was clear that although I was organizing material and other people were learning material, the material itself-the contact between two people, which was the subject of this -was going to be invented in partnership .. so I would just like to wish you all Happy Birthday.
I am going to go sit in that chair, just because people have been kind enough to provide it. 
I think that it's important for us to remember that the form is a little thing. It is not intellectual, it is not academic it is not on paper it only exists when two people do it (or three or four). It’s like a song; you can say that music exists on paper or on disc, but in fact II only lives when ii is sung, and can only be done by living persons . 
. .. I think our problem is that Contact is a lot of fun and that mindless contacting is quite possible I think the classes that you've been taking here and other ways that you find to keep it mindful, will keep it safe. New people come -this is not set and fixed; it's a fluid thing-and they're going to want to know the craft. And it's an improvisational situation; and maybe we have been a hit ambiguous about what the craft of learning it and doing it is. I mean, ii certainly isn't written down very clearly; you don't know what you're getting into. But the mindfulness is our ally, and dancing with each other 1s too .... Part of that mindful ness is Contact Quarterly, which I think we can all be proud of. .. It helps us stay mindful. It brings new versions of mindfulness to us. 
We do something that 1s still wild. I think. This isn't one of the tame forms. It has no meter, so you can't capture us through time. Its unpredictable You can't quite notate it.. .. What we do is not quite logical, rational enough, at this point, to capture and put into a bin someplace. Movement forms have always been noted for being evanescent. Dance is born and dying in the same moment. .. Mmm .. romantic thought. 


Then you look at tai chi-here's a movement form that’s approximately as old as the pyramids I’m sure its changed over time. Now we do a shorter form .... But there's something quite stable about movement forms. I mean, these twenty-five years suggest to me, even though it changes with every two people that do it, that overall there's something incredibly stable about movement forms. We've been trying to define ourselves over these last years ... a trying to quickly catch ourselves being wild kind of thing; feel our academic prowess, whatever it is when we're not thinking. I don't think it is reasonable and capturable, but it's do-able, and I think it's stable. We've been called a community by some I'm not sure. "Community" -it's just another word that tries to capture something.

But something very curious has happened. I hope that however far physically this dance form spreads. that mindfulness spreads with it, and that goodwill spreads with it. And that you will take this back to your friends who dance and keep reminding each other of this. Reminding each other to stay alert to this stuff we do. 
To keep it clean and safe and fun. Because with those 
few simple kinds of awareness. I think it will be a quite useful form. Seems to have been. 

"What's at stake [in the Contact networkl 
actually is very little. You know, nothing 
particular to gain that is immediately 
apparent by being part of this network, 
nothing particularly to lose if you decide 
to stop, and you can rejoin again without 
any kind of heavy commitment. To me 
that is refreshing. 

There's no commodity. It's almost 
like you're following your own mind-if 
you're slightly interested, very interested, or 
interested, or on up that scale, then it's easy 
to be in it. If you're not interested, very 
uninterested, or bored or whatever, then 
you're not a part of it, probably, and that's 
about the scale of it. It only survives 
through actual interest; that's the energy 
that's maintaining it." 

Steve Paxton 

Contact at 10th & 2nd 

Symposium, 1983 

[reprinted from CQ 16:2, S/S 91] 

DARTINGTON MARCH:


Images. Spent time with Mary Fulkerson, teaching and taking classes. Several of our number [contacters1 have studied with Mary, and she has spent time in Contact, though she prefers her own work as a basis from which to teach. However, the continuing juxtaposition of her Anatomical Release work and Contact has provoked a headful of thought; her students in Eng. land and those from Rochester, N.Y. take to Contact with remarkable ease compared to other groups in the U.S.

This ease of assimilation is of interest. While the students are lying down, crawling, walking or running, Mary Fulkerson speaks ritually, encouraging greater sensitivity to alignment and efficient patterns in the body. The manner of presentation tends to by-pass the thought of the listener.
The listener is preoccupied with moving or relaxing at the time, and the ritualization has a lulling effect, soothing in tone and timing. The images she provides are simplified anatomical 'cartoons' of functioning anatomy as opposed to intellectual or visual anatomy. These images describe sen­ sations - their location in the body and possible directions in which they might move.

The students then assimilate material directly from their own sensations, culled from releasing unnecessary tension, work, strain.

Mary Fulkerson finds a rare balance of authority and humility which gives fundamental weight to her voice without usurping the motivation of the student and avoiding their rebellion or fascination. Nor does her voice question the integrity of the sensations unique to each student.
Their confidence in the process gathers momentum with the growth of awareness of the functional
. anatomy, and soon, non-anatomical images can be simply physicalized. Earlier in the process however, before these channels become clear, an illogical image would more likely provoke bewild· erment, scorn, or intellectual interest, than movement.

The parallel is with the Contact 'stand': The mind of the listener is encouraged to become a receiving instrument. Fulkerson's images further provide guidance to sensations which improve function. The stand in Contact isused to remove the habitual masking of the forces-that-be by relaxing the listener into states of mind where time, gravity, mass and inertia are apparent, where balance is seen as subtle movement, and social expectations in partnering can be dropped; it is possible to talk directly to the body, and for the listener to listen directly with the body. Each person can hone and direct real physical sensations into their own most direct & efficient dance.

As Mary Fulkerson is currently presenting her work at Dartington College (Devon, England) it is used as a first step providing the student with a map into private anatomical sensations and improvements. Great care has been given to the anatomical propriety of the images, because in this work, the idea each person's mind holds of their body is seen as crucial to the awareness each develops.

 
Beyond Mary Fulkerson's work there is a question for the student at Dartington. What to do with the vocabulary they have sensed and the improvements they find in their use of the body? Many possibilities exist, and one path, that of Contact, seems quite compatible; moving from the interior of one's functioning anatomy, to functioning with another. I hope in the coming years more of us have an opportunity to sample this connection.


STEVE PAXTON



Nothing comes to mind mindscapes and the space; an amble by Steve Paxton 
I must have been dealing with issues of space during every moment of my life – a process fo discovery beginning prior to birth and evidently not yet over. Certainly it was ever an issue in dancing, and without very much conscious support on my part, my senses and body coped with what space was given. 
Perception of-scape was a very early stage, probably sometime before my own separation from my mother (one of the people in my early environment). I assume she was my first perception. It is probably important for children to find their mother and recognize her among all the other people whose faces come into view in the -scape. Shape, volor, texture. Those were the perceptions. Voice, smell, food. Mother, a mixed-media experience. The -scape was all that was not mother. 
-Scapes are containers for out mental focus. 
I noticed a sensory phase-shift 25 years later, while I was practicing t’ai chi, and it is too simple for words. I had a deep physical realization of the difference between the front and back of my body. 
After such a shift, it is natural to wonder what one has shifted from. Nothing had been there at all. Maybe mental pictures of the outside of myself existed, but nothing for front and back of the inside. I had identified an inner-scape.
Later, I achieved a deep sense of the right and left sides. 
Top/bottom has proved more elusive. 
Where all these meet is the center of mass. I work with that much of the time. 
Bear with me: I know this level of perception sounds redundant, because I must have already known these things. 
However, I remember being taught which hand was which by adults, and I received from adults the concept that I was symmetrical. My definition of what I was came in part from other people, a received self-image. It was not until I was studying the body years later that my own, sensory, defition of what I was emerged to my consciousness. 
Noticing that momnt when this shift occurred gave me mcuch to thing about. I accepted that some shifts are toward greater simplicity rather than to higher levels of abstraction. It is as though we tend to exist in or maintain a particular level of complexity that works for us. We do not seek what we cannot yet know, and what could be more natural? If knowledge is a raft, it is floating on a seascape of ignorance. 
Most of the work of touring a performance is tailoring the stagescape to work for the dances. Bored with this task, I started to examine my spatial assumptions. 
I could give you the details, but they added up to edges. Not “space,” but – scapes: landscapes, stagescapes, coffeescape, skyscape. Where was space? I know there is no place where space does not exist. But where was it in my mind? 
All I could consciously dredge up were container, including an image of the dancer as a flexible container. The surface of this container is used to keep empty space out. 
Empty space? If I am imagining space as empty, the dancer could be considered not only in space but of space. The same space inside as out, a special condition of space. An cooupied space a -scape, but nevertheless with space throughout. The dancer is, after all, fundamentally in space as well as in -scapes. 
We are clearly container, although when I remember that our shape is a sort of complicated, thick-walled tube, I see that we do carry some outside space within us, and that that space is easily connected to the outside -scape. 
For instance, our lungs. The inner linings are seamlessly connected to the skin of our face, and identification of inside or outside is all about surface integrity. And until it moves through the membranous linings into our blood the air in our lings is still outside the body. The water in our blood is inside the body. 
I once learned that the water molecule has the property of easily exchanging hydrogen atoms with other water molecules. This happens so frequently that when several molecules are touching, it is hard to say that the molecules retain their identities. It is more like any number of H2O molecules create one much larger molecule… the oceans are one huge molecule. When we swim in the ocean molecule, our own water (which constitutes 70% of us) does not join atoms with the sea. I imagine our 70% forms a large molecule of itself in our bodies. 
The interactivity of the atoms is interesting, but the atoms have to go­ and, with them, the molecule. It is vast but it isn't void. Ah, that's better. This idea seems closer to my notion of "space'-empty of atoms and far too huge for me to imagine where the edge is, like the silence before music that has no shape or other affect until l think something into it.
This is a concept of space undefined by edges, and it helps me get beyond the coffee cup, my skin, or my car as spatial definers. Of course, it also eliminates the idea of architecture, including the architecture of the theater.
With the elimination of the physical theater, performance space becomes interesting to me once again.
The space the audience faces in a theater is actually a flexible frame or edge, a flexibility we performers are very aware of because we penetrate its sides with entrances and exits. From the audience’s point of view, it is a -scape. From the sides, we know the space beyond the -scape. Thinking outside the box of the theatrical architecture, we see how the -scape is in the space.

Performance space seems to be a convention that we can apply to any container. It exists only at specified time and is created by a contract between the performer, and the audience, neither of whom would be there without the other. It is, artificial and we
expect it to produce artificial works. Artificial movement. Artificial realities. That is, artscapes.
For the audience, each of whom has left behind their normal -scapes to join this contract, the dancer becomes a
-scape for the duration, as a container of their foci.

For the dancer, matters are more complex. The dancer, D, is about to enter a -scape filled with expectations. Members of the audience each expect something to occur in their common -scape.
D has an intention, hut whatever it might be, D is stepping into a blizzard of notions, where intention meets the expectations. Will it be worthwhile for each audient rushing from work to get some food, dress, see to the children, travel to the theater, purchase tickets, and wait for the curtain to go up?
An hour of dance may cost each audient as much as five hours with all travel and arrangements.
Multiply this by the number of expectations of the audients, one per person for let's say 1,000 people, and it appears that the stage is thick with as much as 5,000 hours of anticipation from the audience.
D would have 10 dance eight hours
a day for just over two years to provide a matching man-hour investment.
Entering such a space causes, various hormonal changes, similar to the response that can be obtained by, walking away from the campfire into a dark night. 
Under the conditions, D is going to attempt to present a dance.
Once begun, D will appear in the
space as, an object, a container of dance.
But being the focus of attention means experiencing a point of view not shared with the crowd. The lights, for instance, usually discreetly hidden from the eyes of the audience, arc all directed at D. Because D is moving, the lights may seem to whirl. The music for D is subject to the Doppler effect, because D's ears are moving relative to the sound source. What the audience hears is, for D, psychedelicized.

Perhaps it is time to look at the contract of performance again. It seems, to be an arrangement intended to facilitate some sort of sensorial exchange. By using vision, the audience is able
to "ride" the physical situation of the dancer. This is empathy, and also synesthesia.
Whatever the dancer's intention,
performance -scape is	fraught with perceptual difficulties.	 In delivering any personal message, a certain amount of focus and cool is required. For instance, hysteria and disorientation are usually not helpful. The dancer needs training like an astronaut to go cooly into this space and do his dance.
The dancer creates, his offering in a studio, and it is normal to give performances on a tour. It is not unheard of for each stage to be different proportions. It is not unusual to encounter everything from opera stages to lecture halls. 
Even top-of-the-line choreographers have a difficulty. Balanchine had the use of a permanent theater, unusual in America. However City Center Theater was not built for dance, and the sight lines available to the whole audience created an oblique triangle for his choreographic consideration. 
Cunningham Dance Company worked in a 35-foot-long rectangular studio during the 1960s. Work, created there were performed at least once on a lecture stage, which was a small (28; x 14’) space, in which the 14’ dimension was the deepest part of a curve becoming only 7’ at the wings, which in fact were not wings of a stage but stair steps down the platform. 
Not to seem ungrateful for the opportunity to present dance to an audience, but in any consideration of an art that is so completely involved with space, is it realistic to act as if proportions were not intrinsic to a performance -scape? It is not possible to say that, in fact, no one sees the dance intended? Painters and sculptors do not expect their works to be warped for the showing, and writes may publish many copies of their work and expect each to be the same as the others. It was be reasonable, if utopian, to expect that the dance could retain its proportions as well; of course it is asking a lot for duplicate theaters to be built for the touring artists. Here is the difference. Dances are neither objects that retain their proportions nor replications. Dancers are like surfers and ply the -scape they are given. 
The contract between the audience and dancer is rather skimpy. Name, time, place. All the rest is understood…? No. The rest, the sensorial insides and outsides, the artifice of the dance, the perception of the dancer is taken for granted and not much examined, even when it is much appreciated. 
Because the situation is so relative, delicate, and unspecified understanding it relies more on general primal instincts than explicit codes. It would be possible to speculate that when we enter the theater, we take leave of our senses as we know them and regain them as they are. 


The History and Future of Dance Improvisation by Steve Paxton 


A game called "Whispers'': One person whispers a
sentence to another, who passes what they have
heard on down a line of people. When the last person reports
to the group what they have heard, it is usually distorted. Often
it makes no sense at all - it is only a sequence of sounds.
This is, in general, my view of History, even knowing that
research into original sources may result in a version with fewer
interpretations between the original event and the reader.
Prior to the beginning of the History, the original movements
are in a parallel sensorial dimension to that of words, or
of photographs. Before message decay can begin, the event
undergoes a translation from human movement to language.
Each medium employs the senses in their own special ways, and
to change from one medium to another is a radical alteration
of the senses.
Improvisation History has two strikes against it as rt starts.
For instance, for most of my life I was told that Isadora Duncan
improvised. About three years ago, I read that she herself
said she did not improvise. On the other hand. Balanchine
was never reported to improvise; yet at about the same time.
I read that when working with Suzanne Farrell, he told her to
do so- “You know what I like.”
When I began dance studies in the 1950s. I saw no
examples of improvised performances. During the 1960s in
New York, a few people began to perform improvisationally.
though the audiences were sometimes not given this information.
During the 1970s. my colleagues and I began to describe
our dancemaking as improvisational. We immediately discovered
that grants to support dance existed only for choreography.
Perhaps this explains why the word “improvisation” was largely
absent from the eye of the public.
In the early 1970s, I became interested in the word itself; what exactly did it mean? Usually, I discovered, it means something made “from the moment,” and because no moment is the same as the next, we would not expect to see the same improvisation again. When we describe a dance as improvised, this is one of the meaning we have transmitted. We cannot go and see “it” again. It existed in one movement, only. 
Choreography s defined as “dance-writing.” It suggests that just as writing takes the word out of the immediate flow of through or speech to preserve it for the future, so dance-writing suggests we can go and see the same dance again. 
We do not need to go into whether this is really possible; that is, we accept that the choreographed dance will actually be different each time we see it. The choreography is susceptible to conditions. We struggle against susceptibility, as if to deny beloved choreography the proves of entropy. Choreography relies on the turning people into instruments who will behave the same way each performance, and we remark on the differences. 
Improvisation supposes the instrument will behave differently each time, and we tend to remark on the similarities. 
During the past 10 years, interest in improvisation has intensified. One explanation is that governments in various countries have suddenly changed from regimes which control their populations and expect them to behave the same way (a choregraphed-from-above work force, for example), into regimes which expect the population to participate in making the choreography (an improvising work force). Examples in the arts are thought to be useful to demonstrate the new forms to the public. 
Another explanation occurs to me. The word “chaos” used to mean the opposite of order, of reason, and of sanity. Since the recent popularity of chaos theory chaos has been rationalized, seen to have structure, and proves to be metaphoric of sensitivity rather than insanity. It has been upgraded. It is invited to the dinner table, and shows up at dance performances. 
In Europe during the past four years I have participated in about twenty gathering of dancers brought together to improvise in an open format with little preparation, four of which I thought of high quality, and only a few of which were, in my opinion, bad. This suggests to me that there are a number of European dancers now who comprehend how to perform improvisation successfully – in their terms, in the audience’s terms, and in my terms. 
I should say that this small but growing development is populated by gifted technicians and choreographers who seem to me very right and aware. They clearly understand that instantaneous composition is complex and even theatrically 
dangerous. That is, bad dance improvisation is a terrible experience for all involved, especially the audience who goes to some time and expense to attend. It is best if they are not disappointed – but there are no guarantees. We are all in it together. It is a curious phenomenon. 
The rewards, when the performance is good, seem to be the pleasures of unique shared experience of creation, with the feeling one has been at the right place at the critical moment. Simply said, everyone has been fortunate – dancers and audience alike. We have been blessed. So the stakes are rather high. 
Now about the future of improvisation. Realistically, it seems obvious that the situation is to complex to predict. It is like the weather, and perhaps chaos theory is closest to describing how it will all proceed. However the weather is a vast external complex. As well, we might need to imagine weather systems within each dancer. We must conceive of a system of systems in each collaborative performance. Is this too complex to grasp? Perhaps in detail. Certain broad patterns may be perceived if we study long enough- that is, if our dance documentation becomes good enough to provide material to examine. 
Dance history has recently gotten much better. During this past century, dance has changed from a pre-literate to a literate art. We have achieved at least two excellent movement notations, from Labam and Eshkol-Wachmann. Technology has provided a number of recording devices. There are many mre people involved in danc now. And there are more kinds of dance available for stufy at this moment than ever before in knwowable human history. 
Along with the art dance, there is a proliferation of other movement systems available to study, both traditional and recent. For instance, the yogas, the martial arts, the folk dances. Newly developing include Alexander technique, Feldenkris, and Body/Mind Centering of Bonnie Bainbridge Cohen. It is clear that dance is absolutely floodd with possibilities, and no one lives long enough to comprehend all that is now possible. It is a sweetly sad situation. 
A possible development is suggested by what academics call a “crises in art” – meaning that there is a danger of homogenization of movement into a few bland hybrids. I think there is some evidence of this- particular styles, flavors of movement, have been lost already. Cultures too, are dying out, and along with their languages and foods and costumes, their dances die. 
In modern dance, when the artist who created a styles dies, the styles seems to vanish before our eyes. Within a decade or less, the particular pungency, the spice only provided for us there, is gone from the choreography. 
It is regrettable, but it is not a new crisis. Yoga is said to be about 4,000 years old I doubt it is the same today as it was in the past. T-ai chi chuan has an ancient history too, and only relatively recently one master shortened his system significantly for modern, hurried people to study. 
So I hope with significant depth of study among us, the current generation that the important aspects of particular dance forms will be retained for the future. Many choreographers now transmit their movement to their dancers via video. For dance, the current video technology is equivalent to the early phonograph records for music, and something essential (spatial relations in the case of dance) is altered by the recording. But we know technologies strive to reproduce reality, especially for entertainment’s sake, with great rapidity. Perhaps we are moving toward 3-d video reproductions, or at least the equivalent of hi-fidelity. 
Speculation aside, can we really now anything about the future of improvisation? I believe we can. The moment of beginning to improvise provides an illustration. I can feel the moment coming when I will make the shift – I can know I am about to do it. I can feel a change occur, and I begin. I cannot see exactly what it will be, but I know that it will be something. Once started, I can decide to continue, or stop. 
So what I think can be known is a kind of simple choice substructure. Though I will have to make these choices, the material which they will precipitate cannot really be known. Which decision to enact will be somewhat dependent upon the nature of the material which arises. It becomes a reflexive relationship. The predictability of this kind of event has a short scan forward. 
If that is the future for improvisation, what is the history, on this scale? That is, how long do I retain the memory of the vectors, angles, feelings of which I have just improvised? My impression is of milliseconds. How little do I need to remember in order to go on? I am estimating here, but I would guess the history and the future of “from the moment” dance improvisation, when added together, is about 30 milliseconds. Perhaps less, when things are going well. 


…TO TOUCH 
By Steve Paxton 
I hope that the inquiry into the connection between
contact improvisation and sex goes on past this issue
of CQ because it is a question which we ask uniquely
whenever we consider the question. We each speak for our
selves: This essay follows up on my article "Drafting Interior
Techniques m CQ 18: 1, Winter/Spring 93.
In 1972, when I was working on the new contact improvisation
(which I will write ci) I had a rather free hand.
I was aware of the potency of imagination when trying to
describe actions and thoughts we may have in common but
haven't put word to. The choice of words, even the thinking
of thoughts, would describe, explain and ultimately limit the
subject. Subsequent actions would in time become precedents,
each dance and each exercise would further define the
subject.
Touch and sex lie in close proximity. But they are not
alone. Touch, along with the other senses, integrates our
physicality. In this way, it relates to everything.
I figured that certain aspects of touch were shared by
both partners: the surface area touched on each person was
equal to the surface touched on the other. Pressure was for
each person equal, though the tissue touched was not always
the same. If a tricep touched a skull, the amount of pressure
and surface may be equal, but the effect was different on
muscle than on bone.
Knowing that one is touching and being touched is
coupled with the awareness that the same process is happening
inside the person one is dancing with.
These assumptions are embodied in Head-to-Head an
early ci exercise. 
On the surface of each dancer's head there is the point
of touch to which I directed the dancers' awarenesses.
l went on to expand it a little. Head-to-Head usually
follows “standing,” in which the "small dance" is identified
- the small dance is the movement performed in the act of
Standing; this movement is not consciously driven but may
be consciously observed. I think of it as reflexive movement
which is adjusting and sustaining- underlying-the generality
we call standing.
Through the point of touch in Head-to-Head, each
dancer can feel the small dance of the other person. This is
direct o b scrvat1· on and experience of the unconscious movement-
mind of the other.
Each dancer is aware that their small dance is being
sensed by the other. It is a complex connection, seeming to
be multilevel (sensorial, mental and reflexive), arising from
two heads touching. It is the introduction and the model for
touch elsewhere on the body.
Much the same may be said of sex, if sex
can be stripped of its many cultural and personal
connotations. It seems a little odd to do that. To
describe sex in the same way as Head-to-Head is
like the famous description of violin music as
catgut scraped by horsehair. 
And yet to describe Head-to-Head as I did is equally
sketchy. What is missing in the instruction is the personal
experience of the exercise. This material, while it is the 
whole point of the exercise, is too individualistic to predict,
too variable to pinpoint, and too complex to present as an
exercise.
Because .. .
Experience is everything personal about the touch. It
includes the sensorial impressions, and feelings about these
impressions. It may include one's personal history, feelings
about that history, fantasies, etc.
It is experience, and then the experience of that experience.
E-squared.
Two (of us) objects cannot occupy the same space at
the same time, so we can't have the same point of view.
Experience relies on our point of view, and the feelings
about what is noticed. This experience evolves to include
not only the event, but reactions and new attitudes toward
memories in ongoing present time. Points of view are loaded.
Physicists have points in space, poets have points of view.
Dancers have both.
OK, points of view are different for each person. Yet if
two minds are focused on the same phenomenon (touch,
music, words) something very like mutuality of experience
occurs.
It is like having access to another mind. It is not mindreading
as we imagine, in that we don' t know what that
mind is feeling; only that it is fee ling, focused upon the
common touch which is occurring. In other words, granted
our sensorial experience derives from our point of view, by
means of mutuality we have an experience of another order
(E-squared plus E-squared). In this mutuality, the speed of
transmission and retransmission is swift enough to imprint
directly on our intention and stimulate our reflexes. This
affects the course of the dance without conscious decision
on our part.
This mutuality is a powerful sort of event-such sensed-mutualities
create possibilities on which communal endeavors
from sports to culture in general are based. (And, on the
scary side, mob behavior.) What we do when we are at a
party and someone puts on a hot cassette-dance to the
music-is such a mutuality.
In ci, we are exploring mutuality on a basic level-a a
way into 'the present', where we may improvise movement.
The (apparent) extension beyond one's own sense-sphere
requires that each person corroborate the event and keep
each other up to the moment in the (approximately) mutual
dance they share.
Because it is an event which gives us the possibility of
Affecting each other, it brings up the issue of responsibility.
This implies that we temper our responses. When dealing
with sensitive areas of any sort, we should dance sensitively
and, as in other civilized discourse, if discord arises, change
the subject or watch our steps. It is not just movement to
which we are responding. The movement is a physical
surface covering whole life-times and wholly unknowable
experiences.
Sex is in there, someplace, everyplace. It is difficult to
imagine that while grazing each other's minds in touch and
movement we would not bump into some of its manifestations.
The society which practices ci today is not the same as
the society in which it began. Sex to us in the '90s is not
the same as sex was in 1972. Perhaps the main difference
now is the AIDS epidemic. What then and now have in
common is: pleasure, venereal disease, pregnancy or contraception
or both, economics, population, religion, morals,
herpes, ethics, power, communication, reputation, expectation
and the possibility of emotional connection which may
fulfill us or break our hearts, or both.
Because we have seen sexual attitudes change over
such a relatively short time, I assume that
they will go on changing, and that sexual
protocols will adapt as the consensus
changes. If there is a question of establishing
protocols in ci, I think they should be
simple. Something on the order of, "I don 't
lift people who are afraid of heights, and I
don 't pursue my sexual intentions with
people who don' t respond in kind." In ci
we are interested primarily in meeting
rather than evasion. If you dance in a way
which causes someone to retreat from experiencing
the ongoing flow with you, you are
not in the realm of ci.
If such a dance happens to a beginner,
they are at a particularly awkward pass.
Attraction may cause problems, but it is not
under conscious control, though in many
circumstances it can be masked. There are
conventions about touch in all cultures, and
we are cheerfully ignoring them. For those
who are just starting to leave their conventions
for this improvised form with no official
hierarchy- it's more like a democratic
anarchy-it must be like "out of the bathtub
and into the ocean." It is probably for
the sake of those who begin to negotiate
this transition that there needs to be clear
articulation about a ci attitude toward sex,
if only to avoid poisoning the atmosphere
around ci with unnamed fears. It may well
prove impossible to be clear, but even a
weak attempt may be helpful for beginners.
At least they would realize that everyone
has some relationship to the subject, and
that it isn't taboo to discuss it.
However, all the above being very logical, and Politically
Correct, I find when there is a good meeting of sexualities,
ci gets booted into the stratosphere from the ground of
preliminary touching. In this coincidence, both kinespheres
are radiant with energy, and both points of view are having a
good time dancing.
I don' t construe the relationship in movement as a
personal one. We can never have an abstract relationship lo
ourselves, of course, but we prove in most of our interactions 
capable of tailoring our personal relationship to the
requirements of the form: phone call s, sports, dancing, for
instance. I feel that ci should be governed by the same measures
as any other formal relationship, that is: civility, good
humor, as much intelligence as one can to bring to bear, and
willingness to overlook fleeting incompatibilities. At the
same time, self-preservation and preservation of the other
require responsibility. It is not self-responsible to endure
pain of any sort, and it is not responsible to others to inflict
pain. Anyone using ci to cruise is a predator, and the prey-predator
relationship is not ci. This is not a moral judgement.
It is a distinction.



The sex issue lori b & steve Paxton interview each other about sex and contact improvisation 

LORI: I’d like to talk with you about the
relationship between sex and Contact
Improvisation. I was curious about the
fact that none of my teachers had ever
mentioned sex or sexual feelings or
sexual arousal or anything to do with
sexuality as part of an introduction to
the form. I’ve studied with a tot of people
and I’ve frequently heard sex talked
about at Jams and wherever people
were practicing the form, but I never
heard my teachers even allude to it. So
I became curious about whether this
had anything to do with the form’s originator.
That’s why we’re here.
STEVE: Well, I used to talk about it.
And I would say that Contact had aspects
of touch that were like those in
sex, as do other things. It’s a message,
touching. And that’s, I think, the connection.
As for people talking about it,
what did they say?
Lori: People spoke about what happened
when they became sexually
aroused when they were dancing
Contact. People talked about relation­ ships that they'd gotten into or sexual encounters that they'd had, not as a
of the form, but from being in close con­ tact, and somehow emerging out of the sensuality, and the permission...

Steve: What permission? To touch?

Lori: Yeah, absolutely. It's not permission, it's actually...
Steve: .. .an instruction, [laughter]
Lori: The shadow side is people talking
about coming to a Contact class or jam,
and feeling violated, not having explicit
instructions or reinforcement for maintaining
clear boundaries. When you
said that you spoke about sex, was it
when you first began teaching? I would
like a bit of history.
Steve: Well, I started teaching in 1972,
to a group of 17 people, whom I had selected.
I thought they were a bunch of
great athletes who wouldn’t be hurt by
experimenting with this form. They
were young, most were in their 20s...
Lori: How old were you?
Steve: I was about 32. Improvisation
before Contact, as I had experienced it,
was all over the map. It could mean
anything. It tended to mean emotion based
movement expression... So I
was looking for a way to kind of pin it
down. I was interested in defining the
word for myself. With this form, a kind of
improvisation was caused—it was
touch-based and it was a two-way communication
all the time. People were so
busy communicating and sensing and
acting all at once that they couldn’t preview
many of their movements so they
just had to react. It was a very present minded
event, and it threw into the
space actions that weren’t intellectual or
predetermined, by and large.
Lori: When you said you began leaching"
the form in ’72, had you been experimenting
on yourself?
Steve: I had been working for two
years on a solo, which was to free up
my movement and get used to what I
now call the “sphere of movement.” I

guess I was working on that idea. And I
tried to teach it to some men at Oberlin
College in a class. This work became
the performance called Magnesium.
During that event there was a lot of sensory
testing and development and there
was a lot of collision. To make the collision
safe, I had to teach them how to
roll, I had to teach them how to collide
in the air and fall together, and stuff like
that.
Lori: And was that
stuff you knew already?
Steve: Well, from
martial arts. I had to
pull together all the information
I had about
the body. I had to pull
together yogic, meditational,
aikido, and
gymnastic material, to
figure out how this
stuff should be directed.
How was it possible
to teach it? What
did I need to know
about the students in
order to guide them to
go further into the
sphere and into interaction
with another
person?
Lori: What I saw in
the video of Magnesium
was very athletic,
all the throwing and
catching on the gym
mats. Were you working
with slow contact at that point?
Steve: No. Magnesium happened in
January ’72. I began working much
more slowly that spring at Bennington
College. The next performance event
happened in June with students from
Bennington, Rochester, Oberlin, and
dancers from New York.
Lori: Mixed gender?
Steve: Yeah, mixed gender. And one
love affair developed in that group. I
think it started off from the erotic quality
of their touch. I got to watch them
working in this form which is so much
about cooperation and touch and
communication and a kind of almost
extra-sensory awareness of other
people.
But my feelings were, and still are,
that I am not somebody who feels he
understands sex. I presume it’s everybody’s
own trip, and that when mature
people come into a room to do a touch-based
form, they go through all of these
trips. I’m not sure it’s the responsibility
of the teachers or the form to...I mean
we’re not a psychotherapy group...
Lori: i think that’s a big question, that
issue of responsibility. For instance,
coming into a learning environment
which is, by definition, hierarchical...

Steve: ...Under those circumstances,
what responsibility do I have about your
sexuality?
Lori: Well, it may be included in: what
responsibility do you have about my
dancer's body? Clearly, there are limits
to that, but as a teacher, I feel responsible
about creating a container. Obviously
at a jam ifs different (though perhaps
the community needs to be responsible
for creating the container...). On one
level I think, “Oh Steve’s right, this
sex stuff is extraneous." But because
touch has been so marginalized to the
sexual arena in our culture, it is instantly
sexually evocative. And touch is the
fundament of Contact Improvisation.
Steve: Then it does have to do with the
container that is created. The container
that I created is one with a strong emphasis
on words like gravity, momentum,
friction; strong investigation into the
senses, one’s own senses... Physical
safety has always been mainly what I
wanted to be responsible about.
In the very early days, I was just trying
to get the form to manifest in different
peoples’ bodies so they could do it
safely. I wasn’t sure how safe it was.
I’d never seen anything like this taught.
I didn’t have models. Aikido is a little bit
like it and I noticed in Aikido that the
mat is very chaotic a lot of the time.
One of the things that seems to be a
principle there is that everybody is responsible
for their own pathway—not
colliding. Therefore, the experiment in
Magnesium was to get people to be
aware in all directions.
Later, I offered clear instructions,
starting usually on the head—which is a
slightly de-sexualized touching place—
two people rolling their heads around
on each other while standing. It’s a
point of touch, and this point of touch
has parameters, physical laws, and those parameters are that both people
are feeling exactly the same pressure at
any moment, feeling exactly the same
changes, and they’re feeling exactly the
same surface area—the amount of skin
surface that is touching one is touching
the other. Now, the mental focus of
each person is just on that point. So
you have the focus of each mind just a
few cells apart. So this physical model
is established on the body, and it rolls
down from the heads onto softer tissue,
more erotic tissue.
Now, I’m of two minds about how to
discuss the lower body, below the
neck...[laughter]. One is that sometimes
I just feel like sex is the only energy
that’s really happening and everything
else is peripheral to it. And other times,
I say to myself that sex has been so
foisted on this culture, that we really
need to take a break, and get back to a
sensory experience that isn’t sexualized.
A lot of my thinking about Contact
comes from watching animals develop.
I once had two kittens. Those kittens
loved to touch and groom each other,
lots of bouncing and wrestling, and just
lying together and rolling around, sleeping
together. There was this continuum
of touch in their lives. Then they got a
little older, and it was clear that some of
the activity was hunting preparation.
Then it turned into eroticism, sexual
preparation. It’s just genetically programmed
stuff, I suppose. They’re not
improvising, are they? They’re just acting
out and learning, and the movement
is turning on different parts of the brain
and there’s a developmental pathway
that they’re on.
So with Contact Improvisation, I
guess I was trying to take the human
body back to a time when perhaps sexuality
was more innocent and less programmed
for pleasure and for procreation.
Going back there and trying to
recapitulate what we might have lost
when development got stopped because
we entered school and a kind of
rigidity came into our lives—a really
intense denial of the body. I mean, sitting
for hours and hours.
To me what was lost was the
chance to be throwing ourselves around
in an environment and developing other
centers in the brain for our survival: we
needed sphericity, we needed climbing,
we needed swimming... We needed
the senses to open to an extraordinary
degree in order to be as aware of the
surroundings as possible, and to be
able to maintain that with a kind of zen-like
attention.
So, I was trying to get back to that.
That’s the container i try to make, a
place of incredible exquisite quiet, with
great patience, with a lot of attention to
what’s going on in the body. It doesn’t
preclude sexual arousal, but I think that
sex is just part of the spectrum. We’re
incredibly focused on it, we’re very genitalized
in this culture. I think that if I
were to look at the whole thing from a
sexual perspective I would say that I
want the sexual sensations to be
throughout the body and the senses,
rather than crotch-bound.
Lori: This is consistent with childhood
sexuality—also, the freedom from consummation.
There’s absolutely no goal
in the experience of sex as a child, or
sensuality as a child; there's no model
for what’s supposed to happen—no
orgasms held up as the point of reference,
no coupling, no marriage. When I
say that my Contact teachers haven’t
addressed sex, I don’t mean to blame
anyone for failing to correct what the
culture has bungled. It’s just that sometimes,
in my excitement about our subculture,
I imagine we might be capable
of solving some bigger problems.
Steve: 1 think we do solve some. It’s
my experience, after all these years at
Breitenbush, in spite of the incident
where somebody touched somebody
inappropriately once, people really do
trust each other here. There’s an incredible
amount of very casual, very
friendly touch with people that you don’t
know very well. The form in general
seems to continue to be not that hassled
by sexual neurosis.
Lori: I agree with you—a lot of the
hope that I have, and that obviously you
had, in terms of the container that we’re
speaking of, gets realized in our gatherings.
I do expect that we can do it better
here (in the Contact community).
You’re saying that we are not  doing it differently
than the culture by not emphasizing
sex. But not speaking doesn’t
create change.
I agree with you that some aspects
are different in Contact—people have a
form to access the kind of energy you
were talking about, this kind of innocence.
But we still live in this culture
and the shadow of sexuality persists in
large measure. There is enormous distrust
of the body, and this functions as
some form of social control.
Do you believe that perception
about sex is being changed through our
dancing? Do you think people go out
from this community and live differently
In the world?
Steve: I don’t know, but I think we’re
studying something together. I think
we’re studying ourselves and we’re
studying the form and we’re studying
avenues to get older without losing the
body, losing it to the sedentary insanity
of this culture. This work takes an incredible
amount of material to be dug.
It’s an ore, it’s not a refined thing. It’s
like human bauxite.
Lori: Contact Improvisation as a form?
Steve: Contact itself. I’ve been saying
the same thing for twenty-five years...
it’s a raw material. So I got a little bit
disturbed when I realized that people
were taking this raw material and accepting
it as is. So I’m now trying to
bring back into the Contact world the
idea that there is technical work here to
be studied. And the reason to study it,
to take a technical point of view, is 
because it is the way out of the improvisational
paradox, which is: what to do
when you run into your own habits?
How do you get out of them?
Technique is the way out. Remember
when I said I want to go back to this
innocent place? Well, I also am taking
it out of that innocent place by looking
at it technically. In my teaching of Material
for the Spine now, I think I’m saying,
“OK now, what Is this spine doing, and
how can I make this spine more available
to people, and what do we need to
know about the spine and how It
works?” And, of course, you can’t isolate
the spine from the rest of the body,
so suddenly you’re Into all this, “Well,
what Is an arm? What Is a leg?” So,
currently I’m redefining those terms.
Putting it out as class material.
Lori: When you’re teaching Material
for the Spine, do you do some kind of
assessment, tracking who’s in the class?
Steve: Yeah, a lot of assessment. I
spend the first couple of days doing
work in which I am looking at the students,
trying to see what their awareness
of space might be. I take things
very slowly and I watch how they
work...
Lori: Have you ever been in a teaching
situation where someone came to you
and said, 7 feel like this person is
touching inappropriately or touched me
inappropriately?” I’ve heard of several
situations like this.
Steve: Nobody’s ever said that to me...
Well I do remember one thing, where a
bunch of women came together and
were talking about a man, and they included
me in the discussion. He was
somebody who was just having trouble,
and they got him through it, they got
him past sexual touching.
Lori: This is interesting. It’s so
charged. Is it etiquette? Is this ethics?
How can we say such things to a peer?
Unlike some kinds of physical activity
which can be described in a straightforward
manner, touch involves intention. I
think there’s a fine line that makes it difficult
to say whether or not I have a sexual
intention when I touch you.
Also, an historical gender issue
comes up. Women have for sq long
been accused of attracting unwanted attention
by the way they dress, the way
they walk. So there’s always the fear
that somehow, as a woman, I brought
this sexual attention on just by putting
my body near you. There’s also the
possibility that maybe I’m just imagining
it. So I think there is confusion for people
about whether they imagine something
sexual is happening and about
what part they inadvertently play in it.
Steve: Maybe people are not so insecure
about this happening. Maybe they
figure it’s going to happen, and so it’s
dismissible.
Lori: That’s true. Take erections, for
example. In a dance, some people are
totally freaked out by an erection. Other
people say, “Oh, this happens. Sometimes
we laugh in a dance and sometimes
we get erections." It’s just one of
the possibilities...
Two years ago, I participated in a
sex talk at [the California] Hart>in Jam
and what we managed to do best—this
group of people I consider fairly bold
and open, people who’ve been dancing
Contact for some time—was to formulate
a list of questions. And what we
managed to do worst was to answer
any of them or even really formulate a
way of talking about the questions. I
think sex is a very hard topic to talk
about.
Steve: I think touch is harder to talk
about than sex. Literature on sex goes
back thousands and thousands of
years. Literature on touch is intricately
linked to that history, but touch, by itself,
is a fairly unexplored sense. The
awareness of what it is seems very low,
or what its potential is, or what we do
with it, or how it effects our lives.
Lori: Literature including sex goes
back thousands of years, but about
sex... Of course, there are some documents,
some how-to manuals. The
Kama Sutra is stunning. But a how-to
manual is not something which really
explores how sex affects the community.
It’s not something which explores the
social ramifications of sex.
Steve: What about the theatrical literature?
What about theater? They’re trying
to cope with these issues, present
them. I feel that before psychology,
they were our psychological references.
I mean, it’s no accident that Freud
discussed things in terms of Oedipal
complexes or that he references Greek
theatre as archetypical.
Touch has a more scant literature.
Maybe the discrimination between
touch and sex is difficult to make because
touch is unexplored, rather than
because sex is difficult to discuss. I
mean, we explore sight and hearing
incredibly. We exploit them, use them,
they’re our cultural tools. Touch has
been excluded from that realm. Touch
is a sense which is repressed instead
of developed. The exploration of the
senses has largely happened through
the arts.
Lori: I appreciate your attempt to tease
apart touch and sex...
Steve: Well, the body is the instrument
for both, right? A sexual encounter and
a Contact Improvisation—the body is
the same instrument. When you talk
about hunger or satisfaction, you have
to specify whether you’re talking about
dinner or last night.
Lori: In conversation about dances,
people say, “No, it wasn’t sexual for me,
but it was very sensual.” I’m trying to
figure out whether sexuality is a subset
of sensuality.
Steve: I think it is. I think that’s a good
relationship for those two words...

Vision is one of the senses, and it’s
possible for that to be absolutely nonsexual
or extremely sexual. Touch, the
same way. Absolutely non-sexual or
extremely sexual. But, they’re both
sensual events.
Lori: I forget quickly, when I’m in our
group, how sense-deprived people are
in the larger community. For many people,
there Is a huge issue about how
to tell the difference between touch-touch
and sex-touch. Social workers
have Invented programs to protect
children against being victimized sexually,
teaching them how to read safe-touch.
Many adults could use this information
too, I guess. There are tons
of adults who don’t know what their
own intention is in touching, who have
been so desensitized that just any
touch is WOW! A huge explosion!
Steve: That’s why I used to start
Contact classes with contact between
heads. It seemed a fairly non-erotic
area of the body. But anyway, in this
question of intent, we have to go back
to realizing that touch is a two-way
communication. Suppose somebody
touches you with whom you would like
to have a sexual encounter, but with
whom you know you can’t have a sexual
encounter.
Lori: Why not?
Steve: Because you’re married. Because
they’re married. Because they’re
your father...[laughter]. You desire, but
you know that it’s not appropriate. What
do you do with the desire? Endure the
desire, repress the desire, ignore the
desire, but know it’s still there. And
then what do you do when that person
touches you, and perhaps touches you
tenderly? What do you do with that?
Lori: This hooks up with the consummation
issue. I’m really able and willing
and delighted to have a sexual experience
that Is not consummated. I feel
my excitement, I feel my arousal even,
and I do not have any Intention of being
genital or even kissing. I’ve been in circumstances
when I was absolutely sure
I was not going to pursue sex with
somebody I was dancing with and we
went ahead and had really luscious.
sexual dances. This is a great place for
me, a lovely container.
Steve: It’s like saying “hello” to each
other’s sexual sides as well as everything
else.
Lori: Exactly. And when the communication
Is two-way, and mutual. It’s
deeply satisfying. There are other times
when I’m dancing with a person who I
sense wants something from me that I
don’t want to give them. Sometimes
they want my weight, sometimes they
want to put me in the air, sometimes I
feel like they want to consume me...
That’s a circumstance in which touch is
two-way, but doesn’t feel mutual. When
I first began, I was less good at ending
those dances quickly.
Steve: Is that how you deal with it?
Lori: I am pretty clear about how much
discomfort I’m willing to endure. I spent
so many years abusing my body in so
many different ways. Having successfully
recalibrated the relationship between
my mind and my body, I don’t push the limits very far. If I’m uncomfortable,
sometimes I say something.
I’m not going up. I don’t trust you. I
don’t really know you. Let’s have a low
dance.” And sometimes I say, “I have to
get a glass of water now.” Sometimes I
also say that because I’m just hot and
thirsty...[laughter]. Have you had that
experience?

Steve: Oh yeah. I think I deal with it by
just not giving it to them if I don’t want
to give it to them, but I go on dancing.
It’s rare that they ask very much or for
very long, if what they want seems not
to be there. And if it’s not there, it’s not
there. That’s all. And so I’m not uncomfortable
with them asking.
Lori: I sometimes have the same feeling.
But it may be different for men and
women, there might be some gender
difference. At any rate, I won’t continue
dancing with someone who can’t figure
out what I don’t want. I think that’s dangerous
on a variety of levels, not the
least of which is physical.

Steve: Seems to me that one of the
things about touch is that it strengthens
the immune system. Like premature
babies who are massaged gain weight
incredibly fast compared to premature
babies who are not touched. Of course,
it stimulates the sexual system as a part
of a general stimulation of the systems.
So if one looked at a moment of mild
arousal as a strengthening of a system,
as opposed to a guilt-trip or a social no-no,
it might effect people’s attitudes
about what happens, what an arousal
event is. If they had some model about
it being actually a positive charge, the
warmth that’s generated between people,
as in social dancing, at a party, or
at a bar, or during a game. This stimulates
all the systems, and I think that’s
why we do it. It seems to me a little bit
weird to question this too much.
Lori: I had an intuition that because
Contact Improvisation is such a deeply
sensual form, it might have been a survival
strategy, initially, not to speak
about sexuality. Because people might
have been fearful, or very condescending.
Even in the ’90s, I've heard people
say, “Oh Contact Improv is just a group
grope," or, "that's just an excuse for sex.”
I wondered whether that had been a
concern of yours.
Steve: The idea of group gropes and
the whole Esalen California energy that
surrounded that idea was around when
I started Contact, and I didn’t think it
was very interesting. On the other
hand, at that time, one didn’t need a lot
of protection. I mean, if I had said that
Contact Improvisation was about the
rising of the Kundalini and a kind of
Kama Sutra of dance improvisation, I
think people would have been very
interested.
Lori: So it wasn’t a defensive move.
Steve: No. Sexuality, conversation,
focused eyes or closed eyes, too much
initial communicating through the
hands, stuff like that, was tossed out of
the work because those things were
easily available in the culture. They
came in with the dancers and I invited
them back out again because those
things take precedence over one’s
sense of gravity, over one’s sense of
friction, over one’s sense of direction
and location and orientation.
Lori: I’m glad this came up. So not
including sexuality doesn’t necessarily
mean excluding it.
Steve: No, no, no, no. Exactly.
Lori: So you began to explore the form
with a group of college athletes but at
some point it changed from a confined
experiment, working with an ongoing
group, to putting up signs and opening
the doors to people who had had a
myriad of social and physical experiences.
This becomes a little bit different.
Your intention to leave out the
things that are readily available in the
culture doesn’t necessarily mean that
people do. leave them out.
Steve: That’s right.

Lori: Which is why in a teaching circumstance
we must sometimes sav.
“Let's experiment with less conversation
in the room,’’ or, “For the first part of
class, let’s not use our hands... ”
Steve: You have to bring people to so
many senses with Contact Improvisation.
You have to bring them to their orientation.
Many people are not very well
oriented and, at first, the more spherical
they get, the more they lose it. So that
has to be investigated slowly. The
whole re-socialization process through
the special touch work in the studio
needs to be done slowly. See, when
Contact started, the ’60s—which was
probably the most sexualized decade of
the century—had just passed. I think
that times have changed since then.
Sexuality has become a very different
thing and probably it is time to look at
sex from the new perspective that has
arisen in the culture.
Lori: Yeah, well everybody mentions
gravity and counterbalance. Of course,
these are technical aspects of the form.
Here at the jam, we mention drinking
water, keeping hydrated, as an important
peripheral aspect of keeping the
body safe while dancing. Maybe now
we need to address the issue of touch
and its various components, of which
sexuality is one, as part of an introduction
to the form.
Steve: So, where is this information
about touch to be found?
Lori: My understanding of how people
learn to teach this form is through oral
and physical transmission. I mean. I’m
just becoming a teacher, and I’ve
learned from my teachers.
Steve: And the Quarterly.
Lori: There is that literature. Also, I got
an enormous amount of specific training
around touch and boundaries during my
education as a body-based psychotherapist
(Rubenfeld® Synergy). The entire
first year was about intention in touch.
quality of touch. It’s not about pleasure,
using touch in that way.
Steve: So what did you think when you
came into Contact? Gosh! You were
loaded.
Lori: Yup, I was loaded. I thought and
still think that Contact Improvisation is
exquisite and wonderful. I have a sense
that there’s more than just dancing
being practiced. I’m very curious about
all these other layers which do move
into the psychological realm. It is
incredible for people to have a place to
practice establishing boundaries, a
place to practice defining self I agree
that Contact Improvisation is not psychotherapy,
but I think that the form is
truly therapeutic. And it’s important to
make that distinction. There’s this side-effect:
a lot of people are experiencing
enormous healing around touch, around
relationship, probably around sex.
It’s early In my teaching career so I
am developing my rap, my teacher’s
rap. There are certain things I like to
say in the beginning of a class, that
have to do with safety, keeping the
room safe, encouraging communication,
keeping aware. I’m just wondering what
it would be like to say, “We intend mostly
to dance here, and there are many
aspects of touch. One of them is sexual."
Not a product warning, but naming
something that’s a fundamental part of
the experience we’re having.
Steve: You would make everybody
think of it at once... You know, for good
or ill, I don't know. But, my feeling was
that it’s such a powerful image, such a
powerful force... Mention the word
“sex” or “sexual feelings,” and once it
was in the room, it took a while to get
back into gentler and perhaps more
physical realms. It’s a place where I
feel like it’s easy to get stuck. And
since flow is what the issue is here—
paying attention, and constantly adapting—
if I let those feelings take over,
then I simply have stopped doing Contact
and I’ve started doing something
else.
On the other hand, I don’t want to
deny that sexual feelings should or
could be there, I think they should be
there. To me, sex and sexual arousal
and sexual feelings in Contact are a
very insignificant aspect of what happens
in the form. I’m glad they’re there.
See, I don’t think sex and sexual
feelings are being handled properly at
all, but I see more and more that the
reason things grew the way they have is
because nobody knows what to do
about it. There are so many taboos and
laws and religious attitudes, all in conflict,
and all very deeply held. And I
wish it were true that we could just
name it or talk about it and make it
whole and healthy.
Lori: I think when difficult things don’t
get spoken, they become larger, take on
more weight and density. Speaking,
just naming a thing, often creates perspective.
Touch, as you said, is a largely
unexplored and undocumented sense. I
have the idea that we, as dancers and
improvisors, are ambassadors to the
world of the body. As a thinking dancer,
I strongly believe that I have a duty to
articulate my experience.


THE MAN IN THE BOX 
Interview with Steve Paxton at Breitenbursh Conference ’94 
Collated by Jess Curtis 
collated by Jess Curtis
The following interview took place 
At the Spring ’04 Breitenbush Jam Conference 
on “Contact Improvisation: The 
Form,” at Breitenbush Hot Springs in Oregon. The interview was conducted 
Using a core set up by the interviewee, 
Steve Paxton. Written questions were 
Given to Steve, who sat in a small box at one end of the space, out of view. 
Steve responded in writing and each 
Questioner read to the conference their question and answer from Steve. 
While this was going on, the rest of 
The people in the room participated in 
An energetic discussion on topics ranging 
from the varying parts of the world 
(e.g., West Coast, East Coast, Germany, Quebec) to issues of economic accessibility 
And ethics and values within the 
Contact community. 
The weave of these two separate and
related discussions was rich and engaging.
I have taken the liberty of putting
the questions in an order, for they came
to me in a pile. I did not credit individual
questioners (except in one case
where it seemed relevant), because not
everyone identified themselves on their
papers. [J. C.]
ORIGINS /Cl
What led you to invent the form we
call Contact Improvisation?
Steve: Having noticed it (I did not
invent anything but the name and a
process to study it), I noticed the form
evolved. What do you mean by the
form? A physical practice by individuals?
Duets? The above evolved into a
network.
What role does perception play in the
form? Is CI a state of mind? If so
can you define that state?
. Every discipline begins with perception.
States of mind are caused by
perceptions and/or states of mind determine
perceptions.
CI is an improvisational state of
mind partially determined by another's
improvisational state of mind; the contact
is not a state of mind but a physical
exterior event. The two blend like the
double circles of ripples seen when two
stones are dropped in a pond.
Do you think Cl is evolving as a
form? How?
Yes. 1. Socially inclusive. 2. Technically.
a) Why do you think people have
such a longing/desire to do CI?

b) Do you think it's possible that, by
practicing Cl, the physical body
changes towards an addiction to
physical contact?
a) Touch is essential to development
of the infant's health, nurture, mental
development, emotional maturing.
Many people have not received enough
or continue to benefit from the way 1t
works on the adult body·
b) "Addiction?" Are we addicted to
preferring fresh air or healthy food?
Are there books and tapes on contact
improvisation? What are they? How
do I get better?
By practice. Books and tapes give
ideas about what possible ways one
might aim practice. But the first part of
practice is physical. The magazine
Contact Quarterly contains most info.
Is there a difference between practice
and discipline?
Not in practice.
You said earlier that CI is evolving
technically... Could you elaborate,
i.e., What specifically do you see as
technical advancements? Do you
teach this in duet work?
I teach it in solo work and I will not
elaborate on paper but only physically
in the studio.
How do you feel about Cl being
"used" in the new dance/post-modern
dance field?
Who cares?
Would any other form of dance help
with the skills of CI?
All.
THE SMALL DANCE
What is the "Small Dance''?
Tuned to gravity, reflexes arrange
our skeletons, aligning weights and
proportions to maintain our stand.
Noticing the Small Dance gives the
mind a way to tune to the speed of
reflex.
Are all involuntary movements part
of the Small Dance?
Movements of the skeleton.
In the Small Dance, is the teetering
upright equilibrium sought only a
mechanical one of weights, levers and
muscle motors, or does the psyche
also attempt to find expression and
recognition of its own states in the
tensing and releasing of the stander's
musculature?
The small dance is only the first
definition you give here. The second is
the study of such techniques as the
"imagine you are taking a step with
your left foot..." sort. Separating these
two is instructive. (My theory is that
we learn a lot by contrast.) In practice
they interact.
Are breath and heartbeat a Small
Dance?
They are further, but other, manifestations
of an aspect of mind to which
consciousness is denied direct access,
yet may infer by such evidence.
Did the "Small Dance" get created
before CI, the form, or after?
Before.
What stage of your dance life were
you in then (what were you most
being influenced by)?
Dance: Aikido, meditation, gymnastics,
improvisation technique, NY urban
tension, art as abstract, "form" as principle
control, the work of Simone Forti, a
remark by Agnes Martin-"The only
thing left of nature in NYC is gravity."
If there is a standing small dance, is
there a sitting small dance?
Yes, half as long.
Can the Small Dance be refined? If
so, what are the indicators?
Creamy but fine-grained elastic
scope of movement.
I don't know how to teach people to
let their small dance get bigger like
mine. [This question came from Emery
Blackwell, who has cerebral palsy.]
Your example is contagious.
a) Dear dr. box, is there a difference
between dance and movement?
b) If so, if a person cannot feel their
skeleton (paralysis or inattention) are
they still in the small dance?
a) Dame Peggy von Praugh reportedly
said, "It is only dance if it is en pointe."
b) They are of it but not in it.
FAITH IN THE FORM
Do you ever lose faith in the form'? If
so, what have you done to find your
way back?
No, I don't Jose faith in it, but I Jose
understanding of it sometimes. I clear
mind and look again. Breitenbush
helps, also.
Is Contact Improvisation a spiritual
practice? If so, how can its principles
most effectively inform right relations
in the world?
All dance is (due to momentary
awareness). That is why the church
kicked out dance as an accredited religious
art. Whether or not it is spiritual-
aside from that-it is a game which
requires two people to win. Extrapolate
from that.
What function does CI serve in society
at large?
Starting in urban centers it replaces
the denatured physical life of the inhabitants/
inmates. Spreading outward, it
inhabits a vacuum imposed by society's
very real need to influence the physical
bodies of its members; slips the knots
of regimentation, releases directed focus
into peripheral, unknown, unknowable
and familiar old potential. A form to
re-identify touch in a manner so innocent
and righteous that it can fairly
transcend taboo.
What about metaphors ... like for living?
What about them?
I realize the many many layers or
levels of occurring at the same time.
Looking at details, i.e. Small Dance,
dancing/process/improvising, i.e. giving
weight is giving weight-giving
center is giving self. Arc you separate
from me or part of my dream'?
Thank you.


DRAFTING interior TECHNIQUES
by Steve Paxton

How awkwardly we arc damned if we don't or if we do, I thought to myself after the European Contact Conference in Berlin in 1988. During a lecture event I had been asked, "Just what is Contact Improvisation?" and I had muffed the answer. I was being asked by a woman with an attitude, in the presence of a number of veteran contactors, general public, and students, and l hesitated in order to think how the question should be answered for the whole group. The discussion up to that point had been full of historical revisions, elisions, pointed remarks about Americentric heavy-footedness. In short, the European contactors considered themselves second generation users of this form and wanted to know if they had to go through every step the Americans had gone through; and a few people who had come to the conference without prior experience just wanted
an explanation of what this whole thing was and how it was run and how did one improve and get recognition-things like that, which would be reasonable questions in a normal organization.
The journal you are now reading had, among other things, been working for 15 years to elaborate on the basic answer to "what is Cl?" And as time has gone on, the answer has shifted: away from an experimental dance phenomenon and toward a physical practice allied with a number of complex new body and mind studies. I have come to think of contact improvisation as a physical event best described negatively­
not art, not sport, not most of the things which characterize dancing in this century.
But I hate to describe things in the negative. It is accurate, but the mystics used it first and I don't like using their devices, which were used to try to inform students in conversations about the ineffable.
We, on the other hand, are trying to describe the corporeal. But it is no longer easy to do so. It is, in fact, getting more difficult. We now know too much, or think we do; the corporeal seems to be a complexity of social, physical, geometric, glandular, political, intimate, and personal information which is not easily renderable.
Once things were relatively simple. I thought I knew how this then-nameless work should not be described It was to be an improvisation without any ambiguous appeals to the imagination, because I did not know precisely what "the imagination" was (in fact I thought doing this work might educate me to the meanings of imagination, improvisation etc.). For the same reason there should be no mention of sexuality, psychology, spirituality. I would leave these in the hands of the experts and proceed with what seemed more immediate-the senses and the physical body.
It did seem that before I could begin to train the senses of students, something had to happen in their brains. In recognizing that we do not begin to move from zero, that first we have a desire or image to launch the system into action, I decided that I had to work in the area of images, though cautiously. The images were to be, well, "real." That is, they were not to be obviously unreal.
The effect of obviously unreal images upon the body is fascinating. For example, if you are told to imagine (that word!) your head is filled with a gas that's lighter than air, it is difficult not to respond with neck extension and postural
straightening. Why should this be so?
It may be related to the sort of mobilization which happens when we are searching for a lost object-fust, the thought of the object, then the eye movements, the bead turning, standing up, facing in different directions, a tentative walk to a new viewpoint or a possible site of the object. All this prompted by the mental image of the desired object
The responsiveness of the body to the image is innate, apparently, and with this innate connection the body may be responsive to any image the mind holds. But this is speculation about things which should be the subject of investigations. Without a theory of imagination to support our investigations, it seemed to me, we would have to improvise without fictitious gasses in the head-if that were possible.
At any rate, I had only about a week to come to convey the central idea before we, a group of apt students and myself, would be doing it in public at the John Weber Gallery in NYC each afternoon. This time pressure meant that this effect of images on the body would be an essential tool for quickly transmitting the initial states which would let this physical duet/improvisation manifest as directly as possible.
The first job was to point out this image-action connection. Then, exercises which demonstrate it in various parts of the body bad to be produced. For instance, a mental exercise I gave while people were standing, in which they were to "imagine, but don't do it, imagine that you are about to take a step forward with your left foot What is the difference? As you were. Imagine... (repeat). Imagine that you are about to take a step with your right foot Your left Right. Left. Standing."
At this point, small smiles sometimes appeared on people's faces and I suspected they felt the effect They bad gone on an imaginary walk and had felt their weight responding subtly (but really) to the image; so when "Standing" was said, the smiles revealed that they got the small joke. They realized that I knew about the effect. We had arrived at an invisible (but real) place together.
The stand was useful. The basic event was standing and observing the body. This was an exercise in itself, though a very reductive one. What gets exercised in there, inside the standing body, is the habit of observation; a noticeable movement of consciousness through the body. Within this exercise there are encounters with parts of the body which tick along or breathe along as we watch. It clearly seems to be one sub-system, consciousness, examining others.
The other sub-systems are not obviously connected to the wandering consciousness, except that the encounter happens in what one calls "my body." The consciousness-as-observer regards the other sub-systems as separate from itself.

The consciousness can travel inside the body. It is analogous to focusing the eyes in the external world. There is also an analogue for peripheral vision, which is the awareness of the whole body with senses open. Knowing these things and practicing them are different things, of course. We know far more than we can practice. We had to decide what to practice.
One choice was the tiny movements the body makes while standing. I felt they were examples of reflex actions. They
were not directed by the observing consciousness. Observing them might train the consciousness to understand reflex speed without going through an emergency experience which 1s when we re most often aware of our reflexes.
We would be provided with many examples of reflex action when we began improvising in contact, but they might be of little use to us, because the consciousness can easily tum off to the experience of these reflexive moments. In other words, we can do something without "knowing" it. This successfully preserves the integrity of the body but does not train the consciousness; it leaves a hole in the knowing
of the experience. Could the consciousness learn to see these gaps of awareness?  Or, if not, could it at least learn to
observe reflexive action calmly during the highly adrenalized moments?
Why is full consciousness so important to me? Because consciousness can be felt to change according to what it experiences. If a gap of consciousness occurs at a critical moment, we lose an opportunity to learn from the moment. A black-out lasting fractions of a second during a roll is not acceptable as full consciousness of the roll, and the gap will remain embedded in the movement as part of the over-all feeling	the movement. If consciousness stays open during these critical moments, it will have an experience of them, and will enlarge its concept to match the new experience. This expanded picture becomes the new ground for moving. My	speculation is that the gaps are moments when consciousness goes away. I don't know where. But I think
I know why. Something is happening which is too fast for thought. For instance, the navigation of space is normally done with head erect and visual impressions comfortably constant, with the horizon's horizontality remaining an important reference for our orientation. When this visual reference changes too rapidly for our (rather slow) conscious­ ness to comprehend, as in spinning, rolling, and other "disorienting" movement, something reflexive and much faster than consciousness takes over. We play with this dual
aspect of ourselves on carnival rides, or when learning to turn m dance.
Dizziness and nausea are, I think, signals that we have reached the borderland between these two aspects of physical control-conscious and reflexive. When we linger in the borderland on purpose, we become our own experiment. We are subjecting the reflexes to stimuli so our consciousness can watch them jump. Normally, consciousness easily slips out,
reflexes step in, and then step aside again, as in the blink of an eye where most of the time we are unaware of any gap in our visual continuity.
Visual continuity is one of many ways we know "where we are," and not knowing where we are is experienced as an emergency situation. How many times a day, or an hour, do we re-orient, I wonder. At any rate, contact improvisation constantly challenges one's orientation: visual, direction, balance, and where in the body the consciousness is positioned. The challenge to orientation is not just in the more acrobatic aspects of the movement. Students were sometimes made nauseous by noticing their internal space while standing still. This, oddly enough, is probably a form of motion-sickness which has been described as having a moving deck under one's feet but a steady horizon. In the stand, one experiences still feet and moving consciousness inside the body. In rolling or turning, the room seems (from the point of view of the eyes) to move, while the floor remains stable to the touch. What I had to do was resolve the problem of orientation so that the consciousness could stay aware of the movement. A chicken and egg problem.
Everyone in this group was athletic and many of them were dancers so presumably their consciousness had already been informed by body movement. But they weren't being asked to do what they knew how do lo. They were being asked to improvise; to do (or allow themselves to do) what they didn't expect to do. Under these circumstances previously learned movement techniques often hamper rather than help the desired sort of manifestation. Movement techniques are useful for other reasons, of course, but not for examining gaps of consciousness during unexpected movement.
Consciousness, supported by a collect10n of images and internal observations which reinforced each other, had a job. It should not press the body, nor engage in time travel out of the body into memories or schedules because these bring images which will also affect the body, distracting from the improvisation at hand. In this improvisation the conscious­ ness was to hang in with the body, during real time, and stay alert. It should be a witness.
This sort of consciousness-awareness of the present physical reality-is familiar lo all of us. In fact the reason it is useful is that it is commonly understood, though employing it requires choices. Without a process of sorting we are confronted with such a variety of current physical images that we are inundated rather than guided into a practice.
As the right kind of images were found, a working model began to emerge in my mind. The working model was based on aspects of an experience that I'd had while working with another person, in which an interesting event occurred and was confirmed by both of us. Moments of the duet, typically manifesting as "accidental" and flowing streams of movement, were for both of us pleasant, highly stimulating, and elemental. With other partners, more confirmations. It was worth pursuing.
The working model was predicated on this experience and a desire to articulate the experience so others could find it. If others did find it, we were perhaps examining a basic mode of communication between the reflexes of people in physical contact as they moved. It was an idea which took two people to have. It wasn't wrestling, embracing, sex, social dancing, though it was an element of all of those. It needed a name, so we could refer to it without unwanted connotations. Contact Improvisation ...?
To envision the exercises, I took the working model to be a simple imaginary person with no physical, sensorial, or social inhibitions. It was a generic person with positive elements I had observed in many students, dancers, martial artists, and children. I had met such a being in my partners when we were doing "it," the duet phenomenon. I had been such a being to them, apparently, when they too confirmed
the moment. It had to be a fairly simple model, because the users (the students and I were actually functioning human
beings with more possible neuronal connections than there are particles in the universe.  I could not cope with that of course, nor other evident human complexities. In terms of the safety of the body in active interaction with another body, though, I saw I could ask the student to concentrate on movement and how it feels, and then suggest concentrating on the sensations of their weight, momentum, friction, the touch of their partner, the sensation of the floor under their body, and to learn to maintain their peripheral vision of the space. The working model had these characteristics and others equally easy to understand. These were aimed at security, not at improvising. I recall saying that improvising could not be taught, though it could be learned.
But I did think that safety could be taught. "Keep your knees over your toes," for instance, is taught to students of dance. With the characteristics of the working model developed and understood by the students, I hoped they would be safe even if they were ass-over-teakettle.
I pressed on. I made assumptions. I assumed I could explain things directly to the body ("notice gravity"). I assumed the body knew what I was talking about (gravity, usually ignored, moves into focus as a sensation of weight). I assumed that the body, having evolved for millions of years on this planet, was tuned first by planetary things which create our potentials, and second by cultural things which develop select parts of the potential. This is in line with some current theories about how we acquire language; we are born with potential to make the variety of human sounds and language connections, but are guided into the specific 
language of our culture, and the unused potential withers with disuse.
For the working model, the basic question was--potential
for what? What had the culture physically suppressed or selected out which we might reclaim? We may, with a bit of experience of sub-cultures of our own, and other cultures, understand something of what our culture requires of us for inclusion: certain gestures, modes of posture and behavior-body language, as they say-which constitute proper social activities and communications, as well as the accompanying mental attitudes we acquire or aspire to for proper presentation of our 'selves'. Indeed, the very idea of a 'self is probably a cultural construction.
In sports and dance the rules of physical behavior are altered from the basic social behaviors to encompass activities understood to be outside the social norm but allowable in a controlled way. These activities require different sensing modes than does the usual body language we must learn for eating in company or attending school. The working model and its characteristics were like sports and dance in that they were altered. However, they depart from one another in how they are learned. Contact Improvisation behavior evolves from sensing movement; dance and sports, from attempting movement and then letting the senses fall into line, or not.
As to how we are educated... Not to become too embroiled in this, we may simply note that most of us learn to sit still and focus our attention for hours each day. The missing potential here is obvious - movement of the body and varieties of peripheral sensing.
Our alterations involved the investigation of space, time, and mass with senses in peripheral sensing mode: space becomes spherical, time is the present, mass is a changeable orientation to gravity.
In devising an approach to this working model of the body, I skipped blithely by constraints and taboos of touching, because people are accustomed to ignoring them on the subway, during sports, or in the doctor's office. And I did not emphasize the unpredictable nature of the improvisation, akin to dancing on constantly shifting ground, but suggested instead a steady stare of watching the reflexes. Let the reflexes figure out how to deal with the unpredictable.
This method aimed to reclaim physical possibilities which may have become dormant, senses we have been trained to disregard.  What would this lead to, really? It sounds very nice, this reclaiming and opening, but where would these changes take us? Who would we be?

When we began, in 1972, I went boldly into all this. The people in the group were young, healthy, and alert. I assumed that if we didn't consciously focus on problems we wouldn't create them, and at least such difficulties as
surfaced would not have been projected. As I said earlier, things seemed simpler then.
 

 
It was to be assumed that some of these students would eventually teach something of what they were doing to others, and I felt the need to develop this material in such a way that the students were aware of the teaching mechanisms. It boiled down to making the principles-physical, mental, and cultural-known to them as they learned them. We had the services of Steve Christiansen and his video camera and spent hours, when we were not working on the mat, examining the movement and ourselves, the movers.
This was very useful. Video was, in those days, a new tool for witnessing the body/mind, and let us see points in action when we were operative but not conscious. Such moments, noticed with the help of the videotape or close observation by a partner, could later be examined in action. Clues about the nature of the gap might be noticed. We began to notice where the gaps appeared, at any rate, and something of their frequency. We also noticed high unfettered moments (and recalled the accompanying feelings). And we observed fettered duets where reflexive movement was not to be seen. Sometimes people seemed wary, unable
to let go of conscious control. Disorientation, fear, or fixed habitual responses would be noticed.
In the working model, events of the emotions and disorientations which were felt in conjunction with a gap in awareness were considered to be symptomatic that the senses were not quite ready to report what was happening to the
consciousness, that instead they were reporting to the reflexive part of the mind and body.
I couldn’t understand the wary duets. Obviously trust was missing. With some other partner or on some other day, this tended to change. All I could do to cope with this mode was to have partners change regularly. Eventually everyone found a duet which led them to their reflexes.
When I proposed movement techniques they sometimes contravened ingrained movement habits: for instance the aikido roll, which is a diagonally forward roll that arrived on our shores from the Orient. At the very attempt at this roll, students translated it into a somersault, the symmetrical forward roll we learn in Western movement. This misunderstanding could persist through any number of repetitions of examples and attempts and was seriously frustrating to both the students and me. If they couldn't put their finger on what was going wrong, I decided, it was perhaps because nothing m previous movement experience had prepared them for the movement principles which were developed in the Eastern martial arts.
These repeated attempts at the aikido roll provided the first gap I noticed. The act of propelling the body into the roll is slightly scary, and many people have open eyes before and after the roll, but in the moment when they are taking weight on their neck and shoulders, they have their eyes squeezed shut, and they are not aware that this is so.
I did not solve this two-part problem in time for the first performance, nor for many years after, though the students did perfect their somersaults.
I learned that before the body could find the new rolling
pattern it was useful for it to learn the sensations which an aikido roll creates.
The new sensations, and the parts of the arm, shoulder, and back where the sensations arise in the roll, could be explored without committing the whole body to the roll. This changed the position of the consciousness relative to the exercise. Instead of an unknown action vs. an habitual known action which is so similar that it subverts the attempt, the student has two knowable actions. One is new, tentative, but understood through the sensorial model. The other is habitual. Having remedied the first difficulty by establishing the difference between the two concepts of rolling, the gaps of consciousness in either could be ferreted out.
These explorations evolved into new technical approaches. It was noticeable that the approaches require that the student work with helpful mental attitudes as well as directly with the physical body. In the aikido roll example above, it was less helpful to know the pattern mentally and try willfully to do it than it was to become an observer of the sensations and to work calmly on each emotional, orientational, or habitual block as it arose.
The quality of consciousness was coming into focus. It wasn't all of consciousness and all possible interactions, of course. A working model for consciousness in this case is Swiss cheese. We buy it as a lump, and don't attend to the holes because we don't use them. I was trying to point to the holes, assuming that if a Swiss cheese could aware of itself, then the cheesy part was one sort of consc10usness and the holes were another sort, integral to the shape, the nature of the whole cheese. We can't take this model much further, I realize; which may be to the advantage of getting on with the movement and its interaction with the consciousness.

As we began work on opening up the senses to their larger potential, it became clear that each of the senses has images of differing natures. The Swiss cheese above, mostly a visual image in that I am concentrating on how the cheese looks, occurred in my brain and was transferred to another person by my voice, so it was a verbal transmission of a visual image. What was most needed in our work was kinetic imagery which was both appropriate to the movement mode and true (unlike the speculation about the consciousness of the cheese).
The small movements of standing "still," which formed the basis of this sort of investigation, arc true; they are really there. But are they images or sensations? If we observed them, would they filter through the observing mind and affect
the body as images do? Does the nervous system and its
mediation of posture relative to gravity have the possibility
of teaching the consciousness, and does the consciousness
have the property of amplifying or strengthening that mediation?
I assumed this reciprocity did exist. I decided that
sensations are what we feel to be happening at the moment,
and they can become images when we take notice that we are
observing them. This suggests that the consciousness can be
aware of itself-a defining characteristic-and that there is a
positive use for this ability to split into self-regard. However,
consciousness doesn't work very well with the unknown, as
was revealed in the aikido roll. It seems to need to know or
to be noticing in order to direct itself and the body. The
attitude of "witnessing" may change this internal control
issue. The search for internal sensations reveals that "I can
feel the small movements." Then our attitude begins to shift
toward, "The body is kept upright by constant reflexive
muscular actions around the skeleton." First we feel the
movements, then we can objectify the feelings into images.
The moment between these perceptions can be as short as a
hyphen. All the above suggests that there is an important difference between knowing-noticing and noticing-knowing.
These are the sorts of thoughts which came to mind
during the working period from January to June, 1972. Or to
say it in terms of the work: from Magnesium at Oberlin
College through the spring term at Bennington College where
we fur their identified the premise, the phenomenon, to the
presentation of the work in NYC I called "contact improvisations."
Students from those two institutions (plus members
of the downtown dance community in NYC who "sat in")
were joined by students from the classes of Mary Fulkerson
at the U. of Rochester. The Rochester group was least
familiar with the proposed movement, and as Fulkerson was
teaching them Release Technique via intensive image work,
it was in order to reach these students quickly that the
approach outlined above was developed beyond what had
been necessary at Bennington College.
At Bennington, I had begun by introducing these students
of Western dance to Aikido techniques. However, I soon
abandoned teaching Aikido and started work on specific tools
for the interior techniques. Although physical techniques
could be found for specific movement training, what those
students required was a vision of Eastern martial arts philosophy
underlying the techniques (or a viable replacement for
that). This laid the ground for introducing an improvisation
which requires a state of personal involvement and physical
responsibility with/for another person.

It must be pointed out that many of the ideas about moving which I used existed before this study. The teaching of Release Technique, Aikido, and several other physical and mental disciplines were influential, and were adjusted according to my understanding at the time in order to convey the movement principles of the area of improvisation described by the words contact improvisation. 
Beyond that, to enable the movement to be accomplished safely, came physical exercises designed to introduce sensations that arise during “flying,” lifting, and being lifted, and to physically strengthen the body for these energetic extremes of the form. Physical strength was seen as the result of finding the right, i.e., easiest, most efficient inner “pathways.” Stress was discouraged. 
We were starting to work on the technical method, a work which continues today, in an effort to describe what Contact Improvisation is on its own terms as a phenomenon of duet movement as well as in the personal terms of a student, who may for instance have physical strength but spatial weakness, or improvisational skills but does not trust their wight to another person. 
To summarize: images were used to focus the mind and then give the mind foci within the sensations of the body. 
The words has to be unambiguous, unthreatening, informative and generally understood. 
The statements had to be true, obvious, relevant. 
To speak was also to set the tone. I tried to simplify the issues of the body for transmission to another body. I moved the mind of my mouth into my body, located issues, and reported the issues speaking (I assumed) directly to another body. The student’s consciousness was enlisted to manage attitudes and observe the effect of image on the body, and to derive from these effects, and others observed within their bodies, images which could be named and otherwise objectified and discussed, and fitted into the improvisational structure. 
I made a number of assumptions. To study something like improvisation, which is defined as you go, everything you assume is going to affect the result. I tried to be aware of what the assumptions were to let the phenomenon we explored, the narrower field of improvisation when communicating via touch with another person guide the definitive imagery into appropriate areas. 
This guidance caused use to consider all sorts of things, such as communication, emotion, psychology, sex, education, childhood development, culture, taboos, space, time and the self. It is all very well to day that one takes responsibility for one’s self in improvisation, but it is indeed a staggering job in its details. An improviser’s job is never done. All this to explore the ability of the consciousness to cleave to the body’s moment and remain there as the moment changes. For John Cage 

3 Days 
Steve Paxton 
Joint Forces, a dance company founded by Alito Alessi and Karen Nelson, has presented four annual DanceAbility workshops, sharing Contact Improvisation dance with hundreds of people, some able-bodied and some with various physical disabilities. This year's DanceAbility, produced by Alito, took place for 3 days in mid-March, 1991.
Eugene, Oregon is a city designed to be wheelchair accessible and has provided the Hilyard Community Center for disabled folk as well. It is a handsome center, and as an able-bodied person, I enjoyed the extra space and wider doors which result when a building is designed to accommodate people who use wheelchairs. A problem for many disabled folk is our society's commercialization of space.
It can be difficult these days to get out of a car without chipping paint on the doors of three vehicles. Vans modified to raise and lower wheelchairs need the equivalent of two spaces.
So, for those disabled people able to drive to the center on Friday, it was easy to park, descend to ground level, wheel into the building with its automatically opening doors, and attend the orientation meeting for DanceAbility.
Originally, DanceAbility was to be held at the Center, but Saturday and Sunday's workshops had to be relocated to a more spacious high school gymnasium. The planners had not foreseen the large turnout for the event; disabled people are known stay-at-homes.
Some disabled folk objected to the concept of the purpose-built spanking-new community center for the disabled. The problem is how to integrate the populations, not segregate them into separate facilities. Bruce Curtis noticed that the men's toilet had no urinals, and though admitting it was a detail, felt that it was a symptom of a lack of consideration for the able-bodied, and as if all men with disabilities were in wheelchairs.
Getting pissed-off about the pissing facilities expresses the sensitivity of the activist. Bruce was invited to Dance­ Ability as a facilitator. He is a quad-a quadriplegic-in a wheelchair, from San Francisco. He has been active in 
teaching and performing dances with his able-bodied partner, Alan Ptashek. Alan is a veteran of a movement form called Contact Improvisation, a sort of partnered gymnastic improvisation. He answered the phone one day and found Bruce at the other end. Alan is a gifted partner and he and Bruce, who has no control of his legs or fingers, began to work out together.
Most forms of dance partnership suppose that one partner leads, the other responds: in CI however, either dancer may initiate or respond. After the movement starts, a new possibility arises; to follow the momentums established and to continue them while remaining in touch with the other's body. This is the 'contact' part of the form. The 'improvisational' aspect of it allows either partner to be in any position relative to their partner or to the floor. Essentially it is old-fashioned touch dancing taken from the vertical of the ballroom into the horizontals and obliques of wrestling, with, hopefully, the ability of the snooker player to intuit momenta! affects.
Bruce began dancing, I believe, from a political motive,
a desire to insure that the equality of the disabled folk was addressed; as well as his own need not to be marginalized, which included not letting his body degenerate in a wheel­ chair. Bruce came lo Eugene without Alan this year,
which is a measure of their success, and drove up tl1e coast in a VW bus he had modified to cope with his chair and the ways that his limbs work.
He is accepted as a performer, invited as a teacher. Have we beard of a quadriplegic dancer-teacher before? No, we have not.
Yet, at DanceAbility, Bruce was not unique. Charlene Curtiss teaches wheelchair aerobics in Seattle, for another instance. Emery Blackwell has recently resigned the presidency of OIL (Oregonians for Independent Living) to
devote himself to dance. He has cerebral palsy to a degree which makes speaking difficult. Words are stretched, tones distorted. His vocal mechanisms and jaw, like the rest of his body, reflect the aspect of CP which exaggerates the motor nerve impulses, sometimes producing kicking and quavers in the legs, large arm gestures, flexed (athatoid) wrists and extraordinary finger movements.
For three years Emery has worked with Alito Alessi and they have made a duet which uses the paraphernalia of the disabled-wheelchairs and crutches. Alito recently had an extraordinary accident. A bottle of carbonated water blew up and severed the muscles and tendons of the front of his right leg above the ankle, requiring surgery and extensive rehabilitation. So he has experienced a profound, if temporary, disability. He was no stranger to the disabled; his mother was wheelchair-bound from an auto accident when he was young, and his duet with Emery reflects his familiarity in a playful way with the mechanics of the support systems.
Emery has also produced a short solo, for which he made the music on his synthesizer.
Bruce, then, is not alone in taking the creative initiative in dance. It is an extraordinary thing they are all doing. We have seen paintings produced by disabled artists; music of distinction has been composed by disabled musicians.
However, dance uses the body as a medium. Unlike other arts, when one looks at a dance made by somebody who is disabled one is looking at the dance and also the disability. This contravenes our society's protocol regarding looking at the disabled. But theater exists in part to provide the opportunity for frank appraisal of human beings and per­ haps it suits the agenda of disabled performers to use the theatrical conventions to allow us to get used to their conditions. Then they get on with the creation of dance under those conditions, without necessarily referring to them.
These thoughts arose because we saw two dance works featuring Emery at the introduction to the workshop. One was the solo he choreographed in which he rolled across the floor, rose to his knees, turned in place, and then de­ scended and rolled away. What we see is that the rather simple format of the dance is taxing. Emery is working at the edge of his capabilities, just as many dancers do.
He is a striking man. The CP exaggerates his movements and features, but his long curly head of hair, his thin face with goatee often wetted with saliva, his intelligent and frequently merry blue eyes suggest a character of some flamboyance. Bruce once said that the disabled are either ignored or viewed as martyrs. But I think Emery would be extraordinary even if the facade of CP did not provide such a lavish filter through which to appreciate his spirit and thoughts.
Emery's spirit lights up his actions and face. His thoughts are thoughts set in a new body language.
Emery has said that to get his arm raised above his head requires about 20 seconds of imaging to accomplish.
 
Extension and contraction impulses in his muscles fire frequently and unpredictably, and he must somehow Select the right impulses consciously, or produce for himself a movement image of the correct quality to get the arm to respond as he wants. We observers can get entranced. with what he is doing with his mind. More objectively, we can see that as he tries he excites his motor impulses and the random firing happens with more vigor. His dancing has a built-in Catch-22. And we feel the quandary and see that he is pitched against his nervous system and wins, with effort and a kind of concentration we haven't seen before. He has mechanisms in his mind we able-bodied have not had to learn. His facility with them allows us to feel them subtly in our own minds.
The taste of this we get during the short solo is much amplified in the duet with Alito. This dance is longer and requires that Emery be where he needs to be in time to coordinate with Alito. The choreography provides a new filter to show us the man. The CP appears to mask the logic and intent until events show us that what we see bas been carefully calculated by Emery and Alito.

Can these dances avoid the obvious trap of being curiosities, grotesqueries, or analytical, quasi-medical displays?
It depends on the artistry, of course, and the failures of this new genre will probably be absorbed politely, just as the theatrical misadventures of the able-bodied usually are.
Theoretically I see no problem. Usually we think of dance as the development of human movement potential to superhuman levels. Another way to look at dance techniques is to notice that they exclude more movement potentials than they develop. Ballet works in the realm of extension of the limbs. It does not include the contractions of Martha Graham nor the asymmetry and sexy pelvis of jazz. Each of these techniques operates within its own logic, and each may borrow or quote from other systems, but at heart they are defined by how they are limited These definitions are aesthetic ones, though, and it is a difference of kind when the limitations are the result of mischance or malady.
But we quickly grasp the logic of the limitation, be it
aesthetic choice or physical disability, and this is the point at which the mind and spirit of the performers take over to convey us through the moments they are there to perform. I have seen awful Balanchine ballets. I have seen ballerinas with superb bodies who could not hold my attention for sixty seconds. And conversely, I have seen disabled performers who, without evoking pity or morbid fascination, kept me riveted to their work.
Jose Limon, a famous modem dancer, once said he felt most alive when on stage. I have similar feelings, which may be hard to understand by those who don't perform regularly. What happens is that the rigidity and self-consciousness of stage fright change to fluid extra power and deeper self-awareness. For that moment you have more of you. I guess it is adrenalin and other hormones surging through one's system, which mixes with one's own feelings and the feelings of the audience--who are there to witness feelings, after all. What a broth.
For Bruce and Emery, perhaps this performance high is the same. I view performance as an empowerment, and a
healing, or wholing. They may have found this as well. There is something in it for them, in other words. And if they find it, their transcendence will fuel our transcendence.
Will we find it more natural to design the disabled into
our urban environments because they will be in/on our
minds? Or are we struck with novelty?  Will it wear thin?

The audience at the Center absorbed the performances with appreciation and then watched a video of last year's DanceAbility workshop so they could see what they were io for on the weekend.
SATURDAY ...
We were all together from eleven until six p.m., about 60 people at any one time, and slightly fewer disabled than able-bodied which is a comfortable ratio. Not all the disabled needed help, mind you. Those with CP did: Emery, Jeff, Pete, Dana, for instance, are wheelchair bound, and also need others to be 'hands' for them.
Jan however is a single amputee who walks with crutch­ es. She teaches skiing and could sit to the floor on her leg and arise as easily. She needed no assistance.
Rhoda was my partner for an initial contact improvisation and then a verbal introduction. Having introduced ourselves to each other, we were to then join a circle and introduce our partner to the others in the group. I gave Rhoda my history first. She replied with, "I have an over­ eating disorder. And I was molested as a child." It seemed clear that she was introducing herself as alter­ abled. So not everyone had physical disablements.
Now I looked around the room with a new attitude, and a sense that even those of us with virtually no cause to consider ourselves disabled might in fact be there for other reasons that a good workout and altruism.
I asked Rhoda if I should introduce her as frankly as she had introduced herself to me. She said I should. At the end of that session a couple of women thanked her for her forthrightness. Indeed, why shouldn't people simply declare what happened and clear their air? Rhoda was seeking an experience of safe touch. I believe she found it on this weekend, as we at! did.
We also got a lot of exercise and physical challenge. It was at first difficult to manipulate a body in or out of a
 
rolling wheelchair. People not in chairs quickly discovered where the brakes were, and learned the advantageous ways to extend the dance beyond the chair. Not that the chair didn’t have a lot of possibilities. Certainly square-dancing arm figures could be used between partners of different abilities. And the chairs are designed for strength so it is possible to clamber up on top of a seated partner, to lay across the armrests, to catch a ride on a backstop or foot­ rest.
Several children spent little time in their chairs; being small they spent a lot of time being carried, flown and rocked.
Others were heavy to lift and manipulate, and all avail­ able contact improvisation skills were used to tum the transitional moments into fluid ones. It certainly seemed possible that someone would be dropped But it became clear that those who could leave their chairs enjoyed the adventure, and those who couldn't such as Bjo Ashwill with arthritis and a recently operated hand still in traction, knew their limits, which were respected by their partners. As the information that we were in a safe touch, safe adventure environment dawned on us, the warmth grew. First came safety, then came warmth. Then came... well, what one goes dancing for. Meeting people, doing and seeing unusual things, finding physical challenge while laughing. Being moved.

Our Western society has marginalized physicality. Not just to mention the voluntary couch potatoes, or car potatoes, or office potatoes. We marginalize physicality by smoothing the environment, contriving convenience. By removing its challenges we reduce the environment's ability to stimulate our potentials. There is a trap laid for us by city planners and architects, decorators and designers the couching of the country. We adore youth, but what with one thing and another-parenthood, jobs, etc.-we lose it too early, then cling to its superficial qualities with makeup and varieties of cosmetic surgery. News services distributed a 'filler' this last summer: the same percent of the U.S. population is overweight today as was in the 1960s. The_ joggers are more evident, the potatoes are not in the public eye.
So if it is normal for us to marginalize physicality, the
folk who are disabled are relegated to an even more se ate existence. Emery, however, has found a way out. He isa notorious bicycle rider. He tours Eugene for hours most days, cycling 30-40 miles on a bike specially designed for him. With this and dancing with Alito he has a body packed densely with muscle; and when he is lifted, the hoister quickly realizes that, although he appears slim and cannot control many actions, his is an athletic body.
Gerry Overington, who is blind, finds most available forms of exercise boring. Tandem cycling or running, without the visuals, is just work for the legs and a little wind on the face. Touch dancing with a sighted partner allows Gerry to move his body freely, without worry about the space. Gerry has become proficient at contact improvisation because it provides the fun of moving, and because he and his partner meet as equals in the sense of touch.
For the quads, paraplegics, CPs, etc., the exploration of
spherical movement retains its thrills, and the kinetic pleasure
of leaving the chair and having a dance which includes
rolling, taking and giving weight, guiding and being
guided, accelerating, pausing, and balancing alone provides
enormous stimulation. Emery and Pete seemed to become
rapturous when dances went well.
The spirit of the event was nothing like the usual physical
therapy. In fact there is no 'therapeutic contract' with
the participants. The contract is to experience contact
improvisation.
With the video and the performances of Friday evening
everyone had a notion of what it is. But teaching it physically
is another, more complex, matter. A group including
various disabilities is like a United Nations of the senses.
Instructions must be translated into specifics appropriate for
those on legs, wheels, crutches and must be signed for the
deaf. Demonstrations must be verbalized for those who
can't see, which is in itself a translating skill, because
English is not a very flexible language in terms of the
body.
Questions and discussions may be slowed by the inability
of some of the participants to speak clearly, or at all.
Pete, for instance, communicates by glancing at letters and
numbers on a plexiglass board. Sighting through the plastic
and meeting Pete's gaze, the reader can see the letter
Pete is looking at. When it is verbally identified, he
changes to the next letter. This is ingenious, if laborious,
but Pete's patience never seems strained. Several children
were both physically disabled and deaf, and Penny, a fluent
signer, was on hand to ensure they weren't left out.
Bruce called the large group to order every so often and
talked about skills of weight-giving or rolling. Perhaps he
was not so concerned with imparting skills as changing the
atmosphere from the good-natured chaos which tended to
prevail to one where anyone who was confused, or in an
unhappy partnership could find ground and conscious
change.
The rest of us who were there to facilitate, Karen Nelson,
K.J. Holmes, Riccardo Morrison, Alito and I, tended
to roam the gymnasium looking for difficulties. We would
expect at least some minor difficulties in such a huge
mixed group of relative non-dancers, but few if any were
found over the weekend. I think we tended to err on the
side of caution. Folk who weren't dancing were choosing
to watch or rest. But their presence at the event spoke for
them. They had come to dance.
SUNDAY ...
And dance they did. All day Saturday, all day Sunday.
By Sunday afternoon the gym was spread with picnic
lunches and people were casually sharing their food. I sat
around a generous spread with a number of others, and
realized that most of it had been provided by Rhoda, with
her overeating disorder, who had brought enough for others
who might have overeating disorders. It was consumed.
People talked and laughter echoed often. Children of
participants played in and out of groups, appropriating
empty wheelchairs to play in. Being children of disabled
parents meant they knew bow to use them.
One toddler had bells on her shoes. Her main amusement 
was to toddle, and the jingle on her feet let her mother, 
a young blind woman, know where she was. 
What her mother didn't see was that her daughter toddled in and out of dancing spaces where adults were contending with difficult balancing and fairly high-level physical forces. Occasionally gasps were raised among watchers. But the child spent ten hours over the weekend doing
this and never came to harm. She just tinkled through
whizzing wheelchairs and under lifted adults, the bells giving
us some warning that she was there. Perhaps having a blind mother gave her a sense of responsibility for her own seeing and moving far beyond her years, because rarely did anyone have to alter movement to accommodate her, and finally everyone accepted that she could participate as she pleased.
Another woman brought two kids, a boy of about 8, and
a small sweet faced girl about 4. This child was not as 
independent as tinkle-toes and sometimes wanted to crash
her mother's dances-to join in the fun or reclaim her
mother's physical attention. Her brother however, with many a strange noise and apparently casual intervention, 
would divert his little sister. He would step in the way or 
invent a pulling game, or distract her with a fantasy image. 
Sometimes this didn't work. When she persisted, she was 
welcomed into the dance by both dancers. Or mom would
see that her daughter did need some individual attention
and excuse herself to dance with her. The boy’s job was
effective though. Part sheepdog, part Charlie Chaplin, he
managed to give his mother a lot of dancing time.

Pete's Story
Pete Theophanes, 19, had in Emery a strong ally in communication.
Emery had taken him out for events and knew
Pete's situation at home. When Pete needed to express an
urgent problem, Emery provided the background information
which clued the rest of us into the picture. We were
pulled into the thick of it.
It happened during a meeting of the whole group, when
one of the facilitators had called for a round robin, in
which the group forms a circle and a few couples at a tiroe
dance in the center. Outside the main group, a few of us
were circled around Pete, taking turns reading through his
letter board, trying to figure out what he wanted. Cerebral
palsy happens at birth. If born with an inability to consciously
control one's body, including speech, it can be a
struggle to convince the world to take one's mind seriously.
Pete's body bas to be propped up in the wheelchair,
with both elbows tucked inside the armrests, or he slumps alarmingly to one side. His wrists are flexed 90 degrees. Pete could control only the direction of his eyes. Before he learned to read there must have been little communication.
On Saturday he had a good time, I gather, because he came again on Sunday, though against the wishes of his grandparents, his guardians. They are devout Christians, and Sunday is the day for church. Nonetheless, they allowed Pete to return for the middle part of Sunday's workshop.
Pete didn't want to go home. He wanted to explain that
we should call his aide and tell him to come at 6 rather wan at 4 p.m. But as interpreters we were too tired to keep this long sequence of letters in mind. Emery sat
pondering as several of us tried and failed. Suddenly he got it and said, "What about your grandparents? We'll have to phone."
Pete's excitement was contagious at this point He was grinning and sighting out his message: "Phone her, tell her I'll be home at 6. And hang up before she can answer."
It came to me to make that call. I could not follow Pete's script, though. I had been warned about the strength of personality of Pete's grandmother, and in the event my proposal of a two-hour extension for Pete was swept aside. Pete had to get ready for church. His driver was coming.
These aides are sometimes in delicate relationships. When Pete's aide learned what Pete wanted, he was torn between Pete's needs and rights, and the agreed arrangements. Pete was proposing to change that arrangement on his own, yet if the aide granted Pete that power, he would be dismissed, or in hot water, at least. Pete, at 19, is legally able to determine his own schedule. And grandparents might be old-fashioned, stuck in their ways, and over­ protective. But an agreement had been made.
Those engrossed with Pete and this issue, an island where time went by in the single letters of the complex story, were Emery, Alito, the aide, myself and a young woman named Gani. Though sympathetic to Pete's de­ sires, we were counselling a pragmatic approach: don't jeopardize your aide and stress your grandparent's generosity for just two more hours of fun. It could curtail future chances.
Gani, to her credit, said, "Having heard their advice, if
you still want to stay I'll support your decision."
Pete needed that support. Circumstances had deprived him of the power to execute his wishes. Friends counselled against his direction. But at least one person put Pete's wishes at top priority. Gani recognized his right to do a thing, albeit a rash one, and kept her focus right there, rather than looking sagely at the larger picture. When I returned from the phone call and told Pete what his grand­ mother said, Pete emitted a peculiar sound. It was a shriek through clenched teeth. The intensity of frustration was ominous, but quickly passed-on the outside.
Pete was invited to a last dance, and was lifted into the air by four dancers, and soon was smiling down at us as they paraded by. His aide allowed this little extra time, then Pete left; back to a world where there would be no parades, nor much movement at all. He would, we were told, be taken from bed in the morning to a couch, where
he would watch T.V. and his spasming legs would be tied to protect him from falling off. Or on fair days, he would be wheeled into the yard for airing and sunning, bis arms tucked inside the armrests of his chair. No wonder he enjoyed the movement this weekend.
I hope his tardiness didn't harm his relationship to his aide, or to Emery who had invited him. Emery believes Pete can live, as Emery does, in a place of his own with an aide. Knowing someone who believes this encourages Pete to try to achieve it. How does a person get from here to there but by belief? What encourages belief like the agreement of one's 'big brother'? Emery is important to Pete.
Until the last moment before DanceAbility began it was not clear that video coverage could be afforded. Tom Giebink, from Austin, agreed to exchange taping for participation and made a visual record of the weekend.
The tapes usually focus on a pair of dancers and some exciting moments were preserved. But beyond the immediate subjects the background extends like a savannah and
the event is rather like a wildlife film-herds on the Serengeti of Africa, with different animals grazing and interacting peacefully, young ones tripping through the foreground, encounters, withdrawals, peripheral activities.
This effect is heightened by the live music which was provided on Sunday by Suse Millimon. It was amplified voice and keyboard with long chords. The atmosphere it made was meditative and earthy.	.
To shoot the final meeting Sunday afternoon, Tom sat in
the center of the circle around which we all sat or squatted, hunkered down in. It was a moment for every voice to be heard, or read. People spoke up when there was silent space and they felt moved. Most participants thanked the other participants, and the organizers. It was difficult not to be a little teary inside. We had spent three days together and a warm bond had grown. Everyone had had fun, been treated with dignity; so we respected each other and felt an intense vicarious pleasure in each other's smiles and laughter.
A large family group was headed by the Klope -Owens,
a couple from Corvallis, Caucasian, who have 4 kids--at least 3 of whom were from India, two of whom were deaf, one of these with CP as well. He was Dana, a small 9
year-old.	.	.
Dana is a bit athatoid, like Emery, with bent wrists, and
is unable to stand alone. At some point Sunday morning Alito had placed him in my arms. He was a light bundle and felt fragile. During this dance I became hopelessly confused about Dana.
For one thing, he had frequent involuntary movement of
his head which was, in ordinary body language, 'no'. When he became excited he squealed. His smile was bright and handsome, but when be was asked a question, the effort of answering caused it to fade. The sort of
question I asked was, "Is this OK?" The smile would fade, the head shake 'no'.
When carried on my shoulder, he shouted, "Dad, Dad!" and shrilled a squeal. A bit insecure by this point, I assumed he was frightened. Later I discovered he just wanted his dad to see him, like most kids.
But most perplexing was an event which occurred mid­ dance. The enormous gymnasium was constructed with a raised center ceiling panel, and between this and one of the side panels a forlorn basketball was lodged, having soared and stuck. Lifting Dana high, I said, "Do you see that basketball?" and he immediately said, "How did it get there?"
So ordinary. Later I was told that Dana was deaf, and I never heard another sentence from him. It does sometimes happen; a state of grace slips in during an unconsidered moment, and clarity emerges. But when self-conscious or under social pressure, grace goes and communication is strained with the distortions and complications attending the affliction.
Penny used sign language with him, and we have on tape what I take as an interesting misunderstanding be­ tween them. Alito was dancing with Dana, and Penny chanced by. Alito asked her to ask Dana if what he was doing was OK.
She sign-mimed the question. Dana thought it over. His smile faded, his head shook from side to side, and with effort he made a sound To me it sounded affirmative.
Penny thought it was negative and asked if he wanted to go slower, if anything had hurt his body. Dana struggled
to reply. He had trouble coordinating 'yes' and 'no'. Now he had to convey that nothing hurt, and that he loved to fly.
Alito intuited what was going on and said, "Naw, he wants to go fast, don't you?" Dana grinned. So Alito, holding Dana in the cup of his belly, rocked over back­ wards, and continued to rock forward and back, higher and higher. Dana's smile got bigger and wider.
Later I saw Dana's father flying him. With his hands under Dana's arms, he swooped him up from the floor, circling him high into the air and back to the floor. This probably was what Dana was accustomed to.

As we were saying goodbye to each other in the final group circle, Dana's mother and father spoke for their kids. They thanked all of us who had touched their children's lives, and Mrs. Klopen-Owen thanked us all for giving her a day off. "We did hope that Dana would meet others like him. It isn't easy for a little guy with CP to find a role model. But luckily for him, Dana has found Emery, and has something for him."
And with that, Mr. Klopen-Owen held up Dana's arm.
Clutched in the small hand was a yellow scrap of paper. "His address!"
Dana's head was, for once, not wavering. His gaze was
fixed on Emery, and he grinned hugely as his arm was raised.
But then no one knew what to do. A protocol had been tacitly accepted not to give aid unnecessarily. So his parents did not convey the address, or Dana, across the circle to Emery. Dana fidgeted off of his father's lap, and a few feet beyond. Then his coordination failed him and he lay, limbs moving uselessly, still trying to get to Emery.
Emery was hip to it and reacted quickly. He heaved himself off the several friends he was draped across and heaved and rolled, just as in his solo, over the expanse of the gym floor.
No one moved to help him, either.
Spasmodically, grotesquely, Emery humped over to Dana. He attempted to take the paper, but a further problem emerged; neither he nor Dana could make their hands work to make the transfer. Emery's fingers were all coiling with effort, but not coordinating. Dana's hand could not unclench. Emery began to emit groans.
Failing to refine his motor effort, Emery tried to envelop Pana, address and all. Both were, at this point, on the floor at angles to each other and no available coordination created the cuddle which was intended. In the attempt, f:mery was flailing Dana with his wrists, and emitting involuntary roars of effort
Dana was mostly without expression, looking dazed. fortunately a smile appeared to reassure us viewers that he was not frightened by the energy directed at him. He might well have supposed that his role model was trying to devour him. Dana managed to unloose the note. It fell onto Emery's chest, then to the floor between them.
Emery knew he couldn't manage the finesse of picking a paper up from the floor, and rose unsteadily to his knees above Dana. His arms stretched out from his shoulders and his wrists bent down with fingers writhing like sea
anemones. He looked like a mad magician triumphantly incanting over his victim; or possibly about to topple on his victim.
But then, all these images are beside the point These are masks, the body language thrown up by CP, which cause a confusion in interpretation.
All Emery was trying to do was hug Dana, and this he managed, sort of. He rolled Dana up against his knees, then sank down beside him, pinned him with his forearm, and nuzzled Dana with his goatee. Dana grinned.
Finally someone from the circle spoke. "Will anyone describe what's happening for those who can't see?" It was the stuff of old Russian novels, or operas, or long silent films, but as I described it it flattened in my mouth into a street comer encounter. What a high failure of communication. Fifty-eight people saw a moment of dra­ ma, and the blind heard only the plot line. The sighted heard my pitiful effort, but only a couple of people spoke. Under the pressure of the moment we gave up and in silence felt the gaps between the senses.
Emery meanwhile was declaiming...something. "Songay ewiri whyyeahh ooeyer." "Someday," Emery was telling Dana, "we will ride bicycles together." 

A common Sense 
by Anne Kilcoyne & Steve Paxton

Peter is big and burly and in his fifties. He has virtually no sight, having been badly injured in a traffic accident. His sight loss was instantaneous and irreversible.  He could no longer work at his trade; he no longer had an income and he felt very depressed. He came to the contact improvisation workshop with some trepidation-he was  not  "artsy craftsy" and thought dancers were a peculiar and probably effeminate breed However, he thought he would give it a chance as a friend of his had spoken very  warmly  about  the  workshop. Having been athletic and interested in sports when he was sighted, he experienced no difficulty with the work. Over the five days, he began to enjoy himself, giving and receiving massage and learning to build up the skills that are basic to contact improvisation.
Towards the end of the workshop Peter was asked to contribute to some video-based research. At the start of the workshop, blind participants had been recorded walking the length of a gymnasium, finding a chair, sitting on it, and rising from it. They were asked to go through the same exercise at the end of the workshop; thus we are able to re­ cord objective changes in posture and gait.

Peter had in fact missed the initial session as he had joined the workshop late.  He is a very humorous man, and realizing the reasons behind the exercise he treated us to his version of a "bad walk" as he put it. What he gave was a hilarious Chaplinesque performance of the exercise: holding his cane ahead of him, he stumbled  his way  forward through the vast dark territory of the unseen gym, the blind cane then became a fencing sword and he fought his way through a duel with an imaginary foe. Victorious, his stick transformed into a horse which he sat astride and whipped into a gallop to the far end of the gym. Turning, he lurched  drunkenly  back towards the chair which he could not see but sensed the position of. Having reached it, he failed to sit on it, somersaulting his way through falls; and ultimately, threading his cane through the


back of the chair and hoisting it aloft
over his shoulders, he trudged off into
the proverbial sunset. Peter had found
improvisation and performance.
When the workshop finished Peter
broke down and wept with deep grief.
It was the fust time since his accident
several years before, that he had cried.
His tears were not only for his loss of
sight but also tears of appreciation at
having found a new level of experience.
This experience opened up the future
for him. He has since entered the Royal
National College, in Hereford, England
and qualified to become a masseur. He
has found direction and now expects to
combine his new-found skills in massage
with his old interests in sports and
sports injuries.
Peter is one of many blind people
who have come to contact improvisation
workshops that we have developed in
England over the last five years. These
workshops are designed to extend the
movement vocabulary and creative
experience of the visually challenged
and the professionals that work with
them. The blind who have danced with
us come from all walks of life. Some
have been blind from birth, others have
lost their sight in adulthood through
degenerative diseases, accidents and
diabetes. The professionals include
social workers, recreation officers,
teachers and dancers who work to make
dance accessible to disabled people;
most of the professionals are sighted but
a few of them are visually impaired.
If you are born without sight there are
profound implications for your physical
development as well as your social and
intellectual/cultural life. The blind
person is inhibited from freely moving
from one place to another by the fear of
falling over or bumping into things and
by a confusion in spatial orientation.
Those who are congenitally blind spend
much of their lives at home, sitting or
lying down. The paucity of the everyday
movements of walking, sitting down
and getting up means that the muscles
in their feet and legs do not develop
their potential. Through lack of use,
their muscles are underdeveloped, flaccid
and poorly toned. These characteristics
are also reflected in posture; the
torso is often limp, the head hanging
forward. The essential movement needs
of the body are often met by a gently
repetitive rocking motion in the seated

position. This rocking is generally
discouraged by family and professionals
as it is considered to be a 'blindism' - i.e., a movement or gesture which
is not found in the sighted world and
which is seen as a stigma.
In those people who have seen for
some years but lost their sight in adult
life there is another set of bodily responses.
These people do not generally
exhibit blindisms. Their gestural vocabulary
is consonant with that of the dominant
sighted culture, but their loss of
sight prohibits normal everyday movement.
The trauma and anxiety which
accompanies visual loss is reflected in a
chronic level of muscular tension which
is so habitual as to make muscular
relaxation a forgotten experience. They,
too, stand and wait for someone with
sight to guide them to another seat in
another room where they can safely
'park' their bodies.
Although there are some programs
of physical education available to the
blind these are mostly purely functional
and often mechanized. For example,
there is tandem cycling, or jogging a
course that is marked out by a rope
which the blind person can hold onto, or
the treadmill or weight lifting machines
that are available in a modem gym.
Whilst a few of the visually impaired
make great efforts to keep themselves in
trim by going to the gym, they generally
report a sense of boredom with the
repetitive and socially isolated nature of
many of the exercise regimes open to
them.
Contact improvisation seemed an
ideal activity for the blind, based as it is
in the natural physics of movement, in
human communication, and focused on
a touch-based learning path rather than
a • seeing and copying' mode endemic in
so many dance classes.
The inherently democratic nature of
contact improvisation makes it a particularly
good form for the so-called disabled
who deal continuously with disabling
social attitudes and relationships.
For example, Janee, who is partially
sighted, had left the workshop with
Rose, a sighted arts worker. They were
sitting in a car at a petrol station when
Rose was approached by a lady who
was collecting for charity. "How old is
she," the lady asked Rose assuming that
because Janee is blind she must also be
deaf and possibly intellectually retarded.
Janee answered her. "I am 24." The
woman continued to ignore her whilst
focusing on her. "Can't they do anything
for her," she persisted. "It's a
terrible shame... Still, labradors are
lovely dogs."
Even Fred Raffle, a man who has
risen to the top in the field of blind
education, and who was blind from.
birth, revealed that sighted co-professionals
could not stop their caring role.
This means that even though he is the
boss, he has to deal with paternalistic
attitudes which infantilize, patronize and
stigmatize. In the workshops however,
he found the politics more nearly equal,
feeling that through the contact improvisation
structures, he was met as himself,
rather than as a person with a disability.
The workshops which we have developed
are always "integrated" in the
sense that they include both sighted and
blind people who work in an equal
partnership as they learn contact improvisation
together.
A class in contact improvisation for
sighted people involves "pre-tuning" the
senses from the normal sighted dominance
to the sense of touch. In an
integrated class this occurs very consciously
because of empathy with a
blind partner. It can be an intense experience
to assume a state of mind in
which the visual world plays no part at
all in the reference systems. This shock
is a most salutary one, giving a high
contrast to the differences between one
sense, vision, and the other, touch.
Usually the transition from the visually
dominant world into the world of
touch is gradual, and the sighted student
senses the change less acutely than
when dancing with the blind. We have
seen students who resisted any empathic
connection however, leaving a dance
with a blind partner who then had to
stand in place waiting for aid. Or the
student who was so inattentive that after
a two week workshop, when asked to
run an exercise for the group, she realized
that she didn't know how to refer
to the blind group. In a loud aside to
Anne, she said, "What do you call
them?"
She had missed the point and the
opportunity of the workshop. The people
who have lost their sight have an
increased concentration in the other
senses, and working with a blind partner
is an education in touch 'density'.
Concentration of sighted students will
waver between touch and vision. The
concentration of the blind will not
waver.
Transmitting the principles of an
exercise to the class can be taxing. To
further the democratic ideal one attempts
to describe the positions in a
way that both populations can understand.
Even though an obvious point of
integration is for the visually able to see
the demonstration, to facilitate transmission
so that each of the blind can have
an example from which to learn by
touch, at the same time, one strives to
present careful, clear pictures in the
language. It is astonishing how quickly

the language itself flounders, however.
We have a personal reference system-' right and left', and the more objective 'north and south' or other external references. For the blind the most important of these is the personal sort of reference. If everyone is facing the same direction and reacting at the same time, then instructions go well. When things get a little chaotic, we've found that overly-general directions result in a number of different interpretations which, if not corrected, can lead to confusion and loss of confidence. Even when they are corrected, the time spent and tone of voice may feel overly technical. This taught us to use methodical steps, careful verbal introductions to any exercise, coupled with an attempt at a casual, conversational air.
For those who have no movement training and poor muscle tone, the physical approach has to be clear and soft This has called for an analysis of exercises to try to determine what exactly is suitable in this situation. The proportions and durations of things have to be considered. Relaxation and massage are brought in frequently. Exercises requiring just one part of the body to relax in isolation, such as 'floating the head' or 'arm drop', are very useful. Exercises which can strengthen longer connections between limbs and torso are used.

Apparently the real juice of the workshops which include the blind is the contact improvisation itself.  It is this which produces the feelings of self­ empowerment, joy and satisfaction. There are deeply felt, difficult emotions and painful social configurations which accompany the loss of a person's sight; however, our working contract is physical rather than psychotherapeutic.  In these workshops, as in all other contact improvisation sessions, the teaching focuses on the issues of weight, mass, gravity, leverage and movement design. In the teaching, we acknowledge connections between emotions and muscular tensions, but formal space for the ex­ pression of emotions is reserved for the closing process of the workshops.

Peter's catharsis was the most extreme that we have seen and occurred within the formal structuring of the closing phase.
Although many others have moist eyes and sometimes tears, the most fully and frequently expressed feelings are overwhelmingly positive.  Objectively we can see that the emotional landscape is accompanied by a changed physicality-improved complexions, relaxed features, lowered shoulders, alert posture, more confident gait and increased animation. The participants' own improvisations have provided the means whereby these changes have taken place.


Helix by Steve Paxton
Rolling on the floor provides a way to examine
structural forms in the body.
An example of such a form lies in the intertwining
spirals noticed in the play of left and right and forward
and back basic to normal walking.
If you take a step and continue the oppositions in the
body to an extreme, you can see two spirals circling
around each other.
And if the next step is taken to an extreme, the spirals
reverse.

When this form is taken to the floor the energy of the
extreme twist of the body promotes a coil which can be
rolled with no apparent effort. This is done with the
spiral initiated either at the top with the hand; and arms,
or with the toes, feet, and legs at the bottom.
In these spiral rolls, a single initiation of energy flows
into the most extreme spiral the body can achieve and
the roll continues as long as the shape is maintained. The
movement stems from changes of weight inside the body
as different surfaces of the spirals are rolled upon.
The less extreme alternating helixes of walking also
permit movement initiation from different place, in the
body, but in practice just a few such options are
integrated into an habitual walk. The other options wither
with disguise. Turning this basic form onto its side causes 
many parts of the body to extend and take responsibility 
for the roll.
Crescent rolls come in 5 varieties,
The premise: a body shaped like a
banana, arced from top to toe, and
maintaining this exterior shape
relative to gravity while rolling along
the floor, In this form the left and
right sides of the body stay closer to
parallel than in the previous spiral
form, The rolling choices are: head
lifted, head and feet lifted, middle
lifted, And two in which the whole
body is stretched along the floor:
rolling toward the points of the arc
or toward the bend of it.
These rolls are viewed as a set
because of their external form; the
coordinations for their execution are
different as the relations hip of the
shape to gravity changes. The first
roll provides a good stretching for
the short muscles at the joining of
the sides of the pelvis to the upper
torso, and a good stretch for the
abdominals. The arms are used on
the floor, so great strength is not
needed in the lower back. The
second and third rolls are
outstanding whole-body toners, and
are fairly advanced work,
muscularly. The last two were
spotted in the dance works of
Simone Forti, the American
choreographer, and don't require as
much strength, but provide one of
the unusual coordination problems
in the annals of human locomotion.
Exploring form in these nine rolls
has several advantages. Fear of
falling does not interfere with
learning. The sensations found in the
exercise are unusual: we rarely
notice these singular forms in our
daily movement, but in these rolls
we can hardly miss the basic
forms- the helix and the turning
crescent.
These forms give the spine itself a
workout, as well as the muscles and
attachments of the spine. The point
is that there are sensations in the
body of the spine itself, in the discs.
This rather dull lot of feelings along
the length of the spine can best be
identified in the lumbar, where a
vague pinching sensation may
accompany the backbend.
Once the quality of sensation in
the spine is found, it can be noticed
in the course of the rolls. It then
begins to make new sense to speak
of 'the spine'. A prerequisite to this
discovery is relaxation, as tension
masks sensation and maintaining it
requires wasted effort. Once the
feeling in the spine has been
located, one can more accurately
stretch the circling arms through the
upper spine at the center of the
back, or align points on the spine to
discover new postures.
Sighted people start to learn these
rolls by seeing them. For those
having difficulty in translating what
they 've seen into what to do, hands-on
is most useful, with verbal aids.
Blind people I work with learn the
rolls by feeling with their hands and
are further assisted by hands-on and
verbal aids. When the blind then
direct the efforts of the sighted, they
tend to teach by hand. They convey
the principles, and the sighted
person can visualize what is meant.
In teaching, one can transmit the
basic spiral forms visually, verbally,
and kinesthetically. Each of these
transmissions is effective, but touch
is the keystone of the work.


''FALL
AFTER
NEWTON"
TRANSCRIPT
by Steve Paxton
When an apple fell on his head, Isaac Newton was inspired to
describe his three laws of motion.
These became the foundation of our ideas about physics. Being essentially
objective, Newton ignored what it feels like to be the apple.
When we get our mass in motion, we rise above the constant call of
gravity toward the swinging, circling invitation of centrifugal force.
Dancers ride and play these forces. 
Beyond Newton's third law, we discover that for every action several
equal and opposite reactions are possible. Therein lies an opportunity for
improvisation.
We are looking at performance of Contact Improvisation, a duet movement
form. This tape takes a sweeping look over 11 years of practice y
Nancy Stark Smith, from her first exposure to the form I was working o
when it was new in 1972, through moments chosen from consecutive
years of performing with me, Steve Paxton, and with others.
Nancy solos by testing her movement, playing with gravity and the
floor, which are, in this work, not taken for granted, but are considered
constant partners. She doesn't direct herself-she starts moving and then
lets it happen, finding ways to cope with momentum and gravity.
Here, in 1976, Nancy and her partner Curt Siddall move to follow the
point of touch as it moves-a basic focus for their improvisation. In the
play of moving and being moved, specific movements are unpredictable
but they occur within a knowable field-of gravity, centrifugal force. support and dependency.
Human touch unites the forces which act upon the body, with the sensations 
they provoke within the body. This interaction makes it possible
keep all the parts of both their bodies harmonizing.
They were not so adventurous 4 years earlier. In this first performance
of Contact Improvisation, they were getting used to moving by touch. By,
feeling their way, they brought back clues about the form and abo
themselves and their perceptions.
The performance which attracted Nancy to this form
was a high energy study called Magnesium. I made
Magnesium for a group of men at Oberlin College in
1972. It investigated the reflexive quality of touch with
momentum, falling, rolling and colliding.
Magnesium ends with five minutes of standing to
draw a great distinction in the scale of movement.
Standing still is not actually "still. " Balancing on two
legs demonstrates to the dancer's body that one moves
with gravity, always. Observing the constant adjustments
the body makes to keep from falling calms the whole being.
It is a meditation. It is watching the reflexes at
work, knowing they are subtle and dependable-not just
emergency measures.
Standing became one of our disciplines, keeping the
Mind attentive to the body's present moment. This simple
practice was preparation for the complex interactions
that would arise with a partner. As were the throwing
and catching practices that called for instant response,
introducing ourselves to adrenalized states.
 At first, there seemed to be only two options-trying
to follow the flow of communication or resisting it.
Each dance is a series of on-the-spot decisions. And
they are on the spot. The soft skin is alert to the points
of. contact, signals telling the dancers where they are
orienting them to their partner and the floor.
Their perceptions are stretching. They are adrenalized.
Inside their minds, the many touch events and constantly
changing relationships blend into a continuity of moving
masses which creates a logic reached only in the
eat of the dance. A logic as secure as that found when
standing alone and watching the reflexive dance of
one's bones.
Higher momentum brings new areas of risk. In order
to develop this aspect of the form we had to be able to
survive it. The support needed from the unconscious
reflexive parts of the brain is more present when the
conscious mind is not afraid. The calmness of standing
extended into the fall.
There are hazards. One of them is thinking ahead.
What the body can do to survive is much faster than
thought.
It is useful to re-train the reflexes to extend the limbs,
rather than contract them during a fall. During this very
disorienting fall, Nancy's arms manage to cradle her
back, and this spreads the impact onto a greater area.
and she doesn’t  stop moving. That helps to disperse the
impact over a slightly longer time. She doesn't seem
bothered.
. Taking a  brief scan through time, we begin with the
first  duet in which I danced fast with Nancy, dancing
With abandon and thrust to get into momentum. It seems
rough and disorienting for her, but she was up for it.
One year later, the sensation of movement was more
continuous, the flow of movement longer. There was
more time to feel what was happening.
While in contact, we attend to our own reflexes, which
have been stimulated by the other's movements. Our
reflexes move us, and this causes our partner to move.
This cycle of movement responses is continuous and
forms the basis of the dialogue.
When physical safety could be assumed at a more instinctive
level, we were free to play with time and the
subtleties of touch. Phrases of movement could be extended
indefinitely when we no longer needed to stop
and check our situation.
By 1978 we had examined the timing of the body on
its own for six years, and began searching for ways to
change our habitual patterns. Using music was one of
these ways. For this performance, Collin Walcott played,
incorporating the random sounds of our movement into
his drumming. We danced to his rhythm, and he played
to ours.
During periods of extended soloing, we each expect
physical contact at any moment. We wait for the moment
of decision to be taken by our partner or by
ourselves.
Over the years, the principles underlying our movement
remain the same. As the senses expand into
spherical space and the muscular system learns to respond
to touch on any surface of the body, any point can
be the fulcrum for leverage and continuity.
Nancy and I have danced with many other partners of
varying backgrounds and skills. Each partner posed their
own kinetic puzzles which were danced through, contributing
new elements to the body of work, the network
of Contact Improvisation.
The main focus of training is retuning the senses. It
isn't just the sense of touch which must be expanded,
but all the senses must become elastic enough to
navigate through spherical space, to handle any position,
any change of acceleration.
It seems that what has emerged is two bodies acting
as one within the domain of the physical forces. Newton
proposed ideas about the forces and their interaction. In
addition, Contact deals with ideas or images which are
sensations first, then felt by the mind.
Every person who has danced Contact Improvisation
taught their variation to their partners. This network
spreads information among us.
As a member of the first generation to study Contact
Improvisation, Nancy not only learned it but helped to
define it by the direction her training took her. When she
began, no one knew what sort of body would result from
the practice, nor what properties would be developed.
We have seen the first Contact event Nancy saw,
Magnesium. This piece must have left an impression
upon her, which in turn must have been altered by the
development of the duet form.
We have been able to see Nancy's physical change in
the early years of her study, and the development of her
performance style. In looking at performance footage
mainly, we have seen little of the daily work, but have
seen the public forums in which Contact Improvisation
became widely defined. In looking at Nancy's development
over 11 years, we've seen one strand of the
physically rigorous and interwoven structure of Contact
Improvisation
An important aspect of Contact Improvisation is the
pleasure of moving, and the pleasure of dancing with
somebody in a very spontaneous way. It happens in a
framework which considers the body in all its variety as
the primary focus from which the mind can draw. With
this, the dance is refinable to ever more precise relationships
with the physical forces.



Trance script Judson Project Interview with Steve Paxton conducted by Nancy Stark Smith 
[Preparatory phone conversation. Steve is being hypnotized.]
Steve: Hello Mr. Cody? …Hi, Steve Paxton here. Alright. We’re set up here, ready to go. Yeah…I’m sitting down… Well we’re not set up for it. It wouldn’t be hard to set up though. Would you, would you rather I was lying down? Ok. I’m in a comfortable chair…Yeah…How what?...I’m, I’m forty-one…Well, I want to go back, I mean, my age?...Yeah, 1961 through ’65 let’s sy…Yeah. Right foot…Shall I try it again?...Ok…ok, so left hand over left foot. Right hand…with the thumb in the arch, right? About halfway down, right? Then right hand goes over, so the fingertips meet at the bottom…
In 1980, several members of the
Judson Dance Theater were interviewed
on video for the Bennington
College Judson Project (directed by
Tony Carruthers and Wendy Perron).
Steve Paxton said he really
couldn't remember much about the
Judson days and suggested he be interviewed
under hypnosis. The interview
was conducted in North
Bennington, Vermont on September
12, 1980, with Nancy Stark Smith
interviewing and Lisa Nelson and
others videoing. What follows is excerpted
from that interview,
transcribed by John Fiscella. For
more information on the Judson
Project Videotapes, write Bennington
College Judson Project, c/o
Tony Carruthers, Bennington College,
Bennington, Vermont 05201.
[Eds.]

STEVE: I remember I was living in
New York City way downtown.
Just joined a dance company, was
learning dances and beginning to
make dances. Want me to imagine
it or do you want a print-out?
NANCY: What do you have in
mind?
Steve: Right now it's just remembering
going to Judson Church the
evening, late afternoon, of an audition
so that Al Carmines could
determine if we could do a performance
there. Remembering Ruth
Emerson, Yvonne Rainer, Bob
Dunn, myself, going and showing a
couple of dances. Al being sort of
amused behind a straight face, watching
these people go through their
thing. Seems like the weather was
warm, sunny day, but late afternoon
and not so late in the year that
there wasn't a little bit of cool in the
shadows. The old Washington
Square kind of dirty, everything
very dirty and, you know, papers all
around and Popsicle sticks and people
hanging out on benches. Going
into this dirty old church, elegant
church really, but pigeon shit, and
going up the stairs, finding our way
through the labyrinth up to the
auditorium. Tacky linoleum floor.
Getting undressed behind the curtain,
putting on tights, taking the
shoes off, that kind of thing.
Nancy: What was the feeling between
you and Yvonne and Ruth
and the other performers? What
was the ambiance?
Steve: We'd known each other for
a couple of years working with Bob
Dunn in these composition classes,
and working in certain technique
classes together.
Nancy: What were you working on
at that time?
Steve: I was onto a couple of different
streams of thought.
Pedestrian movement -walking,
standing, sitting. Pedestrian actions,
of which I wanted only those that
would be, couldn't be construed as
symbolic-you know, eating
something or-can be construed but
it was meant to be done in such a
way that it was nothing more than
itself. And I was interested in a scale
of movement that went from ordinary
into technical, because that's
what was happening in my life. I
suppose I just took that as a model.
Nancy: What were some of the concerns
of the other people at the
church at that time?
Steve: Ruth Emerson was approaching
dance in a highly mental
way. She was very tall with long
limbs, kind of loped and looped
around the space. Face very calm.
She has a kind of New England look
about her, severe hair pulled back
small eyes. Mouth that smiled widely 
but mostly just talked straight.
And she made the e dance, with a
fairly relaxed energy, but a lot of
mental energy behind them.
Yvonne, as I remember,  showed a
dance in which he had excerpted or
put into it a pose from a Gauguin
painting which repeated, several
times, in order, as she put it in a
class one night, to establish it in
memory by repetition. Bob Dunn
was sort of dithery and quiet, you
know. Hardly ever gave direct
response to anything. Seem to
remember him being the same way
there. Carmines was, as I said,
slightly amused, but didn't know us
well enough to express it. Is that,
the answer, something like that,
what you wanted?
Nancy: That's fine. What happened
during that period that particularly
moved you or changed
your way of looking at things?
Steve: There were a number of
those. First flashed into my mind,
after a fairly intense technique class
that Merce had given in the studio
people used to, he would, you
know, depart to his dressing room
and people would trickle out. And
after most people had trickled out
I remember watching Simone Forti
crawling on the floor. Slowly crawling
around. I'm sure she was sort of
re-establishing some kind of contact
with the earth and basic movement
after the high-flown technique that
she'd been attempting. But it was
shocking to see in that studio
somebody crawl after all this flitting
around on half-toe and balancing
and high legs. All this aerial, uplifting,
high-rise dancing, see
somebody get down there and really,
just crawl. Her hair hanging over
her head and hiding her face and
her body just lumping along: you
know, no effort at grace, or "grace."
Trisha made a number of dances
at that time that were kind of surprising.
One of them was called
Lightfall. Had a handstand in it and
a gentle, easy use of energy.
Beautiful little dance. I say "little"
because it had the sense of miniature
and intimacy about it.
Yvonne's work was often
arresting.
Nancy: In what way?
Steve: They were well-made, formally,
performed with great concentration
and a kind of stolid
movement quality. She has a square
body and the whole thing just gets,
her whole performance mode in
those days seemed to verge on being
primitive and architectural in
the body-square angles, triangles,
circles made with arms or
something like that, but everything
having this very determined quality. 
Her determination was really
quite powerful. The solidity, the
sense of groundedness in her movement.
She was one of those people
that, I believe it was Cunningham
said she'll never be a dancer. That
kind of thing, you know. Absolutely
the wrong body, absolutely the
wrong quality of energy for what
was fashionable then in dance
companies.
Nancy: Is there something of that
quality of doing what seemed not
meant to be, not following the usual
order that was part of the Judson
experiment or the Judson mentality,
do you think?
Steve: Not only the Judson mentality,
but the mentality of practically
the entire circle, a quite wide or intricately
knit society at that time. I
mean making new work, work that
had not been seen before, creating
new events, _seemed to be a primary
concern of fifty or sixty people that
one could sort of run into in a week.
The permissions were quite
extravagant.
Nancy: This included painters and
musicians ... ?
Steve: It included painters, musicians,
poets, whole theater companies,
individual dancers dance
companies, composers, people that
you didn't know what they did
because they'd never done anything
but they were hanging around and
interested, and interested in what
was happening. Museum directors
galleries ...There was in Judson
itself definitely a scene promoting
adventure in form and content.
It was a composition class that
the Judson came from, and the compositions
that we studied as part of
that class were related to chance
procedures and obscure pieces of
music with odd forms and, I mean,
less obscure now, but in those days
at least to me, relatively unknown.
So I would think that what the
premise of the Bob Dunn class was,
was to provoke untried forms, or
forms that were new to us, each person's
own adventure in that way. I
turned out an incredible amount of
real bullshit in those days but in
some ways important experiments
for me personally although for
nobody else, and that took place in
the class. Things that I wanted to
try because they were outrageous in
the context of that class, you know.
Somehow felt like that permission
existed to see what that meant, but
it wasn't really a focus, on the other
hand, of the work that I wanted to
do. It was more like entertaining the
class or, you know, playing games
of that sort with the permissions
that existed.
But there came one work which
I performed, Proxy, it was named
Proxy, that was the beginning of a
very different attitude. That was
what I performed on the first Judson
concert, Proxy. A very different
attitude for me in which I was totally
behind it and wanted to avoid as
much as possible having anything
influence that work. You know, I
didn't want it costumed or set
designed or lit or anything else, except
on its own terms. So in a way
I think that, for me at least, the
Robert Dunn classes were a way to
get down to what I meant by form
or what interested me as form and
to discover form as an entity in its
own right and not confuse it with
other aspects of compositional, you
know, other compositional
requirements.
Like, you can compose with
numbers, and then you have no
"content" except quantity. You can
compose with people and then
you've got so much mind-boggling
content in a person that you have
to have a filter of some sort, or an
aesthetic, to produce what it is that
manifests the form. Now some people
would try to use, mess around
with the form to manifest the content
in a certain way. Somehow I
took the opposite tack. I was interested
in manifesting the form and
letting the content adjust. In so far
as you can rearrange these things,
that’s what I was aiming for.
Nancy: What was the form that you
were working with in Proxy?
Steve: I was trying to solve a problem 
that I sensed was posed by
Cunningham and Cage's work, in
which they use chance procedures
with selected materials. I was trying
to find some distance from that
selection-of-materials process. This
isn't true totally of their work, but
of the work that we had been messing
around with in class at that time
it was true.
Nancy: It seems as though the fact
that you were working with Cunningham
during this period very
much influenced the kind of experiments
that you needed or 
wanted to perform at Judson. How
did you see those two situations
working together?
Steve: Well, I think I felt like there
were plenty of ideas to be explored
and I didn't need to go on exploring
Cunningham an1 Cage's and
presenting it as anything that I was
doing. You know, I didn’t_ have to
use a Cage music form, for instance,
and build a dance around it and call
it my work. And didn't want to use
music at all as a matter of fact
because I sensed that that was
somebody else's work and that I
would be taking their time structure
or at least having it influence my
work. So tried to strike into areas
where I did not know the ... the
form. Or where there was ~o aspect
of the form that I was pulling along
with me in order to make the
manifestation.
Steve: The classes, the Judson
workshops, happened once a week
and after an the class was formally
stopped, workshops continued on,
first on St. Mark's Place in Jimmy 
Waring and Aileen Passloff's studio,
and then later in the Judson gymnasium.
Anybody could come and
show work. Anybody could come
and watch. And out of those were
selected works for performance on
the, in the concerts.
Nancy: Who selected?
Steve: The group that was interested
in presenting work. We produced
fairly long performance.
Sometimes we cut for, cut people’s
works because of that. Like if they
wanted to present three works,
sometimes we asked them only to
present two. Or if we really didn’t
like a work we would say, I don’t
feel that's a strong work. Why don’t
you do something else." That kind
of discussion.
Nancy: Do you feel there was s me
kind of hierarchy going on there?
Steve: I'd say there were a lot of
hierarchies going on. There was the
official way we did business which
was Quaker method agreement.
There was who was just a strong
talker and discusser of issues. There
was who made work that knocked
everybody else out. There was who
made work that was unpopular.
There was a mixture of things going
on that sort of balanced each
other. I wouldn't ay that there was
a hierarchy though. I'd say there
was a lot of power things mixing in
and out.
Nancy: Was your work popular?
Steve: My work was very
unpopular.
Nancy: Why?
Steve: Because it was tedious.
Nancy: How was it tedious?
Steve: It didn't move ... fast. It
moved at a pedestrian pace. It didn't
surprise anybody. There were no
surprises in it. It was all very ordinary.
In fact, that was maybe the
surprise and the humor of it, was
how ordinary it was in the face of
the glamour of Cunningham and
the speed and the pacing and the
Rauschenberg costumes and the
Chernavitch lighting and, you
know, all the sparkle that could be
generated. The Cage music and the
brilliance of Tudor and Cage's
presentation of that music, and the
brilliance of the dancers in that
company. All of that dazzle. I mean
it was dazzle. It was high-class
goods and I'm not putting it down
or saying it was in any way a
pretense. But it was, at the same
time, stunning, a stunning
experience.
So when, in my pieces, people
would come out in what would be
ordinary for a dancer, generally
leotards and tights in those days.
Probably tennis shoes. Walk around
a lot. Nothing was, there was very
little momentum to the work, you
know. There was no, nothing to get
a kinetic kick out of unless you were
interested in looking at ordinary
walking, ordinary standing still.
They were complex compositions,
but they didn't take you to, they
wouldn't take you on kinetic highs
at all. Whereas other people were
doing that. Dramatic and kinetic
highs, were fairly common, or conceptual
highs, you know. You could
look at it and think, "Clever idea."
Nancy: Was that the response from
the other Judson people or from the
audiences?
Steve: From the audiences. A few of
the other Judson people didn't like
the work that I was doing. But some
did, which was nice because it, I
mean, it's sort of a tender state
when you first start to do
choreography and the encouragement
was useful to balance out
what else was happening.
Nancy: Were people just bored with
it, or what? Did they get angry?
What was ... ?
Steve: They were provoked and
bored. They were angry and bored.
Nancy: What was your response to
that?
Steve: I found certain of those Judson
performances among the most
embarrassing moments of my life.
Although I felt very strongly that the
work was good, the experience of
presenting the work was emotionally
painful.
Nancy: Because it was unpopular?
Steve: Yeah. Because people would
boo and shout.
Nancy: What was important and
good about it, that would override
for you those feelings of
embarrassment?
Steve: It had to do with invisibility.
The ordinary is, in a sense unvisible, 
invisible, because it’s ordinary.  
The senses tune it out. It’s not, you don’t need to notice it. You 
don’t need to see it. What you do need to see your senses then are 
excited by and you respond to with 
vivid feeling. You know, like a car 
coming around the corner, you notice it. Or, if somebody’s wandering 
into danger you, suddenly pick 
up a feeling that something’s about 
to happen - a child getting close to 
the street, or somebody walking
under a ladder, that old thing. 
Anyway ... what I thought was
that one spends so much time in 
one's body ignoring it, being with 
other focuses. And I was real interested 
to see, to examine and to 
question what was going on when 
one was doing this activity that was 
really setting one’s set most of the 
time. I might spend five or six hours 
a day working on my body and 
working on dance, working on
movement, working on momentum
and balance and ability to turn and
ability to bend myself into odd
shapes and all that. And yet all the
rest of the time my body was just
carrying on by itself and I became
really interested to see what was
happening on that level. I felt it was
important.
Nancy: Well, was it important to
perform that? Could you not do
that in a studio somewhere? What
was the connection between experiencing
those things and performing
them?
Steve: Cleaning house, I suppose.
How many ideas can you keep in
your head at once? How do you
abet the flow of thought through
your mind without, without feeling
like you've lost some of the basis of
what you're thinking. I think performing
helps solidify those ideas
because of the power of performance
and the inevitability of what
you've done once it's been seen by
a group of people. The sort of karmic
union that you all have
establishes in the flux and flow of
event and time a moment that you
can return to, at least, you can
relocate in some kind of, as some
kind of gesture, there's some
reference to it in the group that
you're with, and have the
idea ... jelled for a group of people.
And then, in some way, that frees
you a little bit from the karma of
that, that's finished, and you can
then go on and continue the flow.
It's a ceremonial situation in that
sense.
Nancy: Where did that work flow?
What was the next pool of it?
Steve: Well, Proxy was a presentation
of photo scores which the
dancers interpreted themselves.
Directed sections where they did
very ordinary actions, and the
reason they had to be directed at all
was so they would keep them ordinary
instead of glamourizing
them. And then the overall form
was chunks of different shaded
materials, but all within the realm
of the ordinary. It was like just examining
a spectrum of materials.
Subsequent works dealt further
with ordinary materials and put
them in certain other kinds of 
circumstances – ordinary movement
as ritual, ordinary movement as 
manipulated fragments, or sections 
perhaps related symbolically to
other ideas, you know. Like the idea of an explosion being one that 
occurred three times. And basically 
what happened was that the people 
just walked – from a fairly tight 
group they walked. to a scattered
group back to a tight group. So
there they were just walking, but
there was this sense of inflation
perhaps and decompression or
something, or compression, as they
came into the center.
Nancy: Can you remember, get any
other pictures?
Steve: I'm deflating a plastic room
with a vacuum cleaner. It's the first
piece on the program in the gym. I
think it' the third concert. I’m standing
inside what was a large square
plastic bubble with arms and legs
sticking out of one corner, one part 
of the cube. And it’s deflating very 
slowly because vacuum cleaners, I 
discovered, are not the most 
efficient way to do it. Anyway, it was 
deflating, it’s sucking the air out. I 
was having to keep the plastic,
which was a very light-weight plastic, 
from flowing into the vacuum cleaner, you know, and 
getting all hung up. And as the thing
deflates it becomes a kind of big,
baggy elephant skin costume with
arms and legs. And I walk out of the
door.
WENDY PERRON: Can you say
something about the humor of the 
period? Was there a particular kind
of humor that was prevalent then 
that typified the times?
Steve: Well my humor was real
deadpan. Like I thought Proxy was
pretty funny. If I saw somebody
walking across, the stage, that was
pretty funny, but not in an
uproarious way. Just in a gently
humorous way.
Cunningham's humor was articulate
and incredibly visually
humorful. Antic Meet is the piece
that I'm thinking of right now, and
it was very carefully paced, very
carefully concocted ... Anyway, a
takeoff and an exploration in
humor that, that made me laugh for
the first ten or twenty times I saw
it and kept me chuckling through
hundreds of performances of it. I
thought it was a beautifully made
piece of humor.
Yvonne's humor was abrupt and
sort of self-undercutting like pratfall,
like Keaton, like .. . straight-faced
ridiculousness but then with
that stolidity that I was talking
about. That kind of well-grounded,
you know, quality.
Trisha's humor wasn't so apparent
in her work at that time. It
has become apparent in this last
decade, but at that time I felt like
it was more hidden.
Many works were humorless.
Many works tried to be humorful,
tried to be funny, but weren't.
Those were really distressing
moments for everybody. The
humor of the period . . . The humor
of the period was ... extraordinarily
broad-ranged, very well-educated
among many people who hadn't
had much education, but had sorta
picked up on a lot of stuff, lot of
material. Mental collagists.
Nancy: What was your relationship
to Yvonne during that period?
Steve: After the first Judson concert
I think I told her for the first time
that I really dug her work, and she
responded in kind. We were sort of
allies, sort of, sometimes arguing
and bickering a lot about work and
ideas and things like that, but mostly
having a really good time and
everybody was incredibly
productive.
I think when you're setting out to
do work it helps to turn out as much
work as you can so you don't get
too involved in any one issue or any
one thing, but quickly try to grow
to a fairly broad spectrum relationship.
And by that I mean a personal
relationship, so that your, your ego
isn't only manifest through the one
work. I went on working in that
vein until the end of the '60s, and
by that time I had accumulated so
much potential other stuff to do - you
know, I mean just go on walking
and walking and walking - and
meanwhile noticing all the potential
that is inherent in basic movement.
How everything... just watching
the structure of the body do it and
do it and do it and you begin to
notice little quirks and try it.
Also there were a couple of other
influences. After Cunningham and
a lot more ballet and all that, there
was aikido and a little bit of Tai
Chi, a little bit of yoga. There were
a lot of, I mean, I began to see the
potential in a broader way. So Contact
[Improvisation] comes out of
finally allowing the potential, my
potential for movement to ... move
in a different and much more inclusive
and extraordinary way.
I think when you get into a high
creative state and other people are
in that same state and you're sharing
programs and work and things
together, there is . . . you're touching
in a very intimate way and it's a
great, great bond so no further
words were needed. Contact is a
sort of different story because we're
not, the creative work is always the
same. It's always exploration of the
moment. It's always, What is appropriate
to that moment? I mean,
you have a wide variation in
answers to that question, but that
is always the question. It's sort of,
is it appropriate or not, was it appropriate,
what other options
manifest?
So I sensed that although there is
a . . . connection between people
who've done Contact, and shared
those experiences, that it isn't of the
mental order, by and large, that the
Judson situation was. It isn't that
kind of creativity. It's creativity of
another sort. It isn't mental so much
as it is submental. You know, if the
forebrain is what we're talking
about as mental, thoughtful action.
Even in Judson, I was the one who
was doing the submental work, so
I guess it's natural I would be involved
in Contact.
Nancy: What quality of the Judson
period would you want to experience
again sometime? Not in a
trance, but in the world, in the
present?
Steve: It was the deepness of
everybody's commitment to forging
new forms. And the flashes that
happened. Like when you got
Merce's ideas and John's ideas that's
two real potent forces in the
thing-next to the Living Theater,
which was another real potent mix
in the social scene, you got clarity
and chaos in two different versions.
It produced some amazing connections
for me. You get Simone Forti
, you know, crawling on the floor
after a Cunningham class. You get
the kind of connection that's still
amazing to me. The kind of thing,
one kind of discipline where you
take the body and train it and inch
it further and further and further
along the aesthetic path until it gets
to be doing things that are
superhuman and unique in the
world, you know. And that's one
way.
And the other way is looking
deeper and deeper within the evolutionary
pathways through which
people develop and try to fix on that
and understand what happens in
early childhood as Simone was very
interested in. What happens in, you
know, to the fetus in infancy and
early childhood and ... a whole
way of looking at the person not as
a tool, an aesthetic tool, but rather
an organic part of the earth.
Nancy: How is it for you now?
Steve: I don't feel the same kind of
conceptual energy around. It's probably
around someplace. I'm in
touch with other kinds of energy
now. I'm in touch with crafts and
usefulness and design for efficiency
in a lot of different areas, like comfort,
warmth, you know. I'm in volved
with, after many, many
years of completely ignoring the
normal world and only being involved
in making new forms and artistic
endeavors, suddenly now confronting
a very modest physical
world formal question and trying to
solve it myself, you know.
Nancy: How and why do you continue
using dance as your vehicle?
Where's the support, and where is
the inspiration?
Steve: You asked me earlier why I
wanted to perform these things. I
think you get inspiration from the
world somehow, and it's good to
recycle it, good to put out whatever
it is you've mulled over. And to me,
that's what keeps the, it's like the
economy, you know, the artistic
currency, keep it flowing. So why
I'm still involved in dance is because
dance has given me quite a lot to
consider. I'm still considering it. I'll
probably go on considering it
because these questions don't go
away, you know, like what the person is, 
what it's capable of. And a 
lot of, lot of ways of tackling those questions.
Nancy: Was there a last performance
 of the Judson Church Dance Theater, 
or an event that signaled 
a change away from the Church?
Steve: Well, Jill Johnston at h
Village Voice became the official 
spokesman, made herself the official
spokesman for that group of people.
And she declared at some point in
'64 to '65 that it was over. You 
know, it was through. When you
tell, I mean that's quite a heavy 
thing to do because when you tell
the entire readership of the Village Voice
that an artistic movement is 
over without really consulting the
artists or anything, It’s just your
perception, then you got a whole lot
of people believing that it's over.
And so if you, I mean I, thinking
that it was still going on, suddenly
confronted all this negative energy
you know. It was, it was a pretty
amazing situation. I had thought it
was just fine. [laughter]
Nancy: So was that kind of
demoralizing or deflating?
Steve: I think it killed it.
Nancy: Huh.
Steve: I think it meant that people
would look at a Judson poster from
then on, not give it a second glance
you know. "Yeah they're still doing
it. Well, what else is happening?"
" It's dead. Jill told us it was dead ."
Nancy: [laughter] Oh dear.
Steve: Maybe these things shouldn't
go on too long. I mean, in a way,
that's the old phoenix ... phoenix
cycle.


Hier-Visibility 
By Steve Paxton 
Let me see. I gather egalitarianism
and hierarchy are opposed in the tit le
of Cynthia Novack's columns in the last
"Still Moving" section [" Egalitarianism
and Hierarchy in Contact Improvisation,"
CQ Vol. XIII no. 3]. I fear a trip
has been laid on us by some free-associating 
dance critic who once
described CI as more democratic than
other dance forms. I sort of remember
that line getting picked up by subsequent
reporters-free-wheeling, dance
for folk, etc., that kind of image arising
uncensored, unexamined and
perhaps unverified. In fact, until
Novack questioned me recently, I don 't
recall any of the many dance writers
asking about this point.
Egalitarianism resulted in democracy,
our 'form' of government. This was opposed
to monarchy-Geo Washington
was offered the monarchy for the states
of America I once learned. So that sort
of hierarchy was avoided by democratic
government. But a hierarchy, a temporary 
one, is what we use to run the
country.
I believe I agree with Dumont's thesis.
Agreeing on values creates constraints
on individual directions. And humans
are a communicating animal-we get
jerked out of our path by far more subtle
events than agreeing on values.
Sometimes for good, sometimes for ill.
A pause, a glance will do it. 
I have noticed that hierarchies are
noticed by those outside them. This suggests
that those who make them up a re
to some degree ignorant of that fact, or
even that they are projected on a group,
or faction or gathering, or team, or
committee' by someone who perceives
the association as hier-. Or rather,
higher.

Now no one in these stories in dead; 
Zimmer, Elias, Ryan, Harwood or myself; it would be possible to ask some direct questions of all of us. For instance, who organized the situation Zimmer attended? I’ll bet Ryan had a hand in it. Harwood and Ryan are both movers and shakers in the Canadian Contact Improv. scene and it seems to me no Contact sense could exist without deep bonds existing – I mean people must enjoy dancing together in order to have it survive for over a decade. Zimmer probably wasn’t the only beginner who wanted to whet their skills on those two, and probably not the only one to emotionally defer to their skills. 
Elias says there was definitely a sense in—group and out-group at the Current Exchange gathering [in Vancouver, B.C., summer 1979]. I can vouch that there was such a situation. The in-group only in the sense that the entire U.S. and Canada was not invited. In fact, living conditions restrict the size. Word was quietly put out to a few people who tols a few other people. A letter of intent from participants was required to insure they had their own reason for using the facility (Western Front Lodge/gallery/studio/video) and that their reason resonated with the facility and harmonized in practical ways with the rest. Every one of us paid for the rest of Western Front and pitched in for food, cooking and cleaning up. 
I fear that the article, in using these two examples, will give elitism a bad name. Surely just being a small group or being buddies is not cause to bring out such a big gun. To be elite is to hold some plum and restrict its dispersal. To use this word to criticize those who go to the trouble of organizing classes or being perceived from without. 
Truth be told, CI is a dance form. It does have and, as far as I am concerned, tach certain values; mostly to do with physical safely. 
CI has always abounded in logical contradictions, foremost to do with improvisation. If improvisation springs out of ach moment in each individual, then how to get people to improvise – to discover their own initiative? And I point this out to classes – this cannot be taught, but it can be learned. I can provide useful (to me, at least) images and mediations. I can point out glaring errors in partnering. I can’t know how someone feels or protect them from their insecurity, fear, dislike, associations, boredom, or their elation, warmth, sense of achievement, for that matter. 
Contact Improvisation deals with gravity, momentum, human bodies, etc. Human form or perceive hierarchies. It is egalitarian. The folk who aren’t in Contact Improvisation, either don’t know about it or choose not to do it. To pick at words just a bit more, Contact Improvisation could have ‘embraced values of individualism, equality, and anti-hierarchical relationships,” because CI cannot do anything. It is something to be done. 
And in Dumont’s remark some strange loose ends, which perhaps should be brought to the attention of the U.S. government and of course, its boss, the people: “If, in effect, the whole of humanity is deemed present in each man, then each man should be free and all men are equal. By contrast, as soon as a collective end is adopted by several men, their liberty is limited and their equality I brought into question.” 
So apparently even a government formed on values such as freedom and equality will trample on freedom and equality. Hoe embarrassing. Yet even such an experiment in good intentions is of some interest, compared to the intension of other governments, then and now. If liberty and equality are chosen, then at the moment of choice, they exist. What happens the next moment is something for all of us, anthropologists especially, to ponder. 




''FALL
AFTER
NEWTON"
TRANSCRIPT
by Steve Paxton
When an apple fell on his head, Isaac Newton was inspired to
describe his three laws of motion.
These became the foundation of our ideas about physics. Being essentially
objective, Newton ignored what it feels like to be the apple.
When we get our mass in motion, we rise above the constant call of
gravity toward the swinging, circling invitation of centrifugal force.
Dancers ride and play these forces. 
Beyond Newton's third law, we discover that for every action several
equal and opposite reactions are possible. Therein lies an opportunity for
improvisation.
We are looking at performance of Contact Improvisation, a duet movement
form. This tape takes a sweeping look over 11 years of practice y
Nancy Stark Smith, from her first exposure to the form I was working o
when it was new in 1972, through moments chosen from consecutive
years of performing with me, Steve Paxton, and with others.
Nancy solos by testing her movement, playing with gravity and the
floor, which are, in this work, not taken for granted, but are considered
constant partners. She doesn't direct herself-she starts moving and then
lets it happen, finding ways to cope with momentum and gravity.
Here, in 1976, Nancy and her partner Curt Siddall move to follow the
point of touch as it moves-a basic focus for their improvisation. In the
play of moving and being moved, specific movements are unpredictable
but they occur within a knowable field-of gravity, centrifugal force. support and dependency.
Human touch unites the forces which act upon the body, with the sensations 
they provoke within the body. This interaction makes it possible
keep all the parts of both their bodies harmonizing.
They were not so adventurous 4 years earlier. In this first performance
of Contact Improvisation, they were getting used to moving by touch. By,
feeling their way, they brought back clues about the form and abo
themselves and their perceptions.
The performance which attracted Nancy to this form
was a high energy study called Magnesium. I made
Magnesium for a group of men at Oberlin College in
1972. It investigated the reflexive quality of touch with
momentum, falling, rolling and colliding.
Magnesium ends with five minutes of standing to
draw a great distinction in the scale of movement.
Standing still is not actually "still. " Balancing on two
legs demonstrates to the dancer's body that one moves
with gravity, always. Observing the constant adjustments
the body makes to keep from falling calms the whole being.
It is a meditation. It is watching the reflexes at
work, knowing they are subtle and dependable-not just
emergency measures.
Standing became one of our disciplines, keeping the
Mind attentive to the body's present moment. This simple
practice was preparation for the complex interactions
that would arise with a partner. As were the throwing
and catching practices that called for instant response,
introducing ourselves to adrenalized states.
 At first, there seemed to be only two options-trying
to follow the flow of communication or resisting it.
Each dance is a series of on-the-spot decisions. And
they are on the spot. The soft skin is alert to the points
of. contact, signals telling the dancers where they are
orienting them to their partner and the floor.
Their perceptions are stretching. They are adrenalized.
Inside their minds, the many touch events and constantly
changing relationships blend into a continuity of moving
masses which creates a logic reached only in the
eat of the dance. A logic as secure as that found when
standing alone and watching the reflexive dance of
one's bones.
Higher momentum brings new areas of risk. In order
to develop this aspect of the form we had to be able to
survive it. The support needed from the unconscious
reflexive parts of the brain is more present when the
conscious mind is not afraid. The calmness of standing
extended into the fall.
There are hazards. One of them is thinking ahead.
What the body can do to survive is much faster than
thought.
It is useful to re-train the reflexes to extend the limbs,
rather than contract them during a fall. During this very
disorienting fall, Nancy's arms manage to cradle her
back, and this spreads the impact onto a greater area.
and she doesn’t  stop moving. That helps to disperse the
impact over a slightly longer time. She doesn't seem
bothered.
. Taking a  brief scan through time, we begin with the
first  duet in which I danced fast with Nancy, dancing
With abandon and thrust to get into momentum. It seems
rough and disorienting for her, but she was up for it.
One year later, the sensation of movement was more
continuous, the flow of movement longer. There was
more time to feel what was happening.
While in contact, we attend to our own reflexes, which
have been stimulated by the other's movements. Our
reflexes move us, and this causes our partner to move.
This cycle of movement responses is continuous and
forms the basis of the dialogue.
When physical safety could be assumed at a more instinctive
level, we were free to play with time and the
subtleties of touch. Phrases of movement could be extended
indefinitely when we no longer needed to stop
and check our situation.
By 1978 we had examined the timing of the body on
its own for six years, and began searching for ways to
change our habitual patterns. Using music was one of
these ways. For this performance, Collin Walcott played,
incorporating the random sounds of our movement into
his drumming. We danced to his rhythm, and he played
to ours.
During periods of extended soloing, we each expect
physical contact at any moment. We wait for the moment
of decision to be taken by our partner or by
ourselves.
Over the years, the principles underlying our movement
remain the same. As the senses expand into
spherical space and the muscular system learns to respond
to touch on any surface of the body, any point can
be the fulcrum for leverage and continuity.
Nancy and I have danced with many other partners of
varying backgrounds and skills. Each partner posed their
own kinetic puzzles which were danced through, contributing
new elements to the body of work, the network
of Contact Improvisation.
The main focus of training is retuning the senses. It
isn't just the sense of touch which must be expanded,
but all the senses must become elastic enough to
navigate through spherical space, to handle any position,
any change of acceleration.
It seems that what has emerged is two bodies acting
as one within the domain of the physical forces. Newton
proposed ideas about the forces and their interaction. In
addition, Contact deals with ideas or images which are
sensations first, then felt by the mind.
Every person who has danced Contact Improvisation
taught their variation to their partners. This network
spreads information among us.
As a member of the first generation to study Contact
Improvisation, Nancy not only learned it but helped to
define it by the direction her training took her. When she
began, no one knew what sort of body would result from
the practice, nor what properties would be developed.
We have seen the first Contact event Nancy saw,
Magnesium. This piece must have left an impression
upon her, which in turn must have been altered by the
development of the duet form.
We have been able to see Nancy's physical change in
the early years of her study, and the development of her
performance style. In looking at performance footage
mainly, we have seen little of the daily work, but have
seen the public forums in which Contact Improvisation
became widely defined. In looking at Nancy's development
over 11 years, we've seen one strand of the
physically rigorous and interwoven structure of Contact
Improvisation
An important aspect of Contact Improvisation is the
pleasure of moving, and the pleasure of dancing with
somebody in a very spontaneous way. It happens in a
framework which considers the body in all its variety as
the primary focus from which the mind can draw. With
this, the dance is refinable to ever more precise relationships
with the physical forces.

THE MAN IN THE BOX 
Interview with Steve Paxton at Breitenbursh Conference ’94 
Collated by Jess Curtis 
collated by Jess Curtis
The following interview took place 
At the Spring ’04 Breitenbush Jam Conference 
on “Contact Improvisation: The 
Form,” at Breitenbush Hot Springs in Oregon. The interview was conducted 
Using a core set up by the interviewee, 
Steve Paxton. Written questions were 
Given to Steve, who sat in a small box at one end of the space, out of view. 
Steve responded in writing and each 
Questioner read to the conference their question and answer from Steve. 
While this was going on, the rest of 
The people in the room participated in 
An energetic discussion on topics ranging 
from the varying parts of the world 
(e.g., West Coast, East Coast, Germany, Quebec) to issues of economic accessibility 
And ethics and values within the 
Contact community. 
The weave of these two separate and
related discussions was rich and engaging.
I have taken the liberty of putting
the questions in an order, for they came
to me in a pile. I did not credit individual
questioners (except in one case
where it seemed relevant), because not
everyone identified themselves on their
papers. [J. C.]
ORIGINS /Cl
What led you to invent the form we
call Contact Improvisation?
Steve: Having noticed it (I did not
invent anything but the name and a
process to study it), I noticed the form
evolved. What do you mean by the
form? A physical practice by individuals?
Duets? The above evolved into a
network.
What role does perception play in the
form? Is CI a state of mind? If so
can you define that state?
. Every discipline begins with perception.
States of mind are caused by
perceptions and/or states of mind determine
perceptions.
CI is an improvisational state of
mind partially determined by another's
improvisational state of mind; the contact
is not a state of mind but a physical
exterior event. The two blend like the
double circles of ripples seen when two
stones are dropped in a pond.
Do you think Cl is evolving as a
form? How?
Yes. 1. Socially inclusive. 2. Technically.
a) Why do you think people have
such a longing/desire to do CI?

b) Do you think it's possible that, by
practicing Cl, the physical body
changes towards an addiction to
physical contact?
a) Touch is essential to development
of the infant's health, nurture, mental
development, emotional maturing.
Many people have not received enough
or continue to benefit from the way 1t
works on the adult body·
b) "Addiction?" Are we addicted to
preferring fresh air or healthy food?
Are there books and tapes on contact
improvisation? What are they? How
do I get better?
By practice. Books and tapes give
ideas about what possible ways one
might aim practice. But the first part of
practice is physical. The magazine
Contact Quarterly contains most info.
Is there a difference between practice
and discipline?
Not in practice.
You said earlier that CI is evolving
technically... Could you elaborate,
i.e., What specifically do you see as
technical advancements? Do you
teach this in duet work?
I teach it in solo work and I will not
elaborate on paper but only physically
in the studio.
How do you feel about Cl being
"used" in the new dance/post-modern
dance field?
Who cares?
Would any other form of dance help
with the skills of CI?
All.
THE SMALL DANCE
What is the "Small Dance''?
Tuned to gravity, reflexes arrange
our skeletons, aligning weights and
proportions to maintain our stand.
Noticing the Small Dance gives the
mind a way to tune to the speed of
reflex.
Are all involuntary movements part
of the Small Dance?
Movements of the skeleton.
In the Small Dance, is the teetering
upright equilibrium sought only a
mechanical one of weights, levers and
muscle motors, or does the psyche
also attempt to find expression and
recognition of its own states in the
tensing and releasing of the stander's
musculature?
The small dance is only the first
definition you give here. The second is
the study of such techniques as the
"imagine you are taking a step with
your left foot..." sort. Separating these
two is instructive. (My theory is that
we learn a lot by contrast.) In practice
they interact.
Are breath and heartbeat a Small
Dance?
They are further, but other, manifestations
of an aspect of mind to which
consciousness is denied direct access,
yet may infer by such evidence.
Did the "Small Dance" get created
before CI, the form, or after?
Before.
What stage of your dance life were
you in then (what were you most
being influenced by)?
Dance: Aikido, meditation, gymnastics,
improvisation technique, NY urban
tension, art as abstract, "form" as principle
control, the work of Simone Forti, a
remark by Agnes Martin-"The only
thing left of nature in NYC is gravity."
If there is a standing small dance, is
there a sitting small dance?
Yes, half as long.
Can the Small Dance be refined? If
so, what are the indicators?
Creamy but fine-grained elastic
scope of movement.
I don't know how to teach people to
let their small dance get bigger like
mine. [This question came from Emery
Blackwell, who has cerebral palsy.]
Your example is contagious.
a) Dear dr. box, is there a difference
between dance and movement?
b) If so, if a person cannot feel their
skeleton (paralysis or inattention) are
they still in the small dance?
a) Dame Peggy von Praugh reportedly
said, "It is only dance if it is en pointe."
b) They are of it but not in it.
FAITH IN THE FORM
Do you ever lose faith in the form'? If
so, what have you done to find your
way back?
No, I don't Jose faith in it, but I Jose
understanding of it sometimes. I clear
mind and look again. Breitenbush
helps, also.
Is Contact Improvisation a spiritual
practice? If so, how can its principles
most effectively inform right relations
in the world?
All dance is (due to momentary
awareness). That is why the church
kicked out dance as an accredited religious
art. Whether or not it is spiritual-
aside from that-it is a game which
requires two people to win. Extrapolate
from that.
What function does CI serve in society
at large?
Starting in urban centers it replaces
the denatured physical life of the inhabitants/
inmates. Spreading outward, it
inhabits a vacuum imposed by society's
very real need to influence the physical
bodies of its members; slips the knots
of regimentation, releases directed focus
into peripheral, unknown, unknowable
and familiar old potential. A form to
re-identify touch in a manner so innocent
and righteous that it can fairly
transcend taboo.
What about metaphors ... like for living?
What about them?
I realize the many many layers or
levels of occurring at the same time.
Looking at details, i.e. Small Dance,
dancing/process/improvising, i.e. giving
weight is giving weight-giving
center is giving self. Arc you separate
from me or part of my dream'?
Thank you.



[::.taternent written oy ::.teve l'axton, ca. I 'c/ / / J

There is currently some controversy in Canada: is CONT ACT IMPROVISA­
TION a performance art?

Contact Improvisation is determinec by two people at once, who both im­ provise freely, trying not to impede the work of the other. Spectators watch a physical conversation which may range from stillness to high athlet­ icism. The reasons for the change in scale of movement or any other changes can be analyLed from emotion al, physical or psychological levels. Or many levels al once. The spectator is watching real people pressed by events and time. It is improvisation. Neither participant is totally in or out of con­ trol. The spectator does not look 1hrough the performers to a mind and its aesthetics. One lool?s squarely at the performers and their choices, reac­ tions, and inslincts, to what happens between them.

Whal is revealed is mulual under­ standing, a basic system, a mode of communication. Touch. The fast and sublle skin processing masses, vectors, emotions, givinq the muscles the in­ formation to correuly move the bone so the duet can fall lhrouqh the time and space of demonstralion, neither parlner hurt, hampered, subjected, ob jeclified.

Is ii performance art? Performanc has several levels of meaninq. So does art. No one is defininq their terms.
They seem to mean, "I didn't enjoy the way ii went," or, "If Tharp is, thi ain't." No matter. Go to ii, Canadian Critic 1. Get ii on conceptually. Or you could take a way out devi5ed by those who perform Contact lmprovi
t ion .... they call it an art-sport.

Steve Paxton


[Statement written by Steve Paxton , ca. 1977]
There is currently some controversy in
Canada: is CONT ACT IMPROVISATION
a performance art?

Contact Improvisation is determined
by two people at once, who both improvise
freely, trying not to impede
the war!? of the other. Spec ta tors
watch a physical conversation which
may range from stillness to high athleticism.
The reasons for the change in
scale of movement or any other
changes can be analyzed from emotional,
physical or psychological levels. Or
many levels at once. The spectator is
watching real people pressed by events
and time. It is improvisation. Neither
participant is totally in or out or control.
The spectator does not look
through the performers to a mind and
its aesthetics. One looks squarely at
the performers and their choices, reactions,
and instincts, to what happens
between them.
What is revealed is mutual understanding,
a basic system, a mode of
communication. Touch. The fast and
subtle skin processing masses, vectors,
emotions, giving the muscles the information
to correctly move the bones,
so the duet can fall through the time
and space of demonstration, neither
partner hurt, hampered, subjected, objectified.
Is it performance art? Performance
has several levels of meaning. So does
art. No one is defining their terms.
They seem to mean, "I didn't enjoy
the way it went," or, "If Tharp is, this
ain't." No matter. Go to it, Canadian
Critics. Get it on conceptually. Or
you could lake a way out devised by
those who perform Contact Improvisation
.... they call it an art -sport.
Steve Paxton

Improvisation is…
By Steve Paxton
The arts can be related to the senses, roughly
Speaking – music for the ears, painting for the eyes, dance
For the body, But dance suggests an exception, because in the West it has become a spectator art, and it is through the eyes that the audience begins a kinetic response, or a 
Physical empathy with the dancer. 
The way the arts relate to the senses gets more and more complicated to describe when we consider the senses as interrelating. We notice that the muscles of the eyes move the visual apparatus to scan and focus. The neck and 
Torso muscles move the head to expedite the eye movement. 
We move the whole body through space to look at 
sculpture. And we are able to dance on time to music by 
virtue of the fact that hearing, which is one of our fastest 
sensing systems, drives our kinetic response. 
In their creation or execution, the arts are deeply connected to specially trained kinetic systems which, in a painting for instance, produce not only images, but characteristics strokes and lines. The ‘touch’ of a musician is as characteristic. 
There are ways of regarding the senses which are far from the ‘5 senses’ model, which is the way children are taught about the senses and their perceptions of the world. 
And it seems that little is added to this initial picture in 
the adult popular mind. I have read newspaper articles
about "the 5 senses and the mysterious 6th sense " just
this year. I am not right up to date on the current material
analyzing the senses into all their component bits, but
they were up to about 25 separate senses (each with identifiable
independent nerves) in the late 1970s, which is a
much more interesting number. If you are interested in
other models, read J . J. Gibson's The Senses Considered
As Perceptual Systems, read Bonnie Bainbridge Cohen's
work on Developmental Movement Systems (in past CQs) ,
investigate the premises of yoga, acupuncture, or any of
the Oriental physical systems which have been imported
into the U. S., and read the provocative and heart-moving
The Man Who Mistook His Wife For A Hat , by Oliver
Sacks. I think we can't have too many models of the
senses and their operation when considering a topic like
improvisation.
It is a bit self-referential to say that the model I'm
working on in this essay is about the effect of models
upon the mind, but I can 't sec any way around it. I
should mention in this regard that Buddhist thinking includes
the mind as one of the senses. I am fond of that
thought for the questions which arise for the analysts (how
fast do we sense our thought?). If this is an amusing poser
to throw at the sensorial analysts, it is because most of
their work on the senses relates to those of the surface,
disregarding quest io ns about our sense of gravity, our feeling
of the muscles of the body when they are quiet, or the
sense of 'being', if I may propose such a sense .
Yet the analysts' labor to discover the special nerves for
each sensorial aspect is of interest , if only to explain the
mechanism which allows us to dance to music, a most
popular form of improvisation. If we can bop at a party
because our perception of sound is faster by 4 milliseconds
than our perception of our limbs' relative positions, we
may surmise something about how the brain interrelates
the senses. We could also look at time itself as a thing
modified by each of the senses, instead of being an objective
measure of duration. In other words, in trying to
describe the sensing of time, we must refer to the perception
of times. These times then must be collated into how
long we think an event took, which is a very complex
computation involving which of the senses experienced
the event.
For instance, if we drop an object from a known
height, we have the math to calculate how fast it will be
moving when it hits the floor. This formula indicates that,
barring air resistance, any object increases its rate of falling
constantly. With this mathematical tool, we feel satisfied
that we comprehend the event. It is objectively clear.
However, if we drop a soapy dish and before it smashes
on the floor, manage to catch it, we can appreciate the
sensorial complexity and precision of another point of
view - the subjective feeling of gravity's effect on the dish,
which enables us to save it. We treasure this facility in
sports eye-hand -body coordination of time, space and
posture getting you there to snag the pop fly. 
I was deeply impressed by seeing a blind woman drop
and catch a plate she was washing. For once, the eyes
didn’t have it. It makes sense', as the phrase goes, that
our bodies are completely attuned to the gravitic effect that
the rate a body falls is abundantly obvious to our own
bodies; that any discussion of subjective time should mention
the gravitic factor in tuning the human time senses.
And we might as well put in right here yet another
factor, the state of our endocrine system, which can speed
up or retard our experience of these times - just to indicate
how extraordinary a job the brain is doing and to get some
glimpse of how quickly it does it.
"Quickly," compared to what' Ah, "quickly " compared
to how long it would take for the conscious mind to
do the job. (This is my conscious mind writing, and I just
wish you knew how long it 's taking me to describe the
little I can deduce about what my unconscious mind is
doing.) 
a word
Language, a medium in its own right, is deployed to
analyze experiences. Language is either written or spoken.
It is either for the eye or ear, but finally it is intended to
be sensed by portions of the brain which decode sounds or
symbols into meanings. We rely extensively upon it to
communicate what we feel and think. We use it to qualify,
quantify, and confirm and in general to hold our societies
together. It is the major medium, I would estimate. Julian
Jaynes has speculated (in The Origin of Consciousness in
the Breakdown of the Bicameral Mind), that consciousness
itself arose with the advent of the written word.
The link of language to consciousness suggests many
avenues for speculation. (It might explain the relative
slowness of conscious thought, for instance.) I think it is
well understood that there is much we experience which
language cannot couch and should not be used for , but it
is such an extraordinary medium that we keep applying it
to all sorts of things, in hopes, perhaps, of contriving a successful
new formulation; bringing the unconscious, un-‘knowable’, 
or unspeakable into literate consciousness.
I would bet that no dancer ever reviewed, however
positively, has ever felt their dance captured in print. Yet
language, used to describe other arts, forms a very important 
part of what we think about a work of art. It can
certainly influence our point of view and may even suggest
what can be thought about that is, limit our perception
or experience to the forum encompassed by language. It
does seem to me that if we spend much time communicating 
with others via language about a painting, music, or a
dance, we accustom our minds to the language, version of
the experience.
There are sensible reasons for this. Human societies
deeply appreciate evaluations which , like mining for gold,
mean eliminating dirt and concentrating on what is considered
valuable. Our actual experience of something can
include much that is irrelevant to its evaluation. An apt 
evaluation of a work will likely be repeated by others to
their friends. The further it goes from the source of the
experience to a verbal or printed version, the less recourse
we have to elaborations or answers to our questions. We
put such a rendered experience into our own version of a
context. It is an idea we flesh out with our own images.
As such, it has become a fictionalized picture, it has become
un-true , but we do it continually.
Much of what we know about ourselves is described to
us via language. The very idea of the 'imagination', for
instance. How did you learn it existed? In many such
respects, we 'imagine ' ourselves according to categories,
descriptions, and names of aspects of whatever we are told
(or read) it means to be a human being. I have a soul, in
other words, because the Bible tells me so. l have an ego
and an id thanks largely to the writings of Freud, and an
anima and animus courtesy of Jung. Not to belabor the
point, we (think we) are conditioned to a considerable
degree by our language.
Not that the particular names, categories and descriptions
we apply to ourselves have always been the same nor
will they be used always. They reflect a consensus and
will change or vanish as that consensus changes. Jaynes is 
fascinating as he tries to describe the state of the human
mind prior to consciousness. But we don’t have to reach
into the past to grasp some idea of how arbitrary our
notions about ourselves are, we can examine ideas of cultures
paralleling our own and feel the disconcerting void
of (our own) recognizable terms of existence.
Language is not only prominent, but it can be coercive.
We may opt to disregard experiences which don’t work in
language.
Tom Wolfe wrote a scathing article called “The Painted
Word,” wherein he suggests that painters in the NY School
of abstract expressionism were in fact led by the writings
of a few prominent critics to paint as they did. He seemed
to feel that this was a degenerate situation which devalued
the art produced.
It could be said however that this was an exceptional
case of painters and writers developing the ideas of a movement
in concert -exceptional in that it was a very intimate
scene with a mix of artists, musicians, dancers and critics
in close communication, and with regular forums for discussion.
Language could then be developed to account for
the paintings at the moment of their creation. What Wolfe
and the rest of us are accustomed to is a 5-to-10 year lag, 
to give time for critical language to be invented to describe 
the work. When this has been accomplished it has the 
effect Wolfe was describing: people learn to imagine in and 
with the new concepts, and artists and student artists elsewhere 
paint in the described manner. 
One medium may support another, rather like the 
sensorial model: one sense may support another. However, I 
have begun to think that one medium cannot accurately describe another. We are used to the attempt to make 
films of novels, and then read critiques in which, to no 
one’s surprise, the film is found a more or (usually) less successful ‘adaption’. 
Films are now ‘novalized’ to similar effect.
Critiques do not adequately portray the art, either: it all seems to boil down to “you had to be there.” 
There are nothing like the real things, whatever version of 
‘real’ we happen to start with. 
Analysis of perceptions shows us the realms of ‘reality’ 
We are able to tap with the senses. Seeing, hearing, touching, 
Smelling, imagining are, to me, each so very different
From each other, seen subjectively, that I am apt to think 
of them as sensorial dimensions. Again, we adapt one dimension
to another; ‘loud’ colors, for instance, is an
'auralization' or a sight. But the point here is to notice
how the sensorial dimensions are different, since we are so
used to confirmations of events through their blending.
Watch a carpenter drive nails at close range - eyes see and
ears hear the hammer. Then, move into the distance - eyes
see first . . . then cars hear. What we originally felt as one
experience has been divided between the two senses. We
arc mildly bemused by the organic 'analysis' we experience.
for somethiNG
In the 1960s there arose an artistic movement called 
“mixed media” in which one saw dances, films, language, 
Etc., used in the same work. Now that I understand the 
senses and the mind as ‘mixed media”, I am very surprised 
that the movement got this name. It seems to me that 
what was really going on was ‘unmixed media’, since the 
words usually did not relate to the dance or film which did 
not relate to each other in familiar ways. The audience 
was challenged with an event occurring in several sensorial 
dimensions, and the effect was similar to that of the lag 
between the visual and aural hammer-at-a-distance. The 
mind’s habit of synthesizing perceptions was confounded. 
This was for me an agreeable aesthetic experience, because 
it illuminated ordinary perceptions a bit. It served to train the mind to examine different modes of sensing, and created in the midst of life a new game to play. 
As I recall, during that time no one mentioned that the theater, opera and dance were already ‘mixed’. No one
Noticed that film had been mixed. Perhaps that was because people were excited over the possibilities for further 
Mixes. Sounds emanated from sculptures. Words emanated from dancers. New mixes occurred even within the 
same media: for instance, Bach and Rock together within
a dance performance. Paintings became 3-dimensional,
sculptures were made with new materials such as cloth or
compressed cars. Painters made happenings which were a
kind of theater loaded with colors and shapes and textures
and people and costumes and props; in fact, they were
paintings moving freely into the 3rd and 4th dimensions,
using 'in reality' what before would have been the models
for 2-dinicnsional works.
It was a period of radical interface. We were confronted
with unaccustomed juxtapositions, and of course came to
see things that way.
It was rather different than our former way of seeing
and from this contrast came little sparks of information.
That is how I evaluate it anyway; or value it. When we
have two things to contrast, it seems to cause one to
notice, and to learn. It was difficult to appreciate exactly
what we learned in the complex midst of a happening; I
suppose it all got synthesized in the mind, and one began
to notice things that had escaped notice previously. It led
me to consider the process of learning  and I came to regard
the overall experience as a rather powerful conceptual
tool with which one could cause change in experienced reality. 
The question arises why did we not notice John Cage had been 
doing it for decades, and Duchamp's work suggested it 
decades before that. The surrealists seemed to be concocting 
mixed media images, and Picabia and Picasso began to 
collage to contrast painted images and real objects to
sculpt images from found materials.
that can't
Perhaps the answer lies in language. Most folk couldn‘t
'get it' because they were still quite busy trying to ‘get’ 
what had happened in impressionism and pointilism. 
Cubism caused folk further consternation. And who 
could include melting clocks or a urinal or a prepared 
piano or a bus ticket in the same conceptual frame? The 
critical thought and conceptual tools of the day were 
already busily employed elsewhere, and the media did not
dispense images or rationales as quickly as they do now.

The arts, in those days, had begun to change far more
rapidly than our language could accommodate.
During this century it became clear that changes were
occurring on every level more rapidly than before. But 
this experience needed time to be finally understood, and 
those early examples, such as the more radical examples of 
Duchamp, were put aside to accumulate a kind of critical 
mass. By 1960, with enough hindsight, the times’-changing 
had provided us with the model for the mix, and many 
artists were at once ignited. By then the popular media 
and critical establishment were ready, and the mixed medium 
event was considered seriously and widely announced, 
after more than half a century gestation period. 
Apparently an object doesn’t have a life of its own, an objective meaning, but is imbued with values by the way we, 
with our changing minds, evaluate it. For many people, 
an object such as Duchamp’s birdcage filled with small 
white cubes of marble was not illuminating, but only absurd. 
The mix can appear quite empty and gratuitous unless the mind has some context in which to work with it. 
So during the 1960s when so many artists began to 
mix images, terms were arrived at to convey the impressions. Then 
the Duchamp objects were re-evaluated and it 
was possible to see them, not as obscure Dada jokes, but 
as objects with a particular luminosity, which operate in some other dimensions of the mind than the linguistic one. 
They resolutely resist meaning anything; and as it turned 
out, this quality became highly prized in that period of intense critical and artistic interchange. The laughter 
changed from dismissal to delight, and the last laugh was probably Duchamp’s. 
The special gift of the mixed medial was to provide a 
contrast to our conventional use of media and the senses. 
We had to admit that we did use conventions to convey 
our thoughts and feelings, and to run our society at large. 
The new mixes indicated that, once in place, conventions 
can dictate what the nature of the mind, the senses, the body, 
and of the society made up of these, to fall into habits, 
which are necessary for continuity, aids to individual survival 
and collective civilization. Individual habits and collective 
conventions prod us to adapt what we perceive into 
the most convenient shareable mental construct. 
KEEp
From the music we are accustomed to hearing, we form 
an idea of the intervals between notes. As our ears become 
more educated, we can become quite accurate in reproducing 
these intervals. Confronted with music in a different 
scale than usual, however, this aural education works 
against accurate reproduction. The unfamiliar intervals 
will be ‘adapted’ to the nearest known intervals. This 
adjustment is so automatic and unconscious that the person 
attempting to reproduce the new intervals will probably 
not even realize their mistake. 
Given another level of training in the logic of different 
musical scales, reproduction becomes possible, if difficult. 
For those who don’t have such training, being confronted 
with an unfamiliar system can lead to confusion. Indian 
music, for instance, may remain opaque and possibly even
disturbing; the intervals will seem wrong compared to the
scale we are familiar with. In addition, it will be very difficult
for the person to say why it seems wrong. The result
may be a kind of unease and possible retreat from the unfamiliar
system, a sensation of being lost. Not just lost
but without knowledge of how we are lost, for there are
many dimensions in music where it is possible to go astray.
Under these conditions, a little information about the
nature of the systems is very useful for re-orientation.
However a very different sort of aid is an appreciation
of the feeling of being lost.
Getting lost is possibly the first step toward finding new
systems. Finding parts of new systems can be one of the
rewards for getting lost. With a few new systems, we discover
we are oriented again, and can begin to use the cross
pollination of one system with another to construct ways
to move on.
Getting lost is proceeding into the unknown. To reject
the familiar, so rooted in our nervous system and minds,
requires discipline. The difficulty is that we have to know
so much to understand what it is we do and why we do it,
in order to know what to avoid. We are not attempting to
simply eliminate the known systems, but also to realize
how we have adapted to those systems. It is the habits of
adaptation which will keep us reproducing the system.
The system itself is not the problem, but rather this
human capacity to imprint unconsciously a new system
upon our old system - or to embody the maps of our
acquaintance, however tenuous. 

A name. 

We are close to improvisation here. When lost, we will
have to relate appropriately to unknown and changing
conditions. The dictionary explains that improvisation
means 'extemporare', or 'out of the time '. I suggest that
we interpret "out of the time" in two contradictory ways.
I suggest we discard all notions of clocks, and the half-life
of cesium, or celestial mechanics, none of which are
capable of improvisation, and equate time with human
experience of duration, which is to say the experiences
accumulated in life, so that “the time” will mean who we
have become. "Out of the time" will mean that, out of
experience (conscious or not) there is material for making
something.
Simultaneously, "out of" should be constructed as 'aside
from '. We have to se what we have become in such a way 
as to not be so controlled by it that it is automatically 
reproduced. 
Improvisation is a word for something which can’t 
keep a name, it has begun to move toward fixity. Improvisation 
tends in that direction. 
Dance is the art of taking place. Improvisational dance finds the places. 
-	To be continually continued. 


[Statement written by Steve Paxton , ca. 1977]
There is currently some controversy in
Canada: is CONT ACT IMPROVISATION
a performance art?

Contact Improvisation is determined
by two people at once, who both improvise
freely, trying not to impede
the war!? of the other. Spec ta tors
watch a physical conversation which
may range from stillness to high athleticism.
The reasons for the change in
scale of movement or any other
changes can be analyzed from emotional,
physical or psychological levels. Or
many levels at once. The spectator is
watching real people pressed by events
and time. It is improvisation. Neither
participant is totally in or out or control.
The spectator does not look
through the performers to a mind and
its aesthetics. One looks squarely at
the performers and their choices, reactions,
and instincts, to what happens
between them.
What is revealed is mutual understanding,
a basic system, a mode of
communication. Touch. The fast and
subtle skin processing masses, vectors,
emotions, giving the muscles the information
to correctly move the bones,
so the duet can fall through the time
and space of demonstration, neither
partner hurt, hampered, subjected, objectified.
Is it performance art? Performance
has several levels of meaning. So does
art. No one is defining their terms.
They seem to mean, "I didn't enjoy
the way it went," or, "If Tharp is, this
ain't." No matter. Go to it, Canadian
Critics. Get it on conceptually. Or
you could lake a way out devised by
those who perform Contact Improvisation
.... they call it an art -sport.
Steve Paxton


These notes were taken in February
1977, during Re Union 's teaching/ performing
tour of Contact Improvisation
on the West Coast. Throughout the
tour, the members of the '77 ReUnion
[Nita Little, Lisa Nelson, Steve Paxton ,
Curt Siddall, Nancy Stark Smith, and
David Woodberry] hand-transcribed
each others' classes, as close to verbatim
as possible. What follows arc sections
from several of Steve 's classes.
TRANSCRIPTION
Steve Paxton
[Warmup, people sitting]
Relax deep into the cone of
the eye socket. Imagine a line that
runs between the ears. That's where
the skull rests. Make the motion, very
small, for 'Yes." This rocks the skull
on the top vertebra, the atlas. You
have to intuit the bones. Like a donut.
The sensation around it defines it. Do
the motion for "No." Between these
two motions you can determine the
length of the vertebra.
. . . . Ballooning of the lungs.
Breathe from the bottom of the lungs
up to the clavicle. Can you expand the
ribs out & up & back easily? Defining
the diaphragm in terms of sensation.
Bottom of the lung. Two domes of
muscle. So with each breath you’re
massaging the intestine . . . . What the
diaphragm is doing is a signal to the
rest of the body. Sky above, earth below
…
The head in this work is a limb. It
has mass. Mass may be the single most
important sensation. The feeling of
gravity. Continuing to perceive mass
and gravity as you move. Tension in
the muscle masks the sensation of
gravity ...
[people squatting] You've been
swimming in gravity since the day you
were born. Every cell knows where
down is. Easily forgotten. Your mass
and the earth's mass calling to each
other. . .
[standing] . . . Upward force of the
bones. Shoulder blades fall down the
back, relaxing the intestines into the
bowl of the pelvis . . . In the direction
the arms are hanging, without changing
that direction, do the smallest stretch
you can still feel. Can it be smaller.
Can you do less. The initiation of
stretch, along the length of bones, in
the direction the force is already going.
The small dance-you 're relaxing and
it's holding you up. The muscles keeping
the weight throughout the skeleton.
Shifting weight from leg to leg, interface, 
taking weight, compression.
Stretching along the line of compression.
Center of the small dance.
[people begin to move down to the
floor] Freeze. What stopped, in terms
of mass? .. . Bridge the joints with
stretch, so you can transfer the weight
easily. Lubricate the motion, flow ...
Flow doesn't mean slow. Silent on the
floor. Don't leave sound tracks. [rolling]
So you 're not depending on your
eye for the horizon. The room goes by
your eye.
[in partners] Put the tops of your
heads together. Just stand for a moment.
The idea of a small dance, movement
in and around the skeleton, the
rush and pause of the muscles . .. very
small ... try to match 50/50 the other
person's small dance without manipulating
yours .... then as in the wav
you let the small dance move into walking,
let the contact point roll around
the head. Let the body adjust to the
movement and pressure of that point.
What is important is to share that point
of balance ... rely on balance and the
fact that you r muscle system will work
on automatic pilot ..... try working
in slow motion for awhile and see what
evolves.
Basically what you're doing now is
a model for the process that can happen
over the entire body. So, next time an
arm comes around, transfer the process
to that point, you can take it into the
limbs. Slow it down or let it go a little
faster. Return it to the head every once
in awhile . . . .
Let the movement take you places
you don't plan to go ... nothing is
wrong ... no position is wrong in this
work ... once you arc obeying the
laws of gravity, it's really hard to make
judgements about them. Keep peripheral
vision open so you know what's
going on around you.
[during dancing] Are you comfortable?
.... . strange? . .. . . . are you
ugly? .... .. .. etc. Is your partner
warm .... noble . . . . . frightened? . . .
[half bour after pairing, about
11 am] Let the movement relax onto
the floor .... comfortable . ... feel
afterimages of the movement you've
been doing ... rest .. .. how deeply
can you relax ... it seems to just go
on and on doesn't it ... you relax at
first, then you sense a little something .
. . . shoulder, scalp, or your body shifts
positions which allows a whole new set
of muscles to relax . . . this body ....
such an ancient form .. . we admire
things like the pyramids, they're so old,
but they 're fading fast . . . this movement,
this sensation . .. always new
but so ancient . . . .. the body is a part
of this earth, a moving, dancing part,
and it knows how to deal with these
forces, you don't have to direct, . .. .
knows how to play .... knows how to
align .. . it was made by these forces,
molded here . . .. breathing this air,
relaxing with this inertia . . .. Body .
Body . .. . .. This being wants
information ... . that you have .. . ..
[Steve is sitting on the side, the class is
lying on backs relaxing in various positions]
. . .. This being ... is studying . .
. . . this body .... the sensations that
are constantly coming to these senses
. .. This being wants to play .. . .
amongst those sensations ... . Show
this being gravity , inert ia and momentum
. .. show this being the skeleton ..
.. so th at they can move with case ...
show this being the diaphragm, the
psoas, let this being breathe pure air ..
. . let this being feel the circulatory
system ... hear the whine of the nerves
... and the thump of the heart .....
show this being the organs .... show
this being the tubes from mouth to
anus ... what its needs arc ..... the
liver ... show this being the nerve centers
of the feet, soles, hands, face, main
touch and sense interfaces .. from the
outside . . . take this being on walks on
pebbly paths ... let this being make
music with the hands and voice ... let
this being learn the ins and outs of
seeing .. . and hearing ... Thank your
ancient body for everything so far ...
. . and lots more to come ... Okay …
The small dance, 
[slowly, in monotone deep soft voice]
... your life ... of course is nothing
but offerings ... Perhaps hearing is the
most time discriminating sense ... all
these little incidents ... inner and outer
events ... become a flow . .. air on
the skin, and even at 10ths of l000ths
of a second, still what's going down is
faster ... so everything you're hearing
or seeing is afterimage .... the sound
of my voice getting to you ... even a
concept like the speed of light.
how deeply can you hear ... [long
pause, all in own and common space]
. . . . Begin to move slowly, keeping
the brain relaxed, dancing through the
time . . the slower the brain, the faster
it 's happening ... Let yourself
move and bump into partners .. let
yourself fall through your partner 's
movement .. don't waste any time ...
allow slippage to occur .. [long pause] 
allow slippage to occur and keep
your senses open for it ... [people
luxuriating in slow relaxed floor work,
getting closer to contact] . . You've
been swimming in gravity since the
day you were born .. ... every cell
.. every cell ... Have you relaxed
your jaw, yawned , opened the throat
… Have you felt the connection between
nose and bottom of lungs. . .
diagonal stretches through the body
. . fingertip to fingertip across the back
. fingertip to ear . . . Have you lubricated
your joints with the movement
... massage and wring like a sponge
the tightness around the edge of it . . .
let the nerves tell the brain to send
more juices there ... gently pull and
contract and relax the muscles ... all
those tubes … plumbing . . .  [spacing
out to spacing in, group back in their
'present ' bodies now] Upright position
.. spine erect . . [kneeling, sitting,
standing] … Feel the bottom of the
lung, the diaphragm, feel it massage the
organs, down into the bowl of the pelvis,
 relax you genitals and anus…
breathe deeply ... exhale slowly …
feel the pause at the exhalation …
watch for the beginning of the1inhalation
... This thing, time… full of
rush and pause … feel time go by
through the breath … don' initiate 
the breath ... just watch that period.
… try to catch your mind, the exact
moment when the inhalation starts again …
[ 11:45 am, now] Okay .. . Standing.
.. Relax erect with the weight toward
the back half of the knee, put some
weight on the balls of the feet .. relax
the scalp ... relax the eyelids ... relax
behind the eyes .. deep into the
cone of the eye socket .. don't spend
any energy blocking or focusing . .. let
your ideas flow . . because certain
things mask other things . . . and it's
better for this right now to have no
concentration … feel the play of rush
and pause of the small dance that holds
you upright when you relax …
through simple mass and balance …
60% on the ball of the foot, some to
toes, rest back . . knees a little relaxed
… Let your breath guide your torso,
make you symmetrical . . let your ribs
be open to the ballooning of the lungs
. . arms fall sideways . Feel the small
dance . . it's always there…think of
the alignment of the bones, limbs, towards
the center of the earth … length
of the bone …
… Take your weight over your left
leg. . what is the difference ... in the
thigh, in the hip joint .. Calling this
sensation 'compression,' take compression
over the right leg, feel the change
… compression down the length of
the bone .. Take your body to neutral
. . lean forward . compression in 
front, stretch in baick .. back to neutral
. . lean backwards, stretch in
front, compression in back .. don't
have compression in the arms, there's
no weight there… lean forward again
... feel the difference ... relax …
neutral … lean back, stretch along the
length of your body … neutral …
stretch up .. let the spine rise through
the shoulders .. let the head be supported
on a line between the ears…
make the motion for "Yes,"… rock
the head .. the atlas ... make a stretch
connection, a long line of stretch between
the ball of the foot and the
atlas, between the toes, the ball of the
foot up the leg to the spine, to the atlas.
…You've been falling in gravity 
since the day you were born …
… Slowly let your body collapse
into a squat … release into a voluntary
fall. Breathe, squatting with hands on 
the floor, head relaxed .. see if you
can relax in this position . . . and
come up. [12:00]

Still Moving 
by Steve Paxton
Cynthia Hedstrom is leaving 
Danspace (at St. Mark’s Church, NYC). 
She has directed it’s use for three years 
And created a center in which the dance 
culture of lower Manhattan move 
and thrived. The space is one of the 
desirable venues for dances born in 
loft studio. The proportions are larger 
than the usual studio but intimate 
enough to convey the soft of non-theatrical 
detail frequently laced through 
new dance work. The floor is hard and fast. 
The audience sits on carpeted steps 
Under a balcony on three sides of the room. 
The upper area serves for lights and video/photo documentation. 
High above the floor, the ceiling vault is a great curve which caps the air 
Lightly and elegantly. 
Carol Mullins does the lighting and Dan Froot coordinates other elements: 
Sound, slides films and sets. 
This team handled the many details, 
changes, complilations of CONTACT 
AT 10th & 2nd with care and efficiency. 
It is something of a test to produce new works 
And improvisations because much remains 
Unknown, untested or mutable right down to the wire. A 
Tight, light responsive system is invaluable for breaking new ground.
However fine and airey the space itself may be, 
It is this team which made the house comfortable 
for the several dozen choreographers and performers
who gathered there for 7 productions June 10, 11, 12 & 16, 17, 18, 19, 1983. 
The performers and choreographers had a great deal to pull together themselves. 
They arrived from England, California, Canada, the US, and from around Manhattan, 
With their concepts, 
Improvisations and dancing bodies. 
They arranged themselves into the 
General format of Contact Improvisation or Choreographed/semi-set works 
With minimal ado. As (traffic) director 
of these events, I am eternally grateful 
for their grace under fire. 

Contact Improvisation has been a performance form 
since its inception. Audiences and critics have challenged the appropriateness of this decision, and I think 
it true that the audience-performer relationship may serve the performer here as much or more than the audience, certainly for those observers who require more explicit signaling of intent in their audit. 
Their expectation is a rather fruitless approach to Contact Improvisation. 
It is, after all, improvisational. Intent and manifestation amount to the same things. Further, any contact duet is a manifestation of a fraction of the possibilities of the form, so, audiences seeing a performance for the first time must be content with the specifics of that dance, if not the general idea. 
Much that is excellent in Contact 
Improvisation is the result of omissions- avoiding injury, for instance, 
yet allowing moments of instability while playing with powerful physical forces. Omit jarring the body, miscommunication, physical confusion, willful accomplishment. These omissions are about survival. 
Survival may be taken for granted 
by audeinces. The performer of CI is not so phlegmatic. 
The notion that CI performance is ‘ungenerous,’ as audiences have observed, results from CI performers paying close attention to life and limb. If the audience feels neglected due to lack of eye contact, 
for instance, they might consider that in CI training peripheral, non-focused 
vision is employed. This is very awkward
socially (try it at a party) but 
creates a state of mind in which vision is not paramount, 
for once, in the sensory spectrum of the performer. Mass 
is therefore more clearly sensed, as is positioning and change. 
Audiences of televised sports are accustomed to seeing athletes preparing for their tasks, and watching them work (play). These performers are primed to make unusual efforts and we watch the results of their play knowing what they are attempting to do, and with some, we understand how they hope to do it – an empathy 
born of knowing the rules of the situation. I believe knowing the premises of CI creates a similar empathy, but the spectator must become used to the idea that a Form which is proposing to deal with improvisation formally, 
rather than being goal-oriented or aesthetically based, requires some other sort of empathy – perhaps that of the naturalist on a ramble. It is the naturalist who organizes the view into forms. The river will not speak of gravity nor surface tension nor subsurface currents. These are attributes for the naturalist to infer. The birds signal their intent to the other birds. The naturalist is eavesdropping. Birds just bird. The naturalist must bird along. 
In short, theatrical forms rely mostly on contrast and conflict. CI depends on communication and cooperation. 
Sports rely on conflicting goals and ‘plays’. Ci has no point-system and the maneuver are relatively unpredictable. 

Dance has visual aesthetics, CI has
accepted a much more 'general look'.
It just happens. Its subsurface currents
must be inferred. 
I suppose we are asking audiences
to look in unusual ways, but what of
that? Every medium requires a shift 
of focus, every culture. Even every 
day. I would like an audience of Sherlock Holmses who would discern the interpersonal currents, understand the dialogue, even in the face of the guilty performer who could not fulfill his own ideals in performance. 
I gather from what I have written 
that I do not see the audience-performer relationship as one where the performer has a duty to the audience. I see it as a relationship where they have a relationship with each other, and if the audience may have expectations of the performer, well, so may the performer have expectations of the audience. You no doubt get the drift. “It matters what you give an audience to do” (Christie Svane). “Art criticism is for artists as ornithology is for the birds” (Barnett Newman). 
Two works from CONTACT AT
10th & 211d, one of the semi-set variety,
the second improvisational, remain especially
vivid in my memory. Fred
Holland and Ishmael Houston-Jones
performed a gritty duet which segued
seamlessly from contact to conflict to
contest; through emotional areas into
clear physical spaces; to sense-altering
moments when the two bodies seemed
to drag or claw through space; to
events of high play, and casual conversation.
Nothing settled as the dance progressed.
It was one fevered long transition.
It spoke of men, Blacks; they
were at war at play at art at odds at
one.
The space was used darkly. A
sound score of soulful mechanical
grating and chugging added emphatic
menace to some moments. The same
sound, more frequent toward the end
of the work, became a wash of rather
loud pulsations, but were merely background
noise when I perceived two
men working in a factory. The throb
of sound was hypnotic, and I had a
feeling of falling back and forth
through time, from the present moment
of contact to several apparent
references in their/our past: scrapings
from old newsreels, late night TV wars,
items in smoky bars .
On the Saturday night of the second
weekend, 5 folk who teach or perform
contact in Lower Manhattan did an
amazing thing which I have not heard
brought up for discussion, though if
there is orthodoxy in improvisation,
this performance was a challenge gauntlet
down from the git-go.
Looking the length of the space, I
saw the lights come up on an Indian-file
of performers facing right. The
leader whirled and slapped the second
across the face, which turned the second
around to face the third; 2 slapped
3, 3 slapped 4, 4 slapped 5, who spun
completely around and returned the
compliment back through the line.
The lights then faded.
The rest of the evening proceeded
in a more normal vein. The lights resurfaced,
dancing began, street clothes
were shed and contact appeared. The
dancing was a clear sample of regional
style. I realized that much of contact
performance around the country looks
rather more like itself than did this
version. This had its own nervous
humor, a sense of high energy even in
repose, and subsurface irony. The ensemble
feeling was strong, but it is an
ensemble of anarchists and in groupings
the performers seemed independent,
as though they might leave, solo
or stay according to thoughts passing
quickly behind quiet faces.
Danny Lepkoff, Robin Feld, Diane
Madden, Stephen Petronio, and Randy
Warshaw made clear, eccentric, sometimes
brilliant dances and showed me
that psychology, humor and intelligence
need not be stressed to be visible
and catalytic. The ability of the performers
to occasionally enliven the
whole space was partly due to the fact
of training in solo work (all are experienced
soloists, three dance with Trisha
Brown) so that their solo shapes and
plots looked secure and centered, not
like an interval between ducts.
Further, they made use of the room,
making exits and traverses of the
space, rather than hanging around the
edge as is customary in C l. They did
do that also, but created images of the
lounging or waiting. One was to do
with the back wall which has a kind
of illusion built into the architectural
detailing, partial columns and horizontal
ledges onto which they climbed to
stand and wait.
Carol Mullins was lighting that wall
in pale rosy washes, and the standing
figures looked like substitutes for the
sunbathing nude women in Maxfield
Parrish's pictures. But lounging on the
veranda is over, the terrace is now occupied
territory. Such images arise,
have probably nothing to do with the
work except that one way of looking
at this sort of theater is to divine the 
images. When one is engaged, but images
and directions are not poked at
one, the daydream-divination prospect
can produce private subtexts of some power. 
The trick here is assigning responsibility. 
We are not, of course, discussing
referential images in the usual way
("a witty reappraisal of sentimental
painting appeared on the upper reaches
of the back wall"). Rather, engagement
of the audience, which the performers
accomplished; and reverie in
the midst of their action, which I accomplished. 
I suspect something theatrical
was begun in the first striking
image of this work. Slapping is on the
one hand aggressive, but on the other 
hand quickening - like the slap administered
to a victim of shock, or the
Zen bonk on the head. Wake up. The
slap form was done as a ceremony, and
broke the old CI  mind-set of good will
and 'total trust' (with irritation and
frustration suppressed in some other
mental compartment) and provoked
fresh appraisal about what they were
up to.
Nina Martin and Paul Langland
were absent from the group this night,
but will join them when next they
surface, in the name of Channel Z, on
January 28th & 29th, 1984 in NYC.


Chute Transcript 
By Steve Paxton 
I am examining the passage from up to down.
I look at the range of the passage, from the small
dance of standing, to the linked falls of walking, to swoops
and dives from high points on other bodies.
With experience, the act of falling has come to
include an ability to adapt my body to the variables of
distance, position, and direction and to intuit which part
of my body will take the first moment of impact.
The first part of my body that touches the ground
I can use as a lever. By extending to that part, I can unify
limbs and torso to prepare a sequence through which to
smoothly transmit the energy of the fall, and my weight,
into the floor. Within the brief freedom of the fall, my body
can convert a sudden accident into a controlled
descent.
The result of so many changes in spatial and kinesthetic 
orientation in a short time has caused me to perceive
space as spherical. The sphere is an accumulated image
gathered from several senses vision being one. As if quickly
looking in all directions gives me an image of what it
might be like to have a visual surface all over my body,
instead of skin. 
The skin is the best source for the image, because it
works in all directions at once. If we could turn the skin
off, we would appreciate it much more. But the skin works
most of the time on automatic pilot. The conscious mind
is alerted if unusual stimulation appears, on the surface of
the body, but, I don't notice the touch of my clothes or
my weight in a chair most of the time. 
In Contact Improvisation, however, I find I an hanging by my skin 
And relying on its information to protect me, to warn me, to feed back to me the data to which I am responding. 
We are looking at material from 1972, training for the first performance of Contact Improvisation, at the John Weber Gallery. It was a hot New York City day, but everyone seemed game. 
What can be learned by catching a hurtling body?
The importance of timing. That there is such a things as a correct preparation. That understanding the technique with the mind is different than understanding with the body. 
That momentum can be extended and used once the initial impact is absorbed or deflected. Or that the seemingly impossible juxtaposition of a small woman catching a large man ha possibilities- most of them leading to the floor. But that is reasonable. Trying to stop or hold too much weight is dangerous. The idea is to discover what is simplist to do. 
In a state of trust of the body and the earth, we believed we could learn to handle the forces involved in physical interaction between two people who permit each other the freedom to improvise. 
The first instant of any fall is crucial. At that point a roll may be prepared. If the preparation isn’t made at the first moment, falling takes place without guidance from the faller. 
What can a body do to be safe? Commitment to something which isn’t happening is a barrier between me and my body’s circumstance. 
Memory of past judgements tells me that prejudging is not secure. And memory cannot function consciously because at theses speeds I can’t think my way to safety. 
If thinking is too slow, is an open state of mind useful? Seems to be. 
I remember deciding to learn falling skills, which have become muscle memories. I figured my chances of survival were greater with these skills than without – an assessment of things to come. In this way, prejudgment and memory do play a part in what is happening now. 
Although adults and children fall at the same velocity, adults are more liable to injure themselves because their mass is greater in proportion to structural strength. It is possible to develop responses to deal with this safely. 
Slides, rolls or full surface landings, which spread the impact of landing over as much of the muscle area as possible, are useful in Contact Improvisation as they are in the martial arts of Japan. 
I am concerned with the possibilities of guiding the momentum of the fall away from collision with the floor or partner. A body could endure for decades. I don’t want to injure joints. On the other hand, shouldn’t focus on doom. Can’t exclude fear. 
Efficient falls tend to turn into slides or rolls, transforming vertical momentum into horizontal travel. 
I may find a last minute leverage from my partner to enable me to land upon my feet. My fall might be guided so it spirals around the body of my partner. Thus, a fall started on the downward path can be guided into a circle orbiting my partner, and finally, its momentum used to aid in regaining a high perch. 
Contractive energy or tensions overpower the sensing sublet movement, and so gravity is masked. 
Relaxed is almost right, but, flaccid is wrong. 
In exploring the small dance of skeletal alignment while 
Standing, I am sensing subtle falls of parts of the skeleton. 
One thing is clear. I have little memory, muscular or mental, of what I’ve danced. 
The specific movements my body executes when I improvise do not register consciously, and I can’t reconstitute them. I feel transparent in the action. Causing it only a little, and holding no residuals. 

 


Performance and the Reconstruction of Judson 
By Steve Paxton 
Judson Dance Theater had become a myth. 
That unwieldly accumulation of dancers, artists, 
poets and musicians of the early 1960s had reached the point of being a causual reference in conversations. 
Judson Dance Theater Reconstructions at Danspace, St. Mark’s Church, NYC, addressed the problem directly. Most of the work on the two programs presented April 15 & 16, 17 & 18 [1982], was from the early programs at Judson Memorial Church, and elsewhere. 
The two programs comprised 5 hours of work lasting from 30 minutes to 4 minutes. There were 17 works, which seemed a substantial sample. In examining material research by Sally Banes for a forthcoming book, and the photos and interviews collected by Bennington College Judson Projected directed by Wendy Parron and Tony Carruthers, I was surprised to discover works, names and performances unknown to me. There were apparently about 35 ‘Judson’ performanceances. The retrospective, drawing from this breath of material, contained several items new to my eyes, and I felt at the same time expectancy and nostalgia. 
The proceedings were informal; much like the originals. The refinished interior of St. Mark’s is airy and elegant, unlike Judson Church, which was cavernous. 
I wondered what the feelings of others presenting work were. I was interested in seeing works from different years on the same program. I was intered that at last I would see Simone Forti’s work with Judson work; and I was very interested to see my own contribution I had never seen it performed. 
I performed it [Jag Ville Gorna Telefonera] once, in Sweden, 1964. 
Now, Stephen Petrionio and Randy Warshaw were to perform it, basing their work on a score of pasted photographs. 
It is the natre of many of the dances of that period to rely on choices by performers. The dances may exist as general instructions for activities, or a piece of equipment to be used, or a photoscore. They will reflect a different aspect of performers than does rote-learned movement. They are not intended to remain the ‘same’ rfom one performance to the next, let along for 20 years. Yet, because they are generalities and include change, they have a kind of structural immutability. 
So showings of Jag Ville’s except, Lateral Splay (Schneeman, 1963), Dance for Lots of People ( Summers 1963), Ten (D. Hay, 1967) and Slant Board (Forti, 1961) were as definitive as any. 
However, Carnation (Childs, 1964), Meditation (Charlip, 1966), Dewhorse (Dunn, 1963), Pop1 and Pop 2 (Bhartonn, 1963), The mind is a muscle part 1, or Trio A (Rainer, 1966) Structures (Passloff, 1960), and Octandre (Waring, 195, revised 1958) are all more or less exactly the same as they have always been and so are more precisely different. 
In these works only details can change. Excepting Dewhorse and Octandre, thses fixed structure were performed by the choreographer. Here we see change in the artist – maturing sensibilities operating on the work of their youth. 
And that is a fascinating thing to see. Whether one has seen the work before or not, it is an occasion. Octabdre was performed by Aileen Passloff, and while she is physically very different than Waring, she danced with him and rendered his dance with understated, slightly fey grace. 
Dewhorse was danced by Cheryl
Lilienstein. Cheryl danced with Judith
Dunn for several years until Judith.
falling ill, retired. For Cheryl, it was
certainly a charged situation. Judith
sat intently in a wheel chair, and those
of us who saw her original performances
were scattered through the audience.
Cheryl had reconstructed the
dance from a crummy videotape, and
a little work with a colleague who had
learned the dance many years ago.
What one might fear from the
situation, an empty homage of clone- dance,
perhaps, or a feeling of removal
from the source, were quire absent.
Cheryl does, in dance, resemble Judith,
bur remains very much herself. I
thought her performance was uncanny, 
and something of a triumph. 
Lucinda Childs, performing her own
Carnation, was interesting because she
performs differently in 1982 than in
1964. Carnation is a dance in, say, 4
sections. The first part occurs at a
table; the second, upside-down. The
third lying down; and the fourth, on
a repeated diagonal pass. At the table,
she performs a serial transformation of
20 sponges, a colander, and herself, in
which the objects become mathematical
entities and she becomes a carnation.
A hint of the '80s performance
attitude was visible here, though this
section is so programmatic that performance 
attitude is difficult to pin down. 
Section 2 has rigors of another sort. 
At the end of section 3, however, a cloth is folded, and I felt it was being folded
By a performing persona rather than by a person. 
What is that difference? Well, Lucinda was once the coolest of performers. 
There was little hint of any attitude visible, and the feeling of an observer was less attached, as I remember. Her pacing was smooth, the transitions casual, and preparations were unselfconscious, though deliberate. 
The folding used to happen like that. Now very delicately, each action has a certain stressing. Gestures are slightly telegraphed, augmented by an intense concentration around her upper spine and arms. 
In a reserved manner, Carnation is a madcap composition. Upon detecting the new interpretation, I was curious how the fourth section would be treated. In this, Lucinda gives herself a difficult task. She attempts to cry each time she steps on a plastic bag. 
The whole section is made addressing 
that bag, but formerly this was revealed in the course of action only now, the preparation becomes an event in itself. We see her think about the bag, see her twitching in readiness. She crosses and stands on the bag. Her eyes roam the audience before her. A certain humor passes behind her eyes. Then she does whatever she does to change mood, and her humor fades, collapses; her face cracks. Instantly she is off the bag, regarding it as she leaves – the look, I thought, of one wishing to convey surprise at the effect of the bag. She returns to the top of the diagonal. The pass is repeated, and preparation becomes more extravagant. During variations on this, the lights suddenly fade, leaving her on the bag. 
The change in performance has an effect upon the dance. Formerly, section 4 focused on how quickly and completely Lucinda could change states. I used to feel the movement had some self-conscious irony for Lucinda. She had barely blinked on stage up to that time. Along with some solos by Yvonne Rainer, this was one of Judson’s few forays into work with emotions. 
Now, however, there is body-language amplification, precise little action punches, taught rubato, and double-takes; and, there is her carriage which unites the upper body and produces a presentational quality. The thoughts of carriage and the body language were slightly at odds in section 4. It moved the emphasis from what she was doing to what she was going through. 
This raised a series of questions in my mind. Does she have to go through it, and it shows; or does she choose to go through it because she can now show it? I wondered if she was aware of this change, or alternatively, if she had always thought this showed in section four, and finally the years have allowed it all to manifest. And there is the chance that she did perform the dance this way, and my memory is faulty. 
Not an answerable question in the lot. Once memory is suspect, one might as well sit back and enjoy the dance…the notion of re-views is no longer an issue. However, if there has been a change, in my head or hers, the effect was comic. Lucinda was comic, and seemed to know it and know how to do it. And even so, it remained funny. 
Carnation was always funny. Where once it seemed programmatic and somewhat droll, now it is obsessive and wry. The humor is so specific to its internal workings that the fun of it doesn’t fade. 
Perhaps I am so interested in Carnation’s performance because there seemed to be some unspoken performance attitude at Judson which called for a deadpan façade. Cheryl Lilienstein retained that attitude in Dewhorse. Yvonne Rainer worked against the convention in 3 Seascapes (not shown), throwin ga screaming fit, and following that with a horizontal glance so controlled, so dignified, as to call one’s memory of the earlier passage a lie. 
In prairie, Alex Hay maintained a straight face in absurdly straightened circumstances (this work was not Reconstructed). Trisha Brwon, in the original Trillium (not shown), gave us no clue. Rainer once performed Trio A in blackface, attempting to neutralize her commanding presence – to no avail. Deborah Hay produced amazingly emotive movements in solo works but her face retained its mystery. 
We were in a quandary. We needed a performing style to go with new work. Cunningham had copyright on the glassy stare. Graham and Limon produced a constant emotive action in the face, as did most of the drama of the day. 
But our works were not dramas. They were pieces. They did not have narrative or emotional threads. It was inappropriate to amplify or produce one’s inner remarks – it would signal extraneous material to the audience. Forms would be seen secondarily to familiar facial theater. So we tended to inhabit movement, but not animate it. 
In many of the works depending upon the choices by performer in the course of performance, absorption in-process answered the quandary. 
In Ten, Deborah Hay has three teams of performers, each to follow its leader in positions touching either a horizontal or vertical length of pipe. Loud music by a live band is played, making simple remarks by performers about specifics of the pose into inaudible shouts. They go about their task scattering images and echoes of images across the space. Visual rhythms are created, counterpoised, interspersed, and disbanded. Any facial energy results from the task, or from the quality of a pose. Expression results from work at hand. Work results from direct instructions. 
Lateral Splay, by the look of it and on evidence of partial instructions published in the program, related language to action in a slightly different way than Ten. LS seems to be founded on a list of movement possibilities and performance qualities. This procedure makes use of the ambiguity of terms relating to movement and performance. It leaves interpretation to the performers. I was interested to read that Carolee Schneeman had listed stylized and severe under the category of performance. I ddi see three movements which took people from place to place – a duckwalk, a run, and a backwards run with arms flailing. However, every performer produced variations, so I presume that it is a subjective stylization which is intended. Similarly, ‘severe’. It seemed severe to me relative to carnival Rio, but not in any objective sense. 
Perhaps the word ‘severe’ takes some of the goofiness out of the situation. I can imagine a cast of LS having hysterics at some of the extraordinary events it seems to produce. Directors of indeterminate performances occasionally run into problems with giddiness when introducing performers to freedoms within the form. John Cage, rehearsing an orchestra new to his work, finally explained that freedom was to be used with dignity. A creative impulse is preferred to a referential one, and while that vast world of sound possibilities does include “Mairzy Doats,” the idea of that vast world is not well conveyed by “Mairzy Doats,” which, is the context of Cage’s notion of freedom smacks of adult playschool. Adults new to indeterminant performance frequently reach back into childhood for examples of free choice. 
Dance for Lots of People began with lots of people dressed much like the audience. The lots embarked upon the floor turning individually and speaking. In this piece they were, I suppose, given instruction, and a lot of choices, such as where to go, when to speak, perhaps even what to say. The group evidently had a sequence to follow: we all might speak in one section, people are lifted in another, and so forth. Soloists emerged and improvised in the spaces created by the members of group, but it was the group action which held by eye. A glean of personality, a fraction of body, a snatch of speech, created a sum of fragments; and when the group left, I had a sense of loss. All kinds of expressions happened in this dance, and some folk remained deadpan as well. I now see LS and DfLoP as explorations of performance – attempts to solve an artistic problem. 
We tended to question and to answer according to our work, I suppose. Simone Forti had produced an answer before Judson Memorial Church hosted the Dance Theater. Slant Board and other dance constructions from her Chambers St. concert (1961) were a quite complete new performance statement. Works for groups were 10 minutes long, and each piece had a simple thing to keep doing. 
Verbal instructions for these works could be minimal because there was no slack in the situation, once begun. Establishing this style in the performing context of the early ‘60s did present some challenge, as I recall. 
Simone told us (the initial cast) that she worked hard to have an idea and wanted to see those thoughts without other people’s ideas mixing in. One might imagine that Slant Board was foolproof, but Simone’s remarks indicates that we were goofing on her material. 
Her instance on cleaning ground was very important. It produced a shock to my system in performance. The effect of Simone’s remark had been to make me eager to work with her idea through the rehearsals. Then it was The Night. We were beginning Slant Board and my mind began to race, seeking time between the thoughts. Frustrating. Someone began to move, and soon we were involved in making choice after choice, each choice amplified by the sense of will which accompanied it. Continuity was a choice. Stopping was a choice. Everything one was aware of was a choice. Each interaction with another performer was a combination of choices. And this must be Simone’s work, I thought, because this is what we are doing and people are watching it, thinking this is Simone’s work. And I continued grappling. I had the sensation of trying to be myself, to behave myself. And therein lies a story. 


Q & A 
by Steve Paxton
“What is Contact Improvisation?”
That the question is asked reveals
either that the term is investigated by
people with no opportunity to see
performances or jams by contactors;
no recourse to social dancing, a friendly
wrestling match; or, as in my case,
too much exposure to the above.
When, in 1972, a group of dancers
began work on Contact Improvisation,
it was a study of the way communication
was possible through touch. My
own background was mostly the Modern
Dance, which may be seen study by individuals in physical isolation,
usually within a group. In classes
of this sort one maintains a sphere of
isolation from other students to avoid
belaboring them with battements.
Crossing the floor, it is customary to
move serially, enabling the instructor
to see each student they pass.
From this background the communication
possible through touching
was, and still is, a profound experience.
Likewise the movement which resulted
from contact improvising—a non-rationalized,
intuitive movement leading to
unforeseen phrasing, positions and
gambits—was a relief from years of
willful technical applications.
Although improvisation has long
been a sophisticated approach to
music and, more recently, to drama
in the U.S., in my background it didn’t
exist. Although there were many references
to improvisation as an important
factor in the development of modern
dance (Isadora Duncan and Rudolf
Laban,) by the time I came to study,
Modern Dance seemed in a period of
codification. From the many ‘mainline’
modern dancers with whom I
studied, I can recall only classes full
of rote exercises.
This state of affairs is so contrary to
the spirit of Duncan or the ideas of
Laban that one might suppose Modern
Dance had been born and died during
the first half of the 20th Century. Yet
the term ‘Modern Dance’ holds promise
of renewal: it seems less useful to limit 
the phrase to a particular period than
to presume that the name, phoenix-like,
can rise from the ashes and become
again applicable. In this interpretation
it becomes an umbrella for avant-garde
efforts of any sort, which is more or
less the situation I encountered.
From this perspective, basing movement
upon intimate communication
(rather than aesthetic dictates) was
appealing. It spoke to my body, which
had been in isolation for many years.
Having found the phenomena, the
next step was to select ingredients in
preparation for the extremes of movement
the communication could produce.
Aikido, gymnastic and meditation
techniques were included, and
material gleaned from the contact improvisation
itself.
It was here, I think, in the effort to
create a technical approach to insure
greater safety, that misunderstanding
of the form was born. Many folk who
are drawn to Contact Improvisation to
explore their physicality, will begin the
practice willfully, trying to ‘understand’
and move intellectually (as is
their habit) instead of exploring willingly.
For some of these students,
the techniques suggested by the teacher
become doctrine. They ‘know’
what Contact Improvisation is because
they remember the words and perform
the techniques. I believe there is no
form of dance for which this approach
will liberate the dancer. Certainly not
Contact Improvisation which is not a
form of set movement phrases but an
approach to movement in which the
student moves from the motivations
of feflex and intuition. There is a contradiction
in a technical approach to
improvisation. While one is aiming for
a freedom from rationalized movement,
one is still studying movement from the
example and words of a teacher.
Ideally, each student would move at
their own rate, developing physical
skills appropriate to their own improvisational
explorations. However, in the
case of willful technique, a teacher
might retard the evolution of the class
so that fundamentals of moving are the
focus, giving everybody an extended
opportunity to sink past the conscious
mind into more appropriate states. The
student is unlikely to remain ‘willful’—
extracting learning on only one level
of mind—if the material is a 20 minute
concentration on rolling the body
around the floor. In the search for
further thoughts, the student’s mind
becomes witness to the body and the
sensations of movement.
There are other reasons for retarding
the explorations of a class, and other
methods. Especially when taking the
first several classes with a group, I try
to gauge their perceptions and responses
to simple situations. I watch for
fainters and those who look nauseous,
both common enough for people who
maintain rigidity in their bodies or
attitudes toward them. I have found
students who can’t remember ever
doing a forward roll, or who become
disoriented if they roll over more than
Vi roll at a time. As a teacher, these
students are especially dear to me;
their bravery in beginning to move is
more beautiful to me than most of
the throwabout expert maneuvers
expectable from ‘advanced’ students
of the form.
On the other hand, there are people
who will throw themselves with
astonishing abandon through the air,
onto the resources of a relative stranger.
In abstract, the equations in
classes are fascinating. When somebody
who is flabby and insecure connects
with one of the devil-may-care
types, the chemistry is . . . sensational.
However, the experience of these
students may not be pleasant, and
really, it should be if the learning be
of such stuff as to provoke further
exploration.
Teaching has taught me that humans
operate under a wider variety
of senses and perceptions than I had
imagined, that each student has tuned
their senses differently in relation to
their experiences. One of the first
jobs is to tune the senses for the
dance at hand. I have seen willful
students straining their muscles in an
attempt to improve their dancing, but
I have yet to observe them strain their
senses. Nor would I consider this desirable.
The senses are tuned the way
they are for reasons of survival. New
perceptions should not be forced, but
instead, suggested or invited.
I tend to conduct classes with caution
therefore, especially at first.
Stefan Szczelkun remarks that in
the videotape Chute a certain rough
and tumble attitude is seen in the
first group to work with Contact Improvisation.
It’s true that a great
many things were tried and that no
injuries resulted from the experiments.
But this was an invited group, whose
physical states and abilities were
known. And there were mats to
soften the errors. Backing up the effort
was another important element;
we were doing nothing else than this
dancing for two weeks.
To recapitulate: first there was a
communicative movement form, then
there were technical developments to
implement extremes of the form.
During this period Contact Improvisation
was known physically and in
common by those whose dancing developed
it. We were contact improvisation.
That initial work came to presentation,
and those first dancers began to
teach, and to move around the country.
Christina Svane remarked that it
was like a poker player moving into
a new town. . .to continue their game,
the first step is to teach it. Contact
is not a form of solitaire. . .
The essence of the form is easy to
understand. It has been done by women
in their fifties, and one who was
8 months pregnant. It has been done
by men who were tender and otherwise.
Technical development has been
an attempt to formulate and collate
habits of movement to further the
dance within the stream of time and
forces converging in this work. 

BONNIE and DAVID
by Steve Paxton
—this is very like the meeting of a yogini and samurai.
—he knows very precisely what he is doing.
—she knows very precisely how he does it.
—he might be interested in using this page as a target, at 300 yards,
—she might not hit the broadside of a barn.
—she believes that acuity and information are interrelated.
—he believes that acuity and supper are interrelated,
and so, each from the perception, striving in their way
toward acuity and their goal.
Tools of the Trade 
-there are her tools. 
-each with their tools have achieved great acuity. 
-these are his tools 
Life Proceeds
—Life proceeds by feeding on itself.
(David is innocent of any charge of negligence. He pays
strict attention to survival. And the death he eats is not
that of hand-me-down, supermarket flesh. It is the death
of the predator in the wild, the direct death of master
harvester, who summons stomach for the execution of
death as well as the eating of it.)
Life Proceeds
—the proceeds of life are memories and quickened awareness.
(Bonnie is innocent of any charge of negligence. She
produces a means to perceive imagining the real. She
confronts the death of the cell and allows surviving cells
to notice. Supper of rice and black beans. Surviving cells
are fed on seeds. It is the assimilation of a master.)

—shiva dances in their mouths. And they perceive it.
I was interested in the meeting of Bonnie Bainbridge Cohen and David Bradshaw, Bonnie mentioned that her children don’t own toy guns. David’s daughter doesn’t either. She has a rifle, which she knows how to handle safely.
Each of these viewpoints is the result of personal choices, and each of these parents understands as much of the world
as has been granted them. I think it isn’t the yea or nay of weapons which counts, but rather the attitude and depth
of the understanding of issues hundreds o f generations old. [S.P.]
[See ‘Notes on Hunting’ by David Bradshaw (CQ V2), Interview with Bonnie Bainbridge Cohen (CQ V2); Interview with David
Bradshaw (CQ V}4); and Letters to CQ (V% and VI 1)7]


Aikido Roll 
Steve Paxton 
THE ROLL: The arm is rotated 90 degrees so the little finger and edge of
palm are first to touch the mat. The path of guidance blends smoothly into
the path of weight: e.g., left hand, forearm, elbow, upper arm (begin taking
weight), shoulder-diagonally across back on a line from Left shoulder to
Right hip. Down R. thigh to knee, over which one levers to assume ½ kneel;
L. leg ready to push to stand, or continue.
INITIAL POSITION can be ½ kneel or stand , with same foot forward as leading
arm. ½ kneel position is: L. leg- sole on floor, knee at 90 degrees bend, no
rotation. R. leg- knee on floor, leg rotated out, lower leg 90 degrees to plane
of roll (to facilitate end of roll to position and avoid unnecessary straining to
achieve upright.)
DYNAMICS:
The weight of the body will be placed on a line diagonal to body
symmetry. With this path firmly in mind, curve the path from little finger to
opposite hip and true it to the direction of travel. Imagine a point (hub) at the
center of the curve and stretch along the whole path, along the curve, so as to
maintain a light tensing outward as a bowing. Stretch along the path toward the
little finger which due to arm rotation will make initial mat contact. This
stretched arc will be maintained during the roll. Eyes remain open during roll
and any tendency to collapse at elbow, or shoulder, or whiplash action which
places large proportion of speed or weight on lower back or elsewhere is to be
trained away. The roll should be completely even with no undue stress or speed,
and the weight path should follow the line of direction accurately. Rolling on
concrete is comfortable if the roll is properly done.

Aikido – Information in deed
By Steve Paxton 
Jack Wada (Sensei) Aikido instructor at 
[the University of California at Santa Cruz]
Gave a demonstration during the Contact Improvisation workshop 19 April [1976]. 
Aikido is a Japanese Martial Art developed early this century by M. Uyeshiba, then a master of the extant martial arts. 
Aikido has valuable information for those who have eyes to see. Wadasensei did much to make the forces visible; spirals and curves to meet the pro-forma aggression of his 3 ukis, the energy of easy blending, guiding, leading and directing attack energy to its own neutered completion. Most valuable unromanticized un stressed concentration. Seeing him react was information in deed. 
The martial arts are the arts of war. They have each been forged in the heat of life or death, and have matured through a lineage of survivors. Aikido is of particular interest due to breadth of vision of the situation of war. It does not stress the vs. but the non-polar ‘we’. The intense realization which dath brings to activity has graced the martial arts including Aikido which efficiency. This elegance of means is based on profound (because essential) information of body mechanics, training possibilities .Here is information embodied in a seamless flow. The concentration which cannot bend. The accommodating winning maneuver. 
Contact Improvisation is not a martial art. It is perhaps an art sport if it is defined by the context in which it currently operates. The means of teaching are not those of life or death confrontation but life to life confrontation. The teaching philosophy is that of mindless, supposing that learning can be joyous, that the danger of finding is a pleasure in depth. Contact as a means has produced a community of particular information, an ‘it’ against which other things can be assessed, by which ‘it’ ‘itself’ can be gauged in living manifestation. It is time to question: What is the result? Is the fire hot enough to forge the solid concentration? Is mildness means enough to calm the seeker and show the teacher and the student a calm balanced center, to obliterate a hierarchical I (invitation to war, Atlas vs. Heracles) and to expose the We of us and the forces? Or is it a cheap thrill, placatory, builder of influence for those with the sweets, waste of time spent in orgy of sensation? Compassionate teachers? Balanced teachers? Concentration teachers? What will it be? The current generation is the test animal. Contact will always be reflected in our karma. Contact is serene. We think we know the forces in play. ‘It’/us are on the line. Things are always life or death. 

Twice Now by Steve Paxton 
It has happened twice now, once in Berkeley,
once in New York. In spite of our blank performing faces, predictable sweatpants, tee-shirts, duets, despite David Gordon’s observation that, “There are 87,000,000 permutations: you hit 8,000 of them a night among 5 people. There it is.” , despite all that. Twice this year I found myself in a performance for audiences who vocalized their response as the dancing occurred. They ahhd, they oohed, they said all right. 
It was a contact audience made up in good part of contractors, contact afficionados, would-be-contactors, and friends of contactors. 
The feeling generated by response, quality attention was very warm. Good humor and free feeling are persuasive, and I felt uplifted, soothed, touched, liberated. At last. After all these years, performances with lively audiences. 
The American audience is generally overly polite, or repressed, or confused, or slothful. Perhaps it’s all those movies, TV, and highly touted high-art performances. Perhaps it’s that the American new dance from Cunningham on, left little room for response. 
But it felt right, to find the audience contribute to a situation in which on-the-spot contributions are the mode. Thanks. 
Writing about performance strikes me much like writing about nutrition. Too many factors: what’s organic, what’s artificial, what’s pernicious? What is real, and what is intuited and what is imagined? Those who ask, “Is Contact Improvisation a spectator sport?” must have access to some book of rules I haven’t read. (U.S. Gov. Publication No. 339, “Dance as high-Art: Function in Society. Dos and Don’ts”) After 20 years of performing, I’ve begun to realize I won’t find it in my mail box some morning. I long ago stopped waiting. 
Below are some questions I asked myself. I don’t have THE answers, only my own answers to some of them. 
Is there a perceptual difference in a one-time viewing of a choreographed performance vs. an improvised performance? What? 
The show must go on. T_  F_ 
Life must go on. T_  F_
Do different gateways of perception arrive at different perceptions? 
Is some gates are open, are the others closed?
If a gate has a neon sign over it, what do you know about it? 
Can you enter another’s gateways? 
Performance is a linear proposition. T_  F_  
Performance is a circular proposition. T_  F_  
Performance is a spiral proposition.  T_  F_
Performance is a klein-bottle. T_  F_
Performance is a physical act. T_  F_ 
Performance is a social act. T_  F_ 
Performance is a cultural act. T_  F_ 
Performance is a psychological act. T_  F_
Performance is a spiritual act. T_  F_
Performance is necessarily acting. T_  F_
What is the difference between acting and acting. Define ‘natural’. Define reaction. Define responsibility. Define response ability. 
What is a buyer’s market? 
What is a seller’s market? 
How fast is an eye? (as in, ‘the hand is quicker than the eye.’) 
De critics affect the perceptions? 
Does the audience affect the performer? 
Does architecture affect the perceptions? 
What is the most permanent art? 
What is meant by impermanent arts? 
Is change necessary? 
Can change be avoided? 
Is change constant? 
Is there nothing new under the sun? 
Does the audience get what it expects? 
Where do ‘ideas’ come from? 
Does anything begin, actually?
What is a ‘convenience food’? 
What are ‘eternal verities’? 
Who told you so? 
Faced by paradox, what can one do? What is control? 
Is body language quicker than the eye? 
What is the shortest perceptible amount of time? 
What is the longest? 
What is known? 
Can you control things you don’t know?
What is a free-for-all? 
What is discovered in hearing 10 witnesses describe an accident? 
How do you know what’s missing? 
Is understanding part of communication? 
What is understanding? 
Is there something your audience wants to know? 
How do you deal with the parable ending, “you can’t please all the people all the time”? 
What % of the people is the acceptable minimum of people pleased? Are you aware of differences in your perceptions in front of an audience? 
Have you had your E.E.G. made? During performance? Blood tested? Urine? 
What does ‘rise to the occasion’ imply? 
Define ‘undefinable”. 


A definition 
Contact Improvisation is a duet art-sport currently receiving international attention by those institutions concerned with new departures in the forms of dance. 
In the years since the inception of Contact Improvisation, in 1972, it has been adopted as performance mode of some 10 dance companies across the U.S., and used as a teaching technique by those grass roots dance organizations, institutions and individuals concerned with investigation of dance improvisation ephemera before the concerns of art aesthetics arise. 
It is an activity related to familiar duet forms such as the embrace, wrestling, martial arts, and the jitterbug, encompassing the range of movement from stillness to highly athletic. The exigencies of the form dictate a mdoe of movement which is relaxed, constantly aware and prepared, and on-flowing. As a basic focus, the dancers remain in physical touch, mutually supportiveand innovative, meditating upon the physical laws relating to their masses: gravity, momentum, inertia, and friction. They do not strive to achieve results but rather, to meet the constantly changing physical reality with appropriate placement and energy. Steve Paxton


THE SMALL DANCE
ELIZABETH: At the very beginning of a Contact Improvisation workshop,
teachers often talk about the 'small dance '. Why do you start
with the 'small dance'?
STEVE: Well, first of all, it's a fairly easy perception: all you have to do
is stand up and then relax-you know-and at a certain point you realize
that you 've relaxed everything that you can relax but you 're still
standing and in that standing is quite a lot of minute movement: . . the
skeleton holding you upright even though you 're mentally relaxing.
Now in that very fact of you ordering yourself to relax and yet continuing
to stand - finding that limit to which you could no further relax without
fa/ling down, you 're put in touch with a basic sustaining effort that goes
on constantly in the body, that you don 't have to be aware of. It's
background movement static-you know-that you blot out with your
more interesting activities, yet it's always there sustaining you~ We're
trying to get in touch with these kinds of primal forces in the body and.
make them readily apparent. Call it the 'small dance ' ... It was a name
chosen largely because it's quite descriptive of the situation and because
while you 're doing the stand and feeling the 'small dance' you 're aware
· that you 're not 'doing' it, so, in a way, you 're watching yourself perform;
watching your body perform its function. And your mind is not figuring
anything out and not searching for any answers or being used as an
active instrument but is being used as a lens to focus on certain
perceptions.
Elizabeth Zimmer interviewing Steve Paxton on CBC Radio


Teacher Teaching
What becomes a teacher
that becomes a teacher?
The function of a teacher is to help the learner learn. preparing the learner to find
out themselves.
skill / tact equals visibility / invisibility equals tact/ skill
having become experienced is a debt to the forces -that-be that we must constantly
acknowledge. We are privileged to pass on the sensitizing information, relaxing information,
strengthening information, information of the forces-that-be.
Is it true? that: the learner learns to be partly the self & partly the teacher
thus the implantation continues through the generations
so the skill for our arts is the model of no model
thus leaving the motivation in the student, in the way we would want to retain
power over ·our lives while at the same time retaining the option to
release control
the dancing does the teaching. the teacher points to that.
teacher is the manager for a long concert (all the classes, end to end )
which teacher sees with eyes-that-can-see and so shows the others how-to-see
so gradually the learners learn to see and the special position of teacher
can be shared. teacher becomes special learner, using the energy granted
by the class to learn ever more intensely.
Does the class seek purity? If so,
special learner will receive pure energy and pure intensity.
this is the power of the special learner. The power granted by the learners
Is only equal to the power developed by the teacher in the learners.
Does the teacher poach the motivation· of the class? Does the teacher teach
the poaching of personal power? Then the special learner will receive impure
energy colored with power play and gland games.
quality to quality, receiving what is given. a volley-ball of Karma.
MATERIALS: physical sensations, patient discipline. Activity preserving the integrity of
the sensations of the forces. materials strengthening the ability to stay oriented.
Communicating these to the body as directly, gently, simply, humbly as can be.
Endeavor to grow strength organically.
As taught, so one tends to teach. Could the teacher enjoy a class taught by their
student's student? beyond the brief moment of transmission is a long, a potentially
life -long association. Our Karma will be clear & irrevocable, not only bad or good.
Consider: sitting & rocking one day and examining the chain forged moment to moment,
over the years. Memory of the forces -that-were, ourselves among them.
Steve Paxton 

RUBY: an isolated ghost town in Southern Arizona
could be leased in November for 18 months. It will be
be a primitive living situation in desert mountains, with a
fresh water well and three lakes, two within the town.
Initial plans include enough renovation to create
space for about 30 people in preparation for a
month of Contact Improvisation in April, 1978.
The main reconstruction would begin March, 1978

(windows, doors, tin roofs, gardening, setting up cooking facilities, and the like).
As a general schedule, the town would operate six months a year, spring
and fall. We will apply for grants to pay for construction, materials and luxuries,
such as generators and vehicles. As of now, however, residents will be asked to
pay rent, and classes will be given to raise funds for a small crew, staff, the materials
and tools. It may have to pay its own way, which is not out of the
question considering the climate is mild and the type of construction basic.
Please drop a line to: Box 22, E. Charleston, Vermont, 05833, to express interest,
giving some estimate of March and April availability and skills such as carpentry,
desert gardening, cooking for groups, etc., and areas of special expertise in which
you could teach classes or offer services.
in touch,
Steve Paxton


TRISHA BROWN COMPANY, INC, AT THE PALINDROME
Steve Paxton 
During the 21 sections of the hour-long LINE UP, (B.A.M., N.Y.C., March 10, 11, 12, 13, 18, 19) the five women
arrive at section 11. Sololos. Mona Sulzman removes to downstage center and sits facing Elizabeth Garren, Judith
Ragir, Wendy Perron and Trisha Brown. These four present a unison dance which introduces the most energetic,
Highly ornamented, idiosyncratic, dancerly and formally ' revealed ' portion of the evening.
Trisha Brown often builds her works so the audience shares process with performers. Her 'accumulations' are
Examples, and the result of watching a process performed in effect very different than only viewing the finished
product. The audience is given an intellectual ride upon a physical composition . Her work deals with complex
coordination mazes which have been learned one synaptic pathway at a time, and the spectator, soon privy to
the formal concerns, can empathetically share a rigorous logic manifest during elegant, delicate and whimsical
movement .
Sololos comprises three phrases which after the initial showing are controlled by means of verbal instructions
given by Sulzman. She speaks to each performer and tells them which option to take and when to perform
a phrase backwards.
A schematic of the palindrome looks like this:

The basic route shuttles a performer back and forth along Main. Spill and Branch, available on instructions from Sulzman, may be entered from the Start gate and second gate, and also through the back
door of Main, reversed. 'Spill,' ' Branch' and ' Reverse,' then, are all the audience hears. Main and its
reversal are left to their eyes.
Changing the initial coherent unison into four separate phrases, Sulzman twines the movement/
time routes of the dancers about one another for 12 minutes. She makes ducts, solos, trios and
quartets and again dissolves them.
With their additional rule of 'MainiaM' the dancers never pause. The choreography Sulzman
improvises for the quartet has the look of precisely gauged flows channeled parallel or diffused throughout the space and time.
The accuracy with which the dancers meter their movement is crucial to Sulzman's success.
Spill, for example, is manifest as four different phrases, each an interpretation of
a verbal score written by Brown. Each dancer has tailored her interpretation to the
time limits defined by the over-all form, the same duration forward and reversed.
It is here in the chaotic aspect of the dance that the discipline of the quartet can
be inferred. Many dance companies have achieved fine unison work (though
many more have tried and missed). In Sololos new parameters are presented
for one of the oldest and most satisfying dance motifs.
The impact of Sololos is not dependent upon formal invention however.
The means becomes clear and the basic premise, 'unisonosinu,' felt and
appreciated, at which point the spectator can hone in on a particular
dancer and watch the process in action.
Not all the instructions demand split-second changes by the performer.
'Spill' and 'Branch ' are usually given prior to the movement
gate where they become accessible. The instruction 'Reverse'
calls for action as soon as the last syllable is clear, which
prevents jumping the gun, and permits unison reversals and
re-reversals. If a performer is near a gate movement, the
word following the name may be one of three choices.
Sulzman may call, " Judith, reverse," " Judith, spill," or
" Judith, branch." The first would send Judith forward
along Main from gate 3. The second would mean going backwards along Spill, the third, backwards along
Branch. These junctures are fascinating. A flick of the eye of the changing dancer can clearly reveal the mental
state and adjustment to the instruction. Or if a unison is reversed, any subtle lag is immediately seen and
felt by the viewers.
Most impressive and satisfying is the reversal wherein no flicker of mind nor stutter of flow is seen. It is
doubtful that this would be the case if the mental agility and discipline of an extraordinarily tight company
were not being tested performance after performance. But beyond their competition with the movement
form is the possibility of a mental flow which allows no previewing. Accurately modulated to the moment,
a reversal in this state of mind is done without bl ink or balk, and the audience rides smoothly back along
the phrase to the beginning.
Balanchine's dictum, 'dancers should not think,' has met a successful rejoinder. Sololos is evidence in deed
that dancers move in their minds with agility, that the thought of dancers is of a different order than that in
other mediums. Trisha Brown has again allowed the audience into the blink between thoughts to promote
sensitivity to movement of the inner dance.


SOLO DANCING
Steve Paxton / L'Attico Gallery / Roma. Italia / 7 July. 1973
Solo dancing docs not exist: the dancer dances with the floor: add another dancer and you have a quartet:
each, dancer with the other and each with the floor.
In the United States recently a form of dancing has arisen which treats each dancer as a surface to be played
upon as is the floor. Named CONTACT IMPROVISATION. it resembles wrestling. the jitterbug, fucking,
tumbling and juggling; yet none of these quite describes the other; and none quite describes this dancing. The
physical is best pictured in terms of spectrums of potentials: two people freely improvising movement
using the floor and each other as surface rely on gravity as a constant; inertia into momentum as a variable:
adamant (the floor) to yielding (skin- muscle- bone- total mass) as surface features; and the variables of
give and take, ruled not by set roles for each dancer but by the understanding that each may change from give
to take at any time.
This brings us to the non-physical part of this dancing: the state of being or mind permitting mutual freedom,
with mutual reliance. The mind is kept empty of preconceptions and memories; it is in the present moments
only, meditating on the potentials and on the easiest paths in the energy construct which are available to both
dancers: it is a state of abandon: trust in the self and in each other must be total. The ability to help each
other and one's self must be ever ready: through constant movement one pursues mutual case in constant mutual
change. The dancer's weight is only his to give: not to possess.
The final factor here considered is time. The division of rime into minutes and seconds perhaps clouds the view
of time-as- flow: but in this dancing where units of time are defined by the velocities of independent and semi-independent 
masses involved in movement of and upon the two bodies, time moves as quickly as the dancers
move: given a state of constant falling, the glands react as in those foils wherein time apparently stands still,
and the dancers shift from our pedestrian concepts into a time sense allowing some controls in the endless chain
of accidents they have provoked: that is the improvisation in which they make contact. 


HATHA YOGA
Steve Paxton
Do you want to know what hatha yoga is? It is a procedure for cleansing the instrument. It doesn't have to be
believed. If the procedure is followed, the instrument will become cleaner. It was developed in one of the most
unhygienic countries in the world, where sanitation is not a civic matter, but a personal one. Note that it has
lasted thousands of years. That is the only tribute one need pay. It exists in the living instrument and if it wasn't
helpful, the pragmatic result would be, we would have no such tradition to be heir to.
Most notable aspect of hatha yoga is the lack of accessories. Doing it is simply living a certain way for a brief
period each day. The implications reverberate in the instrument, the exercise adjusts it, the attitude calms it,
the stance tunes it. It is freed of problems it wasn't aware it had. The instrument plays more purely.
Hatha yoga will expose the I-drenched body as a system of vessels, bends, strengths, chemicals, fantasies, limitations,
weight, and more, by sensation. The vocabulary of sensation will become a syntax, a unifying factor for
divergent feelings. It isn't a religion, you don't have to have an attitude. For the West the difficulty is, it's so
much calmer and slower than we easily accept. That is only the first message.



NOW AND THEN
Steve Paxton
It wasn't until the 20th Century that ways were found to accurately
notate and record movement. Movement Notation was initiated 200
years earlier, and as a concept can be traced back to pictographs. Rudolf
Laban, a Swiss efficiency expert, invented the system most widely used
today to record movement on paper. It is obscure because it is cumbersome.
It is still used to record dance because for many years it had no
peer. Noa Eshkol (see Contact Newsletter 211) has devised a movement
notation which can be computerized, which holds promise of replacing
Laban's notation.
Film was the first recording device movement had. One can respect the
efforts and elegance of Muybridge, but the animation he provided with
serial still photography left the element of time up to the eye of the beholder.
Film filled the gaps.
However, the expense in terms of money and processing time means that
television and video have the practical edge. And now, for the first time
in history, dance can be easily recorded. The loss, in translation, is
noticeable - but the result is a clear representation. With several cameras,
the lack of a third spatial dimension can be approximately rectified, and
what is missing in the 3rd dimension is amended by the clear way it relates
to the 4th dimension.
Dancing will be much changed by this new faculty. Already, video has
been used to feedback movement to the dancer. The dancer can now see
self not only from the back, or totally concentrated, but through the eye
of another person - the cameraman.
And the awareness of the performance moments is being changed by the
steady video system appraisal. Performance is an adrenalized state, full
of rush and pause. Video has revealed objective durations for heightened
moment of action, giving the performer a means to analyze memory, and
the sensing of time.


SYMBOLS FOR WHAT WE DO
Steve Paxton
Symbols for what we do in contact have been various and inventive, indicating notation of movement
need not stop at Laban and Eshkol though nothing to date exceeds theirs in detail. Video, especially
a multi-viewed action, is a mechanical notation we have used to watch action in detail, (in a form which
constantly changes perhaps the review is most efficiently done electronically.) Eshkol uses her notation
to preview action, and avoids the tedium of Laban's notation with what is perhaps an alternate tedium:
computerized notation.
Notation - verbal, pictorial, or electronic is a means to an end. By involving the brain in the welter of
views of a living process, the brain's view can be made more flexible and made complicit in the physical
world rather than dictatorial. Thus I presume an organic direction for the Newsletter is toward a wellunderstood,
considered, deep pictorial and verbal silence. The blank page standing for an agreement
that, after all the brain work, we are still confronted with a mystery, and that no symbol is the best symbol.
However, for now I'm still high on communication of intimate sensations and thoughts and the ease with
which the C.N. contributors have created a mutually satisfactory language to share their inner worlds.
A recent gift of tao calligraphy is instructive - the pictographic alphabets are much closer to drawings, even
if the symbols now used are far removed from the initial inspiration - evolution away from the pictorial
source. One is confronted with the ambiguity between Chinese symbols, statements and evocations.
The Western World has adopted symbols in written communication which state more easily than they
evoke. The letter 'A' is a fragment of a statement, (or a word of condition.) Were the words to involve
other types of decoding than just the alphabetic, a new connotive vocabulary would enrich the mind.
Enriching the mind is a step away from its primacy - toward flexibility equivalent to the peripheral vision
eye training in contact.
I would like to continue a polylog begun during the day of silence at the Amherst session.
Viewing the body.
bird's
eye view
with x ray
arms & hands shoulder torso head wrist elbow ribs spine head or scapula 
I. External
II. Internal
A friend described a newly discovered personal symbol. It was a cube which changed dimensions. Any
side which could be seen was fixed. Other parts would change. Rotation stopped the changing sides but
freed the previously fixed dimensions to change. And what, she asked, was my self-symbol?
I hadn't one but thought awhile and felt a sense of vibration. A sine wave. Waves brought an image of the
ocean and that was almost it ... The completion came when I saw the ocean as two fluid bodies in interface
- a water ocean and an air ocean both going  . . . So I described this to her as ~
with time changing, usually going fast.
Several years later the zodiac symbols came my way. I am an Aquarian.
In other words, the interior vision is a symbol language of a different order.


The evolving cube brought thoughts to mind.
1. you can't see all of everything in 3 dimensions.
2. unless you are inside.
3. i.e. going beyond peripheral vision to (? )d vision.
Needed a word like, but more particular than, sensing - instead of 'vision' metaphor.

















